 Preface The narrative and observations now pre-
 sented to the public, were the fruits of a voyage
 undertaken solely with commercial views. They
 were written without any expectation of their be-
 ing copied, and without the remotest thought of
 publication. But falling accidentally under the
 notice of the Editor, he was pleased with perusing
 them, and believed that, if printed, they would
 also be agreeable to many others. He accordingly
 communicated this idea to the writer, who, after
 considering the subject, with a proper degree of
 modesty, consented to the proposal. If the reader should derive amusement or
 instruction from this work, he will naturally wish
 to know something respecting the author. He is
 the second son of the late Doctor Abraham Sutcliff,
 who practised, with much skill and reputation, as
 a physician, in Sheffield, and who died there about
 twelve years since. At Sheffield, the author, who
 was born and educated in the religious Society of
 Friends, served his apprenticeship; and afterwards
 settled there in business as a merchant. In this
 line he continued for several years, and dealt ex-
 tensively with transatlantic connexions; which,
 after some time, rendered it expedient for him to
 make two voyages to America, for the settlement
 of his affairs. The latter voyage and the travels
 subsequent to it, comprise the transactions which
 are now offered to the public. In the year 1806, the author returned to
 England, and continued there till the year 1811;
 when he conceived that a residence in America,
 might prove more advantageous to him. He ac-
 cordingly, with his wife and one daughter, the only
 surviving child of a very numerous family, em-
 barked for New-York, in the sixth month last,
 with the view of settling in that country. Whilst the author was in America, he had
 frequent intervals of leisure, which the nature of
 his mercantile concerns rendered unavoidable. Of
 some of these opportunities he availed himself, to
 visit his connexions and friends in various parts of
 the country; having also the view of gratifying his
 curiosity, and enlarging the sphere of his informa-
 tion. Being a man of observation, of a strong
 memory and benevolent disposition, and having
 formed an extensive acquaintance with respectable
 persons in America, by whom he was treated with
 kindness and attention; he seems to have been
 qualified to render an account of his travels both
 pleasing and interesting. The Editor therefore
 ventures to presume, that many of the remarks
 and occurrences contained in this little volume,
 will prove useful as well as amusing to juvenile
 readers; and that they will not be destitute of
 information to persons of mature years. The
 narrative appears to be judicious, and is given
 with great simplicity; and the Editor has not the
 least doubt of its strict veracity. The anecdotes
 rise naturally from the subject, and are generally
 of a curious, novel, and instructive nature. They
 are numerous, and form a peculiar and striking
 feature of the work. On the whole, the Editor
 persuades himself, that these travels will not be
 unacceptable to the generality of readers. 9th Month, 1811. Chapter I.
 The author leaves home.--Peak in Derbyshire. Manches
 ter--Liverpool--Transactions before the voyage--Sets
 sail from that port.--Occurrences on the voyage.--
Arrival at New-York. 22d of the 5th* Month, 1804 To those who may not be accustomed to designate the
 Months by their numerical names, the following Table may
 be useful: The 1st is commonly called January 2d February. 3d March. 4th April. 5th May. 6th June. 7th July. 8th August. 9th September. 10th October. 11th November. 12th December. After having taken leave of my relations and
 friends in Sheffield, I left home with my wife and
 children. As our road lay through Castleton, we
 visited Peak's Hole, which was a great gratification
 to the children, who had never before seen a natural
 curiosity of equal interest. The habitations within
 the cavern, With the manufactory of pack-thread
 that was carrying on there, had a very singular and
 striking effect, which had something in it more like
 a dream or a vision, than a transaction of real life.
 Yet I did not perceive on the countenances of
 those who were employed in this subterraneous
 abode, less appearance of being happy or cheerful,
 than we see upon the faces we meet in the
 crowded streets of towns and cities:--Such is the
 force of habit. After taking some refreshment, we set out upon
 our next stage; and, believing it would be some
 relief to the horses, I walked up the Winyards,
 which, though a laborious walk, is far from being
 an unpleasant one. This is, perhaps, one of the
 most romantic roads in this country, on account of
 the steep and lofty mountains through which it
 winds its way; and, after having ascended the
 summit, a very different scenery is presented to
 the view: The most fruitful and populous part of
 the counties of Lancaster and Chester lying in
 full prospect before the eyes of the traveller, pre-
 sents something like the appearance of one vast
 city intermixed with fields and woods. In the evening, we arrived safe at Manchester.
 There we were hospitably entertained at the house
 of T. H. jun. and were kindly shown through his
 bleaching, dying, and printing works. We were
 also shown a beautiful collection of dried speci-
 mens of herbs, flowers, &c. the production of
 Botany Bay. These he had received from an
 ingenious young man who had been transported
 into that country when but a boy on a charge
 of pilfering; of which, I understood, it was ge-
 nerallv believed he was innocent. His habits of
 industry and care did not forsake him, although
 thrown amongst such a set of companions as Botany
 Bay and a Transport Ship may be supposed to
 furnish; and, in a few years, he had acquired
 property to a considerable amount. 5th Month, 23d. Having concluded to take our
 passage in one of the packet-boats which go be-
 tween Manchester and Warrington, T. H. kindly
 accommodated us with his sociable to the water-
 side. We got into the packet, and had a pleasant
 sail nearly to Warrington, where we dined, being
 about 18 miles. This is an easy mode of travelling
 both as to expense and fatigue; and when upon a
 canal like that of the Duke of Bridgewater's, and
 in such a country as that through which we
 sailed this day, the weather at the same time being
 fine and clear, it could scarcely be otherwise than
 very pleasant. In the evening we arrived at
 Liverpool, and took up our quarters at our cousin
 T. B.'s. 5th Month, 24th and 25th, were spent at Liver-
 pool, in preparation for my intended voyage to
 America. 5th Month, 26th. Being the first day of the week,
 we attended the meetings at Liverpool, and spent
 the rest of the day at our Cousin A. B.'s, at Mile-
 end, near Liverpool; where we had the company of
 Captain R. B. of the Romulus, an agreeable, con-
 sistent friend, from Hudson City, in the State of
 New-York. 5th Month, 27th. In the morning cousin T. B.
 kindly conducted me to the Lyceum; a splendid
 public establishment of the nature of a news-room
 or coffee-house, and library. Afterwards, accom-
 panied by my wife and children, we paid a visit to
 the Asylum for the Blind ; an institution well worthy
 the support of the wealthy, where many persons
 who have lost their sight, are instructed in various
 branches of business, by which they are enabled to
 pass their time usefully, and agreeably to them-
 selves. After visiting this institution, we walked
 to the Botanic Garden. Our relation being a sub-
 scriber, had the privilege of introducing us as
 strangers; and we spent a pleasant hour or two,
 having, in the compass of a few acres of land, an
 opportunity of seeing a vast variety of plants, flowers,
 shrubs, and trees, natives of every quarter of the
 world, alive and flourishing as in the countries
 from which they are brought. Amongst them I
 noticed the banana and the sugar cane. After visiting these noble institutions, our feel-
 ings were harrowed by seeing an unfeeling press-
 gang dragging along a friendless poor man, whom
 they had just hunted down in the streets. 5th Month 28th. This day I paid a visit to
 Captain N. on board his ship called the Laura;
 and after some conversation with him and his
 agent, J. C. concluded to take my passage in her
 to New-York; for which I paid 35 guineas. 5th Month, 29th. In the afternoon of this day,
 I was requested by the Captain to be in readiness
 to go on board in the evening; accordingly, after
 taking leave of my wife, children, and hospitable
 relations, I went on board, accompanied by my
 fellow-passengers, who were J. W. jun. and J. L.
 both of Philadelphia; J. F. of Leeds, and W. W.
 of New Or1eans. After sleeping that night on
 board, the wind proving contrary, and there being
 no appearance of a change, we all came on shore
 in the morning, and I returned to my wife and
 children. This was, I believe, an agreeable disap-
 pointment to all of us, as the prospect of so long a
 voyage, and the probability that we might never
 see each other more, on this side the grave, had sat
 rather heavily upon some of our minds at parting
 the evening before; and now, to have almost a
 certainty of spending another day with my wife,
 children, and near relatives, seemed to me a privi-
 lege almost invaluable. 5th Month, 30th. I spent this day with my wife
 and children, in the family of my kind relatives;
 and so pleasant it was to me, that it was like the
 addition of one day to me being in the world. 5th Month, 31st. This morning my wife and
 children, with part of cousin B.'s family, and
 M. M. of Rochdale, accompanied me on board 
the Laura, then lying about a mile from Liverpool
 near the Cheshire shore. As our boat passed by
 the Princess, a ship of war, then lying in the
 Mersey, we were a little entertained by the ship's
 crew being ordered to man the rigging, just as we
 were along side of them. In a few moments after
 the word of command was given, the shrouds of
 every mast appeared covered with seamen, from the
 deck to the heads of the masts; having the ap-
 pearance of three lofty pyramids; each beginning
 with a file of men at the bottom, and finishing at
 the top with a single individual. After spending
 about an hour, and taking some refreshment on
 board the Laura, we all returned safe to Liverpool,
 where I slept this night. 1st of 6th Month, 1804. The wind becoming
 more favorable, we received orders to be ready
 to go on board again in the evening; so I again
 took leave of my wife and children; but as I had
 before to return on shore, and the winds con-
 tinued variable, there was a probability that I
 might have to return to them again in the morn-
 ing. These circumstances took away a little of the
 edge of our anxiety at parting, and rendered it not
 quite so formidable as our first taking leave on the
 29th ult. My cousin T. B. and W. B. accom-
 panied us to the water-side, where a boat was
 waiting for us. We got safe to the vessel, which
 lay at anchor the whole of this night. The next
 morning, being 6th Month, 2d, as the seamen
 were raising the anchor, we were visited by R. B.
 who kindly came at six o'clock in the morning
 to inquire after our welfare. What little wind
 we had was favourable; and it being a clear and
 beautiful summer's day, the town of Liverpool,
 and country on both sides the Mersey, appeared
 to great advantage as we sailed down the river. After passing a little way into the Irish Channel
 our Captain sent away the Pilot. On the Pilot's
 leaving our ship, the captain requested that when
 he got to his own vessel he would not present our
 seamen with a bottle of spirits as was commonly
 done in such cases, alledging that his men were
 already so intoxicated they were scarcely able
 to work the ship. This circumstance, though
 seemingly of small importance, had nearly been of
 serious consequence to us; and, for a time, there
 seemed some danger of a mutiny amongst the
 men. Such was the sourness which it produced,
 that, during the whole voyage, they sullenly re-
 fused the customary allowance from the Captain,
 of a bottle of brandy at the end of every week;
 and, at one time, a ring1eader in the business, who
 had formerly served on board a ship of war,
 broke out into very abusive language to the Cap-
 tain, and treated him in such a manner that there
 was some danger of the Captain firing his pistol
 at him. I was sorry to find that this man had
 been favoured with an education in our Society;
 and that his mother was a valuable friend. Not-
 withstanding his bad conduct towards the Captain,
 he always behaved with kindness and attention
 to me whenever I came in his way and when I
 spoke to him, which I did several times, endea-
 vouring to convince him of the impropriety of
 his conduct, in thus doing his utmost to break in
 upon that subordination which was necessary to
 be maintained in every ship. After the pilot had left us, we proceeded along
 the Welch coast, having the mountains of North
 Wales in full view during the whole of the day.
 The weather being calm and clear, it is scarcely
 in the power of words to describe the gran-
 deur of the prospect, which indeed was such
 that we could hardly regret the slow progress
 we made. In the afternoon, when opposite one
 of the highest mountains, We were alarmed by
 the noise of a very heavy discharge of cannon, from
 one or two vessels which were some distance
 a-head of us. At first we supposed it to be an
 engagement between an English and a French
 privateer; but, on coming nearer, we had reason
 to believe they were two slave ships, which had left
 Liverpool a little before us, and had taken the
 opportunity of scaling their great guns, and exer-
 cising their men, when in a situation that would
 produce the greatest echo and noise; a disposition
 very prevalent in the world. The night coming on, the beautiful and romantic
 Welch scenery was hid from us, and, next morning,
 having made but little progress during the night,
 we found ourselves nearly opposite to Holyhead.
 Having been favoured with a smooth sea, we
 escaped sickness, and sat down to breakfast with
 some appetite. Before we rose from table, a ship
 that was coming up the Channel, put out her boat
 and made a signal to speak with us. Our vessel
 was accordingly managed in a way to put them
 to as little trouble as possible; and they soon
 reached us. On their coming on board, we found the
 ship was the Liverpool, from New-York to Liver-
 pool; and the Captain being an old acquaintance
 of the Master of our ship, they were rejoiced to
 see each other. After an exchange of intelligence
 and news papers, we parted from her, and sailed
 slowly round the head of Holy-head, and soon had
 a fine prospect of Caernarvon Bay; but before the
 evening closed, the sky was overcast, and the wind
 got up, so that we were under the necessity of
 taking in a great part of our sails; and several of
 us began to be very sick. In the course of the night, which was very dark,
 the wind became contrary; and it was with great
 difficulty we got through the narrow part of the
 Channel, near St. David's Head, without fairly
 putting back towards Liverpool. The passage
 was not accomplished, without several times tack-
 ing from one coast to the other; and, could I have
 had the management, I would gladly have put the
 ship into Milford Haven, and did advise the Captain
 to do it. However, we had cause to be thankful
 that we got well out of this narrow sea, although
 not without imminent danger of losing our cabin-
 boy, who was washed overboard as he was carry-
 ing the knives and forks from the caboose to the
 cabin; but, in passing through the railing, he got
 entangled among some ropes which hung from
 the rail, and was thus providentially preserved.
 Nearly our whole stock of table knives and forks
 were lost, which was a great inconveniency to us,
 especially being just at the commencement of our
 voyage; however I did not regret the loss of the
 knives and forks, seeing the boy's life was preserved.
 This accident made so strong an impression upon
 the poor lad, that he never recovered his spirits
 during the voyage. Our first mate being an active man, made us a
 few table forks from an old barrel hoop, using the
 anchor as an anvil. These, with our pocket-
 knives, served as a substitute for those we had lost.
 This little occurrence manifests the propriety of
 passengers providing themselves each with an
 extra knife and fork. About two days after this, we got clear of both
 the English and Irish coast, and made a rapid
 progress on our way across the Atlantic. There
 seemed every probability of our being favoured
 with a short passage; but, in a voyage at sea, as
 in the voyage of life, it often happens that our
 prospects are not realized. After about two weeks of fair wind in the gene-
 ral, we began to experience hard gales, and from
 unfavourable quarters; so that for a week or ten
 days, we made but little way. The patience of our
 Captain being a good deal tried, and his temper
 somewhat soured, he was liable to use harsh lan-
 guage to his people, and particularly to a black
 man who was steward of the ship. On one occasion,
 the ship had laid to for several hours, not being
 able to carry any sail, excepting a single one to
 steady her. In this state she was left to drift be-
 fore the wind, which was then, to use the Captain's
 expression, blowing a hurricane, and she was of
 course a good deal agitated. The waves, according
 to the seamen's phrase, were running mountains
 high. It happened, under these circumstances, that
 one of the passengers, by a sudden roll of the ves-
 sel, was near being thrown down the stairs into the
 cabin; but, catching hold of the mahogany hand
 rail, he saved himself at the expense of breaking
 the rail. This the Captain did not observe till night
 when we were all seated in the cabin. Then
 he fell upon the poor black man, with vio-
 lent and abusive language, charging him with
 breaking the rail. After his passion was somewhat
 subsided, I told him that I was a witness that the
 black man was innocent of what he had charged
 him with; that, considering the kind of day we had
 passed over, there was great cause to be thankful no
 other damage had been sustained than the breaking
 of the hand rail, and that, so far from giving way
 passion at trifling things in such a time as this, our
 minds ought rather to be impressed with gratitude,
 that we had been providentially preserved through
 the storm. At first, the Captain seemed offended at my free-
 dom, and turned from me in displeasure. Nothing
 more was said at that time; however, after we were
 all in bed, and the passengers mostly asleep, he
 called to me, and, on my answering him, he said,
 that he was convinced of the justice of my obser-
 vations; was obliged to me for the hints I had
 dropped, and that he was sorry for his having
 given way to passion, when far other sentiments
 ought to have possessed his mind. This acknow-
 ledgement was ingenuous on the part of the Cap-
 tain; and I believe he slept no worse for it. In the course of the day, when the weather had
 cleared up, altho' the wind still blew very hard, and
 the waves were rolling along in awful grandeur;
 while the ship was yet lying to and drifting before
 the wind, the other passengers and myself went upon
 the upper part of the quarter deck, that we might
 have a full view of the sea when thus agitated, and
 appearing in all its majesty. There is something in
 such a scene exceedingly humiliating. The most
 powerful of men, when thus baffled and riding on
 the waves, every moment in danger of being swal-
 lowed up, are indeed but as the small dust of the
 balance. Every sensible mind, when placed in
 situations like these, must be alive to the senti-
 ment which that expression conveys. As we thus
 stood admiring how every wave, after rolling
 along in majestic greatness, seemed to break at
 our feet before it reached the ship, the first mate,
 who was on the watch, called out aloud, for every
 one to take care of himself. Observing that he ran
 and placed himself under the quarter board, near
 one of the stansions, I immediately followed his
 example, and, taking fast hold of the ropes, sat
 down by him; which I had scarcely done before one
 of these huge waves rolled completely over the ship;
 and we were, for a short time, overwhelmed by it.
 Such was the force with which it struck the ship,
 that she reeled to the other side, and really trembled
 under the stroke. One of the passengers having his
 back towards it, and not hearing the mate's warning,
 was struck down with so much violence, and pre-
 cipitated to the other side of the vessel with so much
 force, that his head, striking against one of the
 quarter boards, broke the board in pieces; and a
 pair of cloth pantaloons which he held in his hands
 at the time were washed overboard. Indeed we had
 great cause to be thankful to Divine Providence, that
 we escaped without further loss or damage; and it
 was matter of admiration to me, that, whilst buried
 in the wave, my mind was preserved from any con-
 siderable fear or anxiety as to the consequences. At this time, we were, I believe, in the gulf
 stream; for as the water passed over us, it felt as
 warm as new milk. The ship reeled so much to
 one side, at the stroke of the sea, that we had a
 second immersion as she righted, after recovering
 from the shock. As it had blown a hard gale all
 the preceding night, the ocean was become so very
 rough pretty early in the morning, that a heavy sea
 broke through the cabin windows, and rolled into
 the beds on one side of the ship; which occasioned
 a great alarm ; and I have seldom seen men rise
 more quickly from their beds than our companions
 did on that side of the cabin. A little time after the
 storm had subsided, and the sea was become calm,
 we were entertained with the sight of a number of
 flying fish, which, from time to time, continued
 to rise our of the sea, and after taking short flights,
 dropped again into the water. These flying fish ap-
 peared to be pursued by a number of dolphins,
 which, for a considerable time, kept company with
 the ship, so as to give us a full opportunity of ob-
 serving their beautiful colours, continually changing
 to the various tints of azure, green and gold. The
 gold fishes, which we see confined in glass jars, are
 very beautiful; but not at all to be compared with
 the dolphin, which is, besides a much larger fish;
 generally weiging 8 or 10 pounds. Our seamen
 caught several of them, and we found them very
 good eating. Although the colours of the dolphin
 are exceedingly beautiful while alive and in motion
 in the sea, yet they are still more extraordinary when
 the fish is taken out of the water, and is in the
 agonies of death; Displaying then, every colour of
 the rainbow, changing in rapid succession as long
 as life remains. As the dolphins were in pursuit
 of the flying fish, so the dolphins in their turn were
 pursued by the sharks; and such is the activity of
 these voracious animals in seizing their prey, that,
 whilst one of our people was dragging up a dolphin,
 as quickly as he possibly could, a huge shark put up
 his monstrous jaws and snatched the fish from
 the hook. The voracious shark also had his enemies; for
 the sailors by throwing out pieces of meat, enticed
 him to come so near the ship, that one of the com-
 pany who stood upon the main-chains had an op-
 portunity of casting the noose of a strong rope over
 his head; and the other end of the rope being
 passed through a block, he was quickly hoisted upon
 deck, where he lay some time striking the boards
 with his tail with great violence. It was curious to
 see the agitation of the little pilot fishes, which
 accompanied the shark; and when he was dragged
 out of the water, they seemed to use their best
 endeavours to follow him. The pilot fish is something like the mackerel;
 but of a smaller size. On the shark's being thrown
 upon the deck, several sucking fish fell from him
 about 8 or 10 inches in length. These fishes, I
 should suppose, are a considerable annoyance to the
 shark, sticking close to various parts of his body
 like a leech. The Captain not being willing that he
 should he killed, on account of the dirt and disagree-
 able smell that he would make; and the sailors not
 being willing that he should escape punishment,
 wantonly tied a piece of wood about the size of a
 common oar to his tail, and then hoisted him again
 and let him into the sea. Notwithstanding he had
 been out of the water more than a quarter of an
 hour, the moment he reached the sea, he dived
 into the deep with the incumbrance at his tail,
 apparently with the greatest ease, and was out of
 sight in a few seconds. Of the various kinds of fishes we saw on our pas-
 sage, porpoises were the most common. They are
 large, weighing from 20 to 30 stone; yet we fre-
 quently saw large shoals of them extending as far
 as the eye could reach, and all driving along in
 one direction; frequently leaping quite out of the
 water, and often passing close by the ship, so as to
 afford the sailors an opportunity of striking them
 with the harpoon and dragging them on board.
 Some of the people, I observed, were partial to
 the heart and liver of this fish when fried, as-
 serting that they were scarcely to be distinguished
 from those of a hog when dressed in the same
 way. At one time we were entertained by the
 sight of several whales, five of which passed close
 to the ship, sporting and rolling along within a
 few yards of us; making a loud noise in snorting
 and spouting up the water from a hole in their
 foreheads. These creatures were of large bulk,
 and appeared exceedingly fat and sleek; their
 skins shining as if varnished. Although there does not appear any place of
 rest for fowls in the wide ocean, yet numbers of
 them are daily seen riding light pieces of cork on
 the loftiest waves, and in the most tempestuous
 weather. These are mostly of the petril tribe,
 although sea-gulls are often seen at a great dis-
 tance from land, especially on the banks of New-
 foundland and in approaching them. In passing these banks it is wonderful to see the
 thick fog which generally prevails, so that, in a morn-
 ing, the rigging and sails of the ship would be drip-
 ping wet, as though they had been in heavy shower
 during the night. In addition, the weather was so
 cold that it was very uncomfortable to be without
 fire, although it was the middle of summer, and
 we were many more degrees southward
 than England. These heavy fogs when seen at a
 distance had many times much the appearance of
 land; and about the time of the setting sun, they
 presented a great variety of appearances. Some-
 times we might imagine we had the sight of a
 splendid city, with towers, domes, and steeples,
 rising before us; and, in a while, the whole would
 entirely vanish, and leave nothing to be seen but
 the wide extended ocean, bounded by horizon. Being detailed nearly two weeks in the gulf
 stream, by light and contrary winds, our Captain
 began to be anxious about the provisions and water,
 in consequence of which he put the men upon their
 allowance of beef and pork, which were now
 handed to them by weight; and we ourselves were
 prohibited the use of fresh water, in washing our
 hands and faces, and were obliged to use the sea
 water which is far from being pleasant. Besides,
 having had a considerable loss by the breakage of
 ale and porter bottles, owing to their having been
 put up when the liquor was new, the passengers
 and officers of the ship were obliged to submit to
 a certain allowance of these articles; and we now
 began to be more frugal of our fresh provisions
 than heretofore. While our time was thus passing on in the gulf
 stream, we were under some apprehensions of be-
 ing carried out of our course by the current; and
 the sea being often as smooth as a fish-pond, we
 occasionally hoisted out the boat, and taking an
 iron pot, let it down into the sea, by which means
 the direction of the current was ascertained.
 Some of us were at the trouble of sealing up a
 bottle, inclosing a paper containing the latitude
 and longitude; and, adding our names and places
 of abode, We requested that the person who
 might pick it up would inform any of the parties.
 Although we had no great expectation of hearing
 more of the bottle after it was thrown into the
 sea, yet I had not been long in America before
 the paper was handed to me, having been picked
 up on the sands near Newport, in Rhode Island.
 Thus, contrary to the received opinion respecting
 the current of the gulf stream, it had been carried
 in a north-westerly direction. There seemed no
 of accounting for this circumstance, but by
 supposing that the action of the wind had made
 the bottle deviate from the course of the stream. Having considerable time on our hands, we
 amused ourselves in little experiments of this sort.
 Several times we sunk well-corked empty bottles
 to a considerable depth into the sea; and although
 great care was taken to have the corks tight and
 sealed, yet it was invariably the case, when drawn
 up again, that the corks were found pushed into
 the bottles, or that the bottles had filled with water
 by its passing through the pores of the cork. I have
 already observed that the water in the gulf stream
 was warm as new milk; but on sinking a ther-
 mometer some depth in the sea, and hastily draw-
 ing it up again, we found that the water below
 was as cold as in any other part. After a tedious time spent in the gulf stream, we
 at length arrived on the coast of North America;
 and on 1st day morning, the 29th of the 7th Month,
 we were favoured with the sight of Long Island.
 A little after noon, we ran close in shore, so much
 so that the ship was hastily put about, or she
 would have touched the bottom in a few minutes;
 for, in turning round, she raked up the mud
 so much as to discolour the water to a con-
 siderable degree; however we were soon in deep
 water again. Thus, after having been for 8 weeks
 at sea, where the eye had been almost wearied
 with a continued sameness of prospects, and after
 having had, for several hours, the delightful pro-
 spect of farm-houses and plantations, we again
 launched into the wide ocean. To be thus
 snatched from green fields and woods, and cheer-
 ful habitations, was a trial of patience to some of
 our companions; and, all the afternoon, I noticed
 an anxious looking towards the land, in most of us. The next morning, about four o'clock, 7th
 Month, 30th, I was waked by the report of a
 great gun, which was followed by considerable
 bustle upon deck. After getting up, I understood
 that a shot had been fired over us by an English
 frigate, called the Boston, which, in company with
 the Leander and Cambrian men of war, and Driver
 sloop of war, was then cruizing near us; and
 as the cannon-ball that was fired over us, was an
 earnest of what we might expect if we did not
 stop to receive an officer from the frigate, the
 topsails were immediately backed, and we short-
 ened sail that they might have an opportunity of
 coming to us. A Lieutenant and Midshipman
 were sent on board. After spending about half
 an hour in conversation with us, and exchanging
 intelligence and newspapers, they left the ship;
 and, at parting, observed that they believed all our
 seamen were citizens of the United States, and
 therefore did not wish to examine them; but
 that they hoped we would not hoist our sails until
 we had a signal from the frigate; which was com-
 plied with. We were now again in sight of land, being near
 Sandyhook. Having a fine view of the Jersey
 Mountains, and it being a clear summer's morn-
 ing, the country before us appeared exceedingly
 beautiful. In approaching the shore we observed
 an appearance not less beautiful in what I believe
 is called a land-loom. The whole country ap-
 peared to be reflected in the atmosphere; some-
 thing like what we see from the banks of rivers,
 when objects are reflected in the water. But
 here, instead of the images appearing in the water
 united at bottom to the objects, they were all re-
 flected in the air, with their tops downwards; and
 each reflection seeming to touch the top of the
 object reflected. The different ships of war, which I have just
 mentioned, made a very gay appearance; for
 the weather being fine and clear, and but little
 wind, they had most of their sails spread, and
 continued sailing to and fro before Sandyhook;
 the Never-sink Mountains being in the back
 ground. Their object was to watch two French
 frigates then lying in New-York, as the Lieutenant
 of the Boston informed us, and, at the same time,
 to examine all American ships in order to discover
 if there were any of the subjects of Great Britain
 serving on board, with a view to impress them.
 It appeared to be an arduous and delicate situa-
 tion in which the Commander of these ships was
 placed. Having to fulfil the orders of his Govern-
 ment on the one hand, and being in danger of
 giving offence to the America on the other, it
 seemed impossible for him to steer clear, unless
 possessed of a very uncommon share of prudence
 and discretion. In sailing up to New-York, we passed by the
 two French frigates, called the Didon and the the
 Sybille. They appeared to be very full of men.
 Soon after four o'clock in the afternoon, we ar-
 rived at that city; and coming along-side the
 wharf, we were handed on shore by J. W. who
 kindly conducted us to our quarters, and we were
 soon after joined by A. B. who drank tea and
 spent the evening with us. Thus, after a passage
 of 58 days, we were favoured to land safe in
 America, for which we have abundant cause to be
 thankful. In passing through the streets to our
 lodgings, I was struck with the great variety
 of fruit exposed for sale; such as pine-apples,
 melons of various kinds, peaches, &c. &c. Me-
 lons and pine-apples I bought for 3d. or 4d. each,
 and other fruit in proportion. On going to bed
 this evening, I found that after being so long
 habituated to the motion of the ship, I could
 get scarcely any sleep. Chapter II.
 New-York.--Philadelphia.--Account of the Mammoth.--
 Norristown.--Spring Mill Ferry.--Philadelphia.--
 Burlington--Amboy.--New-York.--Baltimore, Wash-
ington.--Alexandria. 7th Month 31st, 1804. This morning I was
 conducted by my companions to one of the Public
 Baths kept in the city of New-York. These
 Baths are upon a plan I had not seen before. On
 each side of a long and spacious passage, is a
 range of small rooms, in each of which is a Bath
 sufficient to accommodate one person; with suit-
 able conveniences for dressing and undressing. On
 the side of each Bath are two brass cocks, the
 one furnishing warm and the other cold water; so
 that the bather may have the water at what tem-
 perature he pleases. There is also a valve, by
 means of which, if there is more water than is
 pleasant, he may let part of it out. Some of these
 Baths are made of white marble; and are so con-
 structed that a person may lie down or sit in them.
 So grateful it is to remain a considerable time in
 them, in the warm season of the year, that it
 is a common practice for bathers to take books
 with them to read while they thus indulge them-
 selves in the Bath. There are also Baths in a
 different part of the house set apart for females. After spending a little time at the Bath, we re-
 turned to breakfast. On sitting down to it, I
 could not avoid noticing the difference there was
 betwixt an American and an English breakfast
 table; and I took out my pencil and put down the
 different articles that were on the table before me,
 which were intended for four persons only. The
 articles were as follows:-coffee and tea, with rolls,
 and bread and butter, broiled fish, and cutlets,
 hung beef, boiled eggs, a small species of lobster,
 radishes, and blackberries. The butter brought
 upon the table, had a piece of ice placed upon it,
 which is a general practice in this country, during
 the summer. This keeps the butter as cool and
 hard as in winter. Most of this day was spent in
 passing our luggage through the custom-house;
 and, it is but justice to the revenue officers in
 this country to notice, that they are very obliging
 in their behaviour; and, being allowed handsome
 salaries, they are not in the practice of taking
 fees or bribes. 8th Month, 1st. Being invited by F. T. I ac-
 companied him to his country-house, about two
 miles above New-York, on the East River, where
 I spent the evening and slept. Being in the heat
 of summer, and near the tide waters, I was con-
 siderably annoyed with musquitoes. I returned
 with F. T. to New-York the next morning, and,
 after attending the monthly meeting there, dined
 at J. B.'s. The next day I set out in the
 mail stage for Philadelphia, in company with
 J. L. and J. F. On our way, we dined at Newark,
 at Archibald Gifford's Tavern, and reached
 Prince Town to supper. The country we passed
 through was pleasantly diversified with hill and
 dale; and the luxuriant appearance of the fields
 of Indian corn, had a very striking effect upon one
 who had not been much out of England. The
 situations and appearances of Newark and Prince
 Town, are particularly beautiful. But it was
 quite dark before we reached Trenton, so that our
 coachman was unable to see his way, in driving
 into the ferryboat; and the wheels on one
 side of the carriage passing into the boat whilst
 those on the other side went into the Delaware, we
 narrowly escaped a plunge into the water. The
 passengers usually keep their seats in the carriage
 while it is ferried over the rivers in this country;
 and, in general, the horses are so well trained, that
 they are driven in and out of the boats without
 any difficulty. On finding ourselves in this perilous
 situation, we all got out of the carriage into the
 boat as well as we could; which was no very easy
 task, as it was quite dark, and we were without
 lamp or candle. The driver putting back his
 horses, got clear of the boat, and in his second
 attempt drove fairly into it, and we crossed the
 river without further accident. The next morning, the 4th of 8th Month, we
 got safe to Philadelphia to breakfast. Here I
 met with my brother J. S. and cousin T. W. whom
 I accompanied to S. B's, in Arch-street, where
 I took up my lodgings. The streets of Philadel-
 phia all run parallel, or cross each other at right
 angles, and many of them are planted with a row
 of trees on each side. In walking along them, I
 was a good deal entertained with the loud, and
 almost incessant chirping which is heard from the
 trees in the evening, after sunset; and which I un-
 derstood was chiefly occasioned by the tree frog.
 This species of frog makes its abode amongst the
 branches of the trees, and' makes a very considera-
 ble noise in the evening. 8th Month, 5th. I attended the Northern Division
 monthly meeting; and, being kindly invited, I
 dined and drank tea at J. W.'s, where I met with
 R. J. -M. R. -S. S. and T. S. The company of
 so many friends, whom I had seen and known in
 England, was very pleasant. On the 6th of the 8th Month, I attended the
 quarterly meeting for Philadelphia, which, though
 one of the largest in America, did not continue
 more than one hour and a half, there being but
 little business before it, besides answering the
 queries. As this was likely to be a very abundant
 fruit year, and many friends had large orchards,
 some individuals very pressingly cautioned them
 against suffering their cider to be distilled. The
 concern of friends, in this country, against the fre-
 quent use of spirituous liquors in their families, is
 very great; and probably it is not without just
 cause. The trouble attendant on brewing and pre-
 serving malt liquor in warm climates is great; and,
 on the contrary, spirituous liquors are preserved
 with so little difficulty, in so little room, and at so
 easy an expense, that most families, especially in
 the country, give them the preference as com-
 mon beverage throughout the year, when diluted
 with water. It is not from cider alone they pro-
 cure spirits. Large quantities are also distilled
 from the juice of peaches. This is called peach
 brandy, and possesses a peculiar flavour and colour,
 obtained from the kernels. The general price of
 brandies of these kinds is about 2s. 6d. to 3s. 6d.
 sterling per gallon; and these are, when kept an
 equal age, but little inferior to French brandy.
 After the quarterly meeting, I dined with T. S.'s
 family, being invited by him; and, after dinner,
 took a walk with him through his tan-yard. I ob-
 served that they did not confine themselves to oak
 bark; but made use of bark from other trees also,
 the particular kinds of which I do not recollect;
 but I think a species of pine, and the walnut are
 of the number. 8th Month, 7th. In the afternoon I accom-
 panied some friends to take a view of the skeleton
 of a Mammoth, which was carefully put together
 and set up in a convenient room in the city. When
 clothed with flesh, this animal must have been of
 enormous bulk. The tusks were upwards of six
 feet in length, and the leg bones appeared about
 the thickness of the waist of a middle sized person.
 In comparing the bones of this animal with those
 of an elephant, a considerable difference is observed,
 particularly about the feet; those of the Mammoth
 resembling the feet of a beast of prey more than the
 elephant, appearing to be armed with sharp claws.
 One of the claws, about eight inches in length, which
 was found near the skeleton, I had in my hands.
 An animal of such bulk, so armed, must have been
 very destructive to the creatures around him. The
 Indians have a tradition, that on this account the
 Great Spirit directed that the whole species should
 become extinct. Near the banks of the large
 rivers in this country, and generally near the salt
 springs, the bones of these animals are found. In
 the inland parts of America all kinds of cattle are
 excessively fond of salt, and, as in other parts of
 the world, there are here many springs whose
 waters are brackish. Contiguous to these springs,
 the clay and earth, over which the waters have
 run, are impregnated with salt; and to these
 places, all kinds of wild cattle frequently resort,
 and are seen licking the earth with great eagerness.
 These places are called Salt Licks, by the inhabi-
 tants, and, on the banks of the Ohio, is a place of
 this sort, called the Bigbone Lick, on account of
 the great number of Mammoth bones which are
 found buried in its vicinity. From this it seems as
 if these enormous creatures stationed themselves
 near the salt springs, that they might make a prey
 of the animals which resorted to them; and, it is
 very probable, that the old Mammoths, in particu-
 lar, might station themselves in places like these,
 where, at last, they would die of old age. The 8th and 9th were spent in Philadelphia.
 The next day, accompanied by my brother J. S.
 and T. W. I paid a visit to a relation at his estate
 above Norristown, being about twenty miles from
 Philadelphia. This plantation, consists of 300
 acres of good land, 200 of which are cleared,
 and 100 covered with wood. The wood land is
 the most valuable, being so convenient for the
 Philadelphia carpenters, &c. On the estate is a
 well finished square stone house, about 15 yards in
 length, with a wide boarded floor piazza, both in
 back and front. These afford excellent accom-
 modation during the summer season, which con-
 tinues much longer, and in general is much warmer
 here than in England; as, in these piazzas, they
 frequently take tea and spend their evenings.
 Besides the dwelling-house there is an excellent
 kitchen, and offices adjoining; with a large barn,
 and stables sufficient to accommodate 40 horses
 and cows; all well built of stone. The estate
 extends the whole breadth betwixt the Schuilkill
 and Perkiomen. On the former river there is a
 Shad Fishery which is of considerable value; and,
 if prosecuted with spirit, might supply many fa-
 milies with fish for the whole year. The house is
 so situated that it commands one of the finest pro-
 spects in Pennsylvania, and, being on a rising ground,
 is dry and healthy. The whole together forms
 one of the most beautiful spots I have seen in the
 United States. This estate, with all its appendages,
 cost about 3600l. sterling, which is but 12l. per
 acre, the buildings included. There is also an ex-
 cellent orchard of about 10 acres planted with the
 choicest fruit-trees, which are just in their prime. This plantation was formerly in the possession
 of a friend from London, of the name of Vaux,
 who built the house and made the improvements
 upon it. When he resided there with his family,
 during the American war, being in full view of
 the great American encampment at Valley Forge,
 and on the opposite side of the river Schuilkill,
 he had frequently the company of General Howe,
 and the other British Commanders. One day it
 happened that he had Howe to breakfast and
 Washington to tea; and being a friend who wished
 well to all men, he made no distinction between
 the contending parties, he left his house open to
 all. This was the general practice of friends dur-
 ing the war, particularly with those who stood
 true to the principles of their profession: and this
 proved the best policy; for though attended with
 some loss of provisions at the time, yet they were
 generally preserved from any serious suffering in
 their persons, by their hospitable conduct. 8th Month, 12th. This being the 1st day of the
 week, our relation conducted us to Providence
 meeting, a few miles distant from his house. After
 meeting we were kindly invited to dinner, by a
 friend who was a stranger to us. We felt and
 acknowledged his kindness, but returned with our
 relation, in whose family we spent the remainder
 of the day. Notwithstanding this was the hottest
 season of the year, we had a very liberal supply of
 ice upon the table; which I found my relation had
 the means of procuring without trouble or expence
 to himself. Amongst the buildings in his purchase
 was an ice-house, which every winter is replenished
 by some of his neighbours, for the privilege
 of supplying themselves in the summer. I noticed
 that the two female servants employed in the fa-
 mily, had, both of them, been lately hired from on
 board a vessel lying in the Delaware; and which
 had recently arrived from Amsterdam with several
 hundred Germans, men, women, and children, of
 that description of people called, in America, Re-
 demptioners. These are people in low circum-
 stances, who, being desirous of settling in America,
 and not having money to pay their passage, agree
 with the American captains of vessels to be taken
 over on condition of hiring for a term of years, on
 their arrival in America, to masters who are willing
 to advance 10 or 12 guineas to be deducted out of
 their wages; and it not unfrequently happens that
 they agree to serve two, three, or four years for
 meat and clothes only, on condition of their pas-
 sage being paid. Yet, as wages, in the general,
 are rather high in America, it will easily be sup-
 posed that an active and clever person, conversant in
 some business, will make much better terms on
 landing, than the old and infirm; or than those who
 come over ignorant of any business. The two female servants I have just mentioned
 were both widows; and one of them had two chil-
 dren with her in the family, who were quite young.
 This woman had lost her husband about the time
 of their arrival on the American coast; and the
 husband of the other, being a sea-faring man be-
 longing to Holland, had, as I understood, lost
 his life and property by an English ship of war.
 Although these two females had obtained a settle-
 ment in a country enjoying many privileges beyond
 that which they had left; yet, I think, no feeling
 mind could behold them thus circumstanced,
 placed amongst strangers of whose language they
 were almost wholly ignorant; and habituated to
 customs very different from those to which they
 had now to conform, without sensations of com-
 passion; and it was very pleasant to me to
 observe that the general deportment of my rela-
 tions towards them was respectful. I noticed many families, particularly in Penn-
 sylvania, of great respectability both in our
 Society and amongst others, who had themselves
 come over to this country as Redemptioners; or
 were the children of such. And it is remarkable,
 that the German residents in this country, have
 a character for greater industry and stability than
 those of any other nation. In the plantation adjoining my relation's, we
 visited a lead mine on the banks of the Perkio-
men, which was then worked by a Frenchman. He
 invited us to go down into it, where, at the depth
 of about 12 feet, I saw a vein of lead ore 18 inches
 in thickness; and as it is wrought at a very easy
 expense, there was a great probability of its being
 a very valuable acquisition. But these things, like
 many others in the world, have the stamp of great
 uncertainty upon them. 8th Month, 13th. We returned this day to
 Philadelphia. In our way, we stopped at the Buck
 Tavern, where we supped and breakfasted. After
 breakfast we crossed the Schuylkill, at Spring Mill
 Ferry, and had a sight of a vineyard of about five 
acres, under the management of a Frenchman.
 As the vines were not suffered to grow more than
 three feet in height, it had something the appear-
 ance of a field of raspberries. By the pruning
 down the vines, the fruit, generally, becomes much
 finer than when suffered to spread, as is commonly
 the case in England. This day the thermometer
 stood at 76, in the shade, at two o'clock in the
 afternoon. I believe that we have sometimes as
 hot days in England, during the summer months,
 as are commonly felt in America; but there be-
 ing a much longer continuance of hot weather
 in the latter country, it is, of course, more fa-
 vourable for ripening various kinds of fruit.
 Having been very kindly invited, I dined at
 E. L's, the father of one of our companions on
 the voyage from Liverpool. The generous atten-
 tions I experienced in this family, I trust I shall
 not soon forget. On sitting down to dinner, I
 found myself in company with three other English-
 men, whom this kind family had also invited: they
 were J. S. of Manchester; J. N. of Wakefield;
 and J. F. of Leeds. 8th Month, 14th, was employed in Philadel-
 phia; and, after business, I drank tea and spent
 the evening at B. J's. He was one of that little
 band of friends who visited the South of France a
 few years ago. 8th Month, 15th. Spent part of this day at
 J. W.'s, where I had the company of H. J. and
 M. R. The lively and cheerful flow of R. J. 's spirits
 remains with her in her old age; no doubt, in a great
 measure, the result of a well-spent life; and she
 enjoys, in a remarkable degree, the love and esteem
 of her neighbours and friends. In the evening I
 called on Wm. Savery's widow, who appeared to
 be dejected, on account of the recent loss of a
 beloved husband. Few men have finished their
 course, in the possession of more esteem and regard
 from mankind in general; and his mind dwelling
 near to the mountain of Life and Love, his charity
 was unbounded. Exclusive of the testimony of
 the meeting to which he belonged, I noticed a
 number of tributes to his memory, in a variety of
 periodical publications, both in prose and verse. 8th Month, 16th. Spent a pleasant evening at
 D. Bacon 's. He, like the last mentioned friend,
 was a man highly esteemed in the circle of his
 acquaintance; and, being of a sweet disposition,
 had a great place amongst young friends, when his
 advice was wanted. He is since deceased. 8th Month, 17th. I dined and spent a part of
 the day at James Pemberton 's, a kind and
 hospitable friend of this meeting. Although
 approaching to his 90th year, he was then of
 considerable activity in offices of kindness to his
 friends. Having lived nearly all his time in this
 city, he has had the opportunity of observing its
 regular, although rapid progress, from a small
 town to a great commercial city. Amongst
 other things, he mentioned to me that he well
 remembered the time when there was but one
 ironmonger's shop in the place; and when there
 was only one ship in the trade between Philadel-
 phia and London; and the arrival of this vessel
 used to be of so much importance, that marriages
 were sometimes delayed until its return. Such is
 the great increase of this city, that it is now said
 to contain 106,000 inhabitants; more than 1000
 families of whom are of our society. 8th Month, 18th. Being the first day of the week,
 I attended Frankfort meeting; afterwards dined at
 N. W. 's, and in the afternoon drank tea at A. G.'s,
 where I slept. And the next day I returned to
 Philadelphia, A. G. kindly giving me a seat in his
 carriage. 8th Month, 20th. Most part of this day was
 employed at Philadelphia, in writing to my family
 in England. Having an opportunity of noticing
 a thermometer, I observed that it stood at 82 in
 the shade. The next day was employed in business
 at Philadelphia; and I supped and spent the even-
 ing at J. W.'s. 8th Month, 22d. I set out for New-York in
 the packet-boat, by way of Burlington, and had a
 pleasant sail up the Delaware, being about 20
 miles. The fare I paid was 13 1/2 pence to Burlington.
 The next day I attended Burlington meeting, and
 on the 24th, set out in the public stage for Am-
 boy, passing through a great part of West Jersey.
 In our way we breakfasted at Croswick's, where I
 noticed a noble meeting-house and school, which
 friends have build there, with spacious grounds
 about them, all in neat order. This night I lodged
 at the inn at Amboy, and was pleasantly lulled to
 rest by the plaintive notes of the Whippoorwill.
 This bird is often heard in the dead of the night,
 in the summer season, in America. Its song is an
 unceasing repetition of the three syllables of its
 name, Whip-poor-will, in soft and plaintive
 accents. 8th Month, 25th. This morning I went on
 board the packet for New-York, and in the passage
 we passed by the Romulus, Capt. R. B. from Liver-
 pool. By this vessel I had the pleasure of receiv-
 ing letters from my friends in England, and also
 agreeable accounts of my wife and children, who
 were at Liverpool when she left that port. I staid at New-York till after the 11th of the 9th
 month. In this city I once dined at the house of
 --, in company with several English friends.
 This individual is a remarkable instance of the
 instability of human things. A very short time
 since he was one of the most wealthy merchants
 in this city, and stood high in the estimation of
 friends, and that deservedly. By the Indians who
 visited New-York, he was looked up to as a father;
 and his house was always open to them. When
 by a sudden reverse, arising from circumstances
 which he could not controul, his property was
 dissipated and lost. 9th Month, 3d and 4th, were employed in busi-
 ness. One day, in passing along the streets, I was
 entertained with the sight of two Indian young
 men, with each a bow and arrow in his hand, trip-
 ping nimbly along, like two wild animals yet un-
 broken to the yoke. I also attended the sale of a
 forge and saw mill, with four dwelling-houses, and
 50 acres of land, distant 40 miles from New-
 York, and 10 miles from Hudson's River. The
 whole sold for 270l. sterling. Before I left this
 city, I wrote several letters to my family and friends
 in England, by the Josiah, Collins. 9th Month, 12th. I left New-York in the stage,
 for Philadelphia, arrived there the next day;
 and, after staying one night, set out for Baltimore
 in the stage, by way of Derby, Chester , Wilming-
 ton, Head of Elk, and Havre-de-Grace. Here I
 crossed the Susquehanna, a noble river, being
 about one mile over. Thence I proceeded to the
 Gunpowder Falls, where I saw some considerable
 iron works. 9th Month, 15th. I came to Baltimore, and
 being pressingly invited by J. T. I took up my
 quarters at his house. As I was a stranger in
 Baltimore, and had no acquaintance with him, but
 had accidentally met with him at a friend's house,
 as I was delivering a letter, I felt the greater obli-
gation to him for his generous attention. 9th Month, 16th. After being employed the fore-
 part of the day in business, I was invited to dinner
 by G. M. an open-hearted old man, and father-
 in-law to J. T. with whom I spent part of the day.
 In the afternoon I called upon G. M. who, a consi-
 derable time back, had emigrated with his father,
 of the same name, and several branches of the
 family, into this country, out of the northern parts
 of Yorkshire. 9th Month, 17th. I left Baltimore, and, in the
 evening, came to Washington City; or rather to
 the scite on which the Metropolis of the United
 States is intended to be built; for, as yet, little is
 done towards the foundation of a city, excepting
 the public offices, and houses for the accommoda-
 tion of the officers and clerks in the various de-
 partments of the State, and a few inns and taverns;
 but, as George Town is adjoining to it, they to-
 gether make up a population of about 8000 inha-
 bitants. The capitol will be a noble building
 when finished; and is beautifully situated on a
 commanding eminence; whence every part of the
 city may be seen; and whence also is a fine pro-
 spect of the Navy Yard, and of the Potowmack as
 far down as Alexandria; being a distance of 6 or
 7 miles. Upon the whole, the situation is one of
 the most eligible spots for a city that I have ever
 seen; and the plan being deliberately drawn out,
 and every thing done with regularity and order, it
 bids fair at some future day, to be one of the
 most elegant and regularly built cities in the world;
 and, what is of more consequence, the situation is
 dry and healthy. To a contemplative mind, there
 is something very interesting in the consideration
 of the representatives of an extensive empire, like
 that of the United States, thus jointly fixing
 upon the most eligible situation for their chief
 city. After taking tea at George Town, I crossed the
 Potowmack, and went down that evening to
 Alexandria, a beautiful little city, situated on that
 river, at a spot where it is about one mile over,
 and so deep that ships of war ride at anchor
 before the town. A worthy friend, of this city, mentioned to me
 a remarkable preservation experienced there during
 the war. While the town was in the hands of the
 American Government, the English Commander had,
 for some reason, given orders to burn it; and a ship
 of war, containing every requisite for its destruction,
 was ordered up the Potowmack. This inhabitants,
 as well may be conceived, were in the utmost con-
 sternation; but, at the moment when they were in
 the greatest confusion and distress; whilst the ship
 was steadily making her way within sight of the
 town, and all was given up for lost, there being
 no prospect of help, at this critical moment, the
 ship struck upon a sandbank, where she remained
 immoveable. The town was thus providentially
 saved from destruction, by that All-powerful arm,
 which so often interposes in the affairs of men;
 sometimes bringing down those who by a series
 of success seem to think themselves out of
 the reach of accident; and sometimes raising up
 others who by a long train of adversity had
 thought themselves below hope. 9th Month, 18th. I lodged last night at Alexan-
 dria. Soon after I fell asleep, I was suddenly
 waked by the noise of a number of horns. It ap-
 peared to me that the instruments used were cow-
 horns; and they made a prodigious bellowing in
 the dead of the night. On inquiring I found that
 it was the constant practice of the watchmen of
 this city, on meeting, to take their rounds, to
 serenade the citizens with a loud blast from their
 horns, which they carry with them, and which are
 used for the same purpose as the watchmen's rat-
tles in England. This morning, in company with
 two friends, I crossed the Potowmack, and paid a
 visit to a family at N --. This family, consist-
 ing chiefly of females, were born at Wickersly,
 near Rotheram. Their mother was of a family
 near Settle who are of the Roman Catholic per-
suasion. The family came over early in the set-
 tlement of Maryland by Lord Baltimore; and the
 bricks of which the house is built, they informed
 me were brought over in the same ship with their
 progenitors. The house is constructed upon the
 plan of some of our old English mansions; and the
 garden is laid out in the old English style. It is
 remarkable that I have never yet seen a garden, in
 America, walled round as in England. I believe
 that one principal reason is the warmth of the cli-
mate, and the clear, fine atmosphere, which pre-
 clude the use of fruit walls. Besides, walls would
 obstruct the free current of air, whiclh would be an
 objection to them. Yet I have frequently seen
 gardens handsomely fenced round to the height of
 6 or 7 feet, with neatly planed boards, painted
 white or green. It abated greatly the pleasure I
 should have received from the hospitality of this
 family, when I was informed that they were in
 possession of upwards of one hundred Negro
 slaves; numbers of whom I saw at work in the
 fields, the garden, and about the house. They
 appeared to be a remarkably stout, robust race of
 men, and, in point of health, had, to all appear-
 ance, greatly the advantage of their owners. A
 person, not conversant with these things, would be
 naturally led to think, that where families have the
 opportunity of employing a number of slaves,
 every thing about their houses, gardens, and plan-
tations, would be kept in very nice order. How-
 ever, the reverse of this is generally the case; and
 I was sometimes ready to think that the more
 slaves there were employed about a house and
 plantation, the more disorder appeared. I am
 persuaded, that in a well-regulated family, with
 one or two hired servants, much more neatness,
 order, and comfort may be preserved, than can be
 maintained by treble the number of slaves. I have
 been in families where several slaves were kept
 which have scarcely afforded the common neces-
saries of life. I have sat at table in families where
 two or three slaves have waited upon us, and yet
 there has not been a lodging-room or accommoda-
tions at night, equal to what many a labouring man
 in England is able to furnish; and, to compare the
 accommodations of a slave-holder, in some of the
 Southern States, with what the meanest of the
 Pennsylvanian farmers are accustomed to, would
 be still more unfavourable to the former. 9th Month, 19th. After attending to some busi-
 ness, P. J. and several other friends joining us, we
 took a boat with an intention of visiting Mount
 Vernon; but, after sailing a few miles on the
 Potowmack, the wind got up very high, and
 we found it would be unsafe to land: so, after
 taking a view of that beautiful spot from the river,
 we found it most prudent to return. Before we
 had got half way back to Alexandria, the wind
 still increasing, a great part of our company pre-
ferred walking 7 or 8 miles in the heat of the day,
 to the danger of continuing their voyage on the
 river; and they were accordingly put on shore at
 the first convenient landing. On approaching the
 shore, I was entertained with the sight of a num-
 ber of beautiful tortoises, that were seated upon
 the edge of a large boat which lay a wreck at the
 water side. Their colours were as beautifully
 variegated as the wings of the butterfly. After
 landing a part of our company, we beat up the
 river in the best manner we could: and, had I not
 been a pretty good swimmer, I should frequently
 have considered myself in extreme danger; but
 knowing that if the boat had filled with water, I
 was able to swim on shore, I had not much fear
 about me. 9th Month, 20th. I attended Alexandria monthly
 meeting in the forenoon; and, there being a vessel
 lying here, which was about sailing for Liverpool,
 I wrote and forwarded several letters to my rela-
 tives in England. Although the atmosphere on
 the continent is in general very clear; yet I could
 not avoid noticing, that, in this part of America,
 it was still clearer than in in any place I had before
 seen. The stars seemed to glitter with a brilliancy
 exceeding any thing I had already been witness
 to. So great was their lustre, that, waking about
 midnight, and observing a considerable degree of
 light shining into the chamber, at first, I thought
 it might be from the moon; but, on recollection,
 I knew this could not be the case, and looking
 out at the window, I found the light proceeded
 from several brilliant stars, which shone with such
 brightness as to cause the shadow of any inter-
 vening object, much in the same manner as the
 moon. The inn I slept at, is kept by an English-
 man of the name of Gadsley, and is conducted in
 a manner much superior to most inns in this coun-
 try, or many in England. Every thing was pre-
 served neat and clean, with good beds, and not
 more than one or two in a chamber. Note.--James Pemberton , a friend mentioned in page 36,
 is since deceased; and an interesting account is given of him
 in the 10th part of Piety Promoted, by J. G. Bevan. Chapter III.
 Port-Tobacco--Fredericksburg--Richmond--Negro trial--
 Gouchland--Fredericksburg--Effects of Negro Sla-
very on the Whites--Mount Vernon--George Town--
Baltimore--Brandy Wine--Wilmington--Philadelphia. On the 21st of 9th Month, 1804, I left Alex-
 andria, crossed the Potowmack, and went down
 to Port-Tobacco. In my way I passed through
 Piscattaway, where I dined, and where, amongst
 other things, broiled squirrels were served up at
 table. In travelling along this day, I observed
 that the population of this part of the country
 consisted chiefly of black people; and, in many
 parts of the road, I noticed it was mostly tracked
 with the bare feet, some of which appeared to
 be immoderately large, arising, probably, from
 their almost constant practice of going barefoot.
 In many places I had an opportunity of seeing the
 farmers busily employed in treading out the grain
 in the open fields, with their horses. These were
 mounted with several negro boys, who continued
 riding round and round in a circle, in which the
 sheaves were spread. At the same time, a num
 ber of negro men were employed in casting off
 the straw, when the grain was trodden out, and
 replacing it with fresh sheaves. Sometimes I have
 seen ten or twelve horses go round in one circle;
 one negro boy having the care of two or three
 horses. 9th Month, 22d. In passing by the public
 grave-yard at Port-Tobacco, I observed on one
 of tile grave stones, the name of Gray inscribed,
 with the addition that he was a native of the parish
 of Sheffield. 9th Month, 22d. In travelling along the road,
 I was a little entertained with several parties of
 females riding to their places of worship; some
 of whom were escorted by a negro boy who rode
 behind one of the girls. On coming to a gate, or
 any other impediment, the negro jumps nimbly off
 the horse, and, after rendering the service required,
 as nimbly runs after his mistress and again resumes
 his seat, without any detention of the party. Yesterday I visited Colonel Ware , at his habi-
tation, by whom I was kindly treated. Many
 habitations in this part of the country are exceed-
 ingly private and retired; and the situations of
 some of them beautiful beyond description; but
 that cruel system of negro slavery, seems to hang
 like a dark cloud over all their pleasant scenes. In
 the afternoon of this day, I returned to Alexandria,
 and, in crossing the Potomack, was ferried over
 by two negro slaves, who gave me in account of
 two of their fellow slaves being drowned, in cross-
ing this ferry during the last winter, at a time
 when large quantities of ice were floating down the
 stream, which overset the boat. I believe, it some-
 times happens, that these poor creatures are very
 unnecessarily exposed to dangers, when they dare
 not remonstrate with their owners. Arriving at Alexandria in time, I attended their
 afternoon meeting, and dined with W. P. a valu-
able old customer; and afterwards supped and
 spent the evening with his partner J. B.
 a worthy Minister. 9th Month, 24th. I set out in the mail stage
 for Fredericksburg, where I spent the evening, and
 lodged at the house of a hospitable person of the
 name of J. C. who, though not a member of our
 society, has a regard for friends and their prin-
 ciples. In some conversation I had with him, he
 told me that he came over to America with his
 parents, in early life, from Ireland; and being soon
 left an orphan, had many difficulties and dis-
 couragements to surmount; but that he had been
 favoured to establish himself here. I found he
 was considered by his neighbours, as a man of re-
 spectability; and by many of them was supposed to
 be a member of our society. Although convinced
 of the truth of our principles, yet I believe he has
 never applied to be received as a member; and
 being at a considerably distance from any meeting
 of friends, and having but little of their society,
 except the transient call of such as may be travel-
 ling that way, it is probable he never may apply. 9th Month, 25th. I pursued my way to Rich-
 mond in the mail stage, through a beautiful coun-
 try, but clouded and debased by Negro slavery. At
 the house where I breakfasted, which is called the
 Bowling-green, I was told that the Owner had in his
 possession 200 slaves. In one field near the house,
 planted with tobacco, I counted nearly 20 women
 and children, employed in picking grubs from the
 plant. In the afternoon I passed by a field in
 which several poor slaves had lately been executed,
 on the charge of having an intention to rise against
 their masters. A lawyer who was present at their
 trials at Richmond, informed me that on one
 of them being asked, what he had to say to the
 court on his defence, he replied, in a manly tone of
 voice: I have nothing more to offer than what
 General Washington would have had to offer, had
 he been taken by the British and put to trial by
 them. I have adventured my life in endeavouring
 to obtain the liberty of my countrymen, and am a
 willing sacrifice in their cause and I beg, as a fa-
 vour, that I may be immediately led to execution.
 I know that you have pre-determined to shed my
 blood, why then all this mockery of a trial? In the evening I arrived at Richmond, the capi-
tal of Virginia. In one respect, this has a good
 deal the appearance of an English town, having a
 cloud of smoke hanging over it, occasioned by the
 use of pit-coal. They have great plenty of this
 article in the neighbourhood, a considerable quan-
 tity of which they ship to other parts of the United
 States. There is also a navigable canal for the
 conveyance of coal, on which a great deal of busi-
 ness is done, and the canal appears to be as well
 managed as those in England. 9th Month, 26th. Having business with C. A. of
 Gouchland, at a distance of about 30 miles on a
 cross road, I hired a horse and rode to his house
 in the course of the day. My road lying, part of
 the way, through extensive plantations cultivated
 by negro slaves, many of whom dwell in small
 clusters of huts at no great distance from their
 master's house, I had the curiosity to look into
 some of their little habitations; but all that I exa-
 mined were wretched in the extreme, and far
 inferior to many Indian cottages I have seen. In passing along I observed in some places that
 the land was very productive in tobacco, being
 a fine rich black mould. 9th Month, 27th. I slept at C. A's, and this
 morning set out for Fredericksburg, being ac-
 companied by his young man, our road lying
 through the woods great part of the way. At the
 place where we dined, we were waited on by two
 mullatto girls, whose only clothing appeared to
 be loose garments of cotton and woollen cloths,
 girt round the waist with a small cord. I had ob-
served that this was a common dress of the work-
 ing female Negroes in the fields; but, when engaged
 in business in the house it seemed hardly sufficient
 to cover them. In the yard, I observed a number
 of slaves engaged in the management of a still,
 employed in making spirits from cider. Here
 again I had the curiosity to look into some of the
 Negro huts, which like those I had before seen, pre-
 sented little else but dirt and rags. In travelling
 along, I saw several plantations of cotton, in some
 of which the negro children were gathering the wool.
 In the afternoon, as our road lay through the woods,
 I was surprised to meet a family party travelling
 along in as elegant a coach as is usually met with
 in the neighbourhood of London; and attended by
 several gaily dressed footmen: a sight not very
 common in the back woods of this country. The
 evening coming on, and no inn being near, we
 took up our quarters at the house of a planter of
 the name of Holiday, where we were well accom-
modated. 9th Month, 28th. We came to Fredericksburg
 and lodged at Fisher's Tavern. The next morning,
 I was waked early by the cries of a poor Negro,
 who was undergoing a severe correction, previously
 to his going to York. On taking a walk on the
 banks of the Rappahannock, the river on which
 this town is seated, I stepped into one of the large
 tobacco warehouses which are built here, for the
 reception and inspection of that plant, before it is
 permitted to be exported. On entering into con-
 versation with an inspector, as he was employed in
 looking over a parcel of tobacco, he lamented the
 licenciousness which he remarked so generally
 prevailed in this town. He said, that in his remem-
 brance, the principal part of the inhabitants were
 emigrants from Scotland, and that it was consi-
 dered so reproachful to the white inhabitants, if
 they were found to have an illicit connection with
 their female slaves, that their neighbours would
 shun the company of such, as of persons with
 whom it was a reproach to be acquainted. The
 case was now so much altered that, he believed,
 there were but few slave holders in the place who
 were free from guilt in this respect: and that it
 was now thought but little of. Such was the bru-
 tality and hardness of heart which this evil pro-
 duced, that some amongst them paid no more
 regard to selling their own children, by their
 female slaves, or even their brothers and sisters, in
 the same line, than they would do to the disposal
 of a cow or a horse, or any other property in the
 brute creation. To so low a degree of degrada-
 tion does the system of negro slavery sink the white
 inhabitants, who are unhappily engaged in it. 9th Month, 29th. Having paid my fare last
 night to go in the mail stage to Alexandria, I re-
paired to the --Tavern this morning, at the
 hour appointed by the landlord, who is also clerk
 to the stage; but the circumstance of my lodging
 at another inn, on account of the vermin with
 which I had been annoyed when I last slept at the
 --Tavern, had so displeased the man, that
 he had sent out the stage considerably before the
 usual time, in order that I might he disappointed
 of getting to Alexandria this day. As I stood at
 the door of the Tavern, remonstrating with the
 landlord on account of his mean and unkind con-
duct in treating me thus, J. C. rode up to us on
 an excellent horse of his own; and, as soon as he
 understood how the landlord had behaved to me,
 he immediately dismounted and insisted upon my
 pursuing my journey upon his horse. I accord-
 ingly accepted his generous offer, but, before I
 set out, I complained to the post-maste, who re-
 turned the money I had paid at the Tavern, and,
 at the same time declared, that if ever he again
 detected the landlord in the like base conduct to
 any traveller, he would remove the mail stage
 to another inn. The circumstance of pursuing my
 journey on horseback, afforded me an opportunity
 of visiting Mount Vernon, the habitation of the
 late General Washington; and I was shown through
 the house by a person who had the care of it.
 The situation is beautiful, being a rising ground,
 commanding a fine prospect of the river Potow-
 mack and the surrounding country. In the even-
 ing, I arrived safe at Gadby's Tavern in Alexan-
 dria, having enjoyed, on horseback, a much more
 pleasant ride, than I should have had in the stage.
 Thus it sometimes happens that our enjoyments
 arise out of disappointments. 9th Month, 30th. A respectable person at the
 inn being about to return towards Fredericksburg,
 afforded an opportunity of sending back J. C.'s
 horse, and I accordingly availed myself of it. I
 supped and spent this evening at E. S.'s, a valuable
 medical friend in this city. 10th Month, 1st and 2d, were spent at Alexandria
 in commercial engagements. The next day I took
 my passage in the packet for George Town, and
 had a pleasant sail up the Potowmack; having a
 fine view of Washington City, particularly of the
 capitol and of the President's house; which are in
 sight all the way from Alexandria. In the evening
 I came to George Town, and staid at an inn, in
 company with a Messenger who had just arrived
 from Spain, with dispatches for the American
 Government; and, he being an agreeable intelli-
 gent person, the time I was with him was spent
 satisfactorily. 10th Month, 4th. I set out for Baltimore, in
 company with Thomas Washington , a relation of
 the General of that name. With this person I
 had some acquaintance, having met with him be-
 fore. In travelling along, he gave me a little
 account of a visit he paid to Paris, at the time of
 the Revolution. Amongst other things, he men-
 tioned to me the extreme indifference with which
 many poor men paid the forfeit of their lives,
 during that awful period. At one time he accom-
panied the American Ambassador, to a place whence
 he had a near view of a number of these victims, as
 they were about to be executed; and where he was
 so near that he could hear their conversation; which
 was as light and frivolous as of men engaged in
 the common or ordinary concerns of life. One of
 them remarked to his companion, that he would
 take care that he would have nothing to do with
 Revolutions in the next world, seeing he had met
 with so poor a reward in this. Several of our companions in the stage were
 French people, and amongst them a Catholic
 priest. There was something singular in this
 man's conduct and conversation. Sometimes he
 appeared very devoutly reading a book of devo-
tion; and, in a moment, he would shut up his book
 and begin singing with the greatest gaity, and
 talking nonsense to his female companions. In
 the afternoon I arrived at Baltimore, and took up
 my quarters at J. T.'s. 10th Month, 5th. A vessel being about to sail
 for England from this port, I employed the day
 in writing to my family and friends there; and, in
 the evening, I supped with old friend G. M. 10th Month, 5th. This day I was engaged in at-
tending to my concerns in Baltimore; and the next
 being the 1st of the week, I attended the meeting in
 that city, and supped and spent the evening with
 J. M. an old customer, who having acquired a large
 property in trade, has now retired from business.
 I was informed that his eldest son had addressed
 Wm. Patterson 's daughter, in order to marriage;
 but having Jerome Bonaparte for a rival, had met
 with a disappointment; she having given the pre-
 ference to the Frenchman, to whom she is now
 married. I had an opportunity of seeing Jerome
 and his bride, and could perceive in his counte-
 nance and person, a great resemblance to the
 portraits we see of the French Emperor. 10th Month, 8th, was employed in writing to
 my friends in England; and, an opportunity offer-
 ing, I forwarded several letters and papers to them. 10th Month, 9th. I left Baltimore. The road
 in some parts lying through the woods, and the
 wind being very high, we found some difficulty in
 getting along, on account of a great number of
 large trees which were blown down and laid across
 the road. However we got safe to Havre-de-
 Grace; but the wind continuing high, it was
 thought unsafe to send the mail across the Sus-
 quehanna, which is here upwards of a mile over;
 so we concluded to lodge here, and see what the
 morning might produce. As we were a mixed
 company in the stage, the conversation turned on
 various subjects; and the poor Negro slaves being
 frequently in sight, as we passed along, they be-
 came one of course. I observed one passenger to
 be a warm advocate for the slave trade; and he,
 in very strong terms, condemned the conduct of
 friends who were active in the cause of the Negroes.
 Amongst other things, he remarked that there was
 a tailor in Philadelphia, a Quaker, of the name
 of -- --, whose work-board being at a front
 window, he had an opportunity of noticing the pas-
 sengers in the street; and that whenever he saw a
 Negro whom he judged to be a runaway slave, he
 would, in a moment, jump from his work-board
 and run into the street. If he found the Negro to
 be really a runaway, he would take him under his
 protection, and send him to some settlement in the
 back parts of Pennsylvania, where he would be
 sure to find employment; and thus he went on
 from day to day, in what the slave merchant
 considered no better than highway robbery. The
 man who was making these observations, I found
 had been in that trade; and that T. H. was the friend
 who had with much propriety been a father to
 the oppressed Negroes. 10th Month, 10th. The winds having some-
 what abated, we ventured to cross the Susque-
 hanna; but it being the time of low water, and the
 force of the winds having driven down the water
 very considerably the boats could not approach the
 firm land by more than 100 yards, and we had to
 mount upon the backs of the boatmen, who car-
 ried us through the mud; but with considerable
 difficulty, and not without now and then letting us
 down in the mire. On getting fairly over, I found
 a number of friends by the river side, on their way
 to Baltimore yearly meeting; and amongst them
 M. W. formerly of Sheffield. In the course of
 the afternoon I passed by A. A. near the Head of
 Elk. In the evening I came to Newport, where
 I slept, having had the company of J. Pleasants , of
 Philadelphia. 10th Month, 11th. I came to Wilmington, and
 was kindly entertained at S. S.'s and J. G.'s; the
 former of whom accompanied me to the Brandy
 Wine River Mills. These mills are mostly in the
 hands of friends; and although not the most ex-
 tensive, are in the construction and situation perhaps
 equal to any. They are eight in number, and each
 grind upon an average, per day, about three tons
 and a half of flour, and about ten tons of Indian
 meal; going through all the processes of grind-
 ing, dressing, packing, &c. They are so situated,
 that vessels receive and discharge their cargoes
 alongside the mills. The neighbourhood of these
 mills is romantic and beautiful, and is one amongst
 the many pleasand spots I have seen in this coun-
 try. Indeed the town of Wilmington has every
 advantage; its situation being on a rising ground,
 and its streets, intersecting each other at right
 angles. 10th Month, 12th, was spent pleasantly at
 Wilmington, in the families of J. G. and S. S.
 In this place, as is many towns in this coun-
 try, I observed that a considerable proportion of
 the inhabitants were friends, and what to an
 Englishman had something remarkable in it, I
 noticed that the females at the inn, where I took
 my place in the stage, appeared like plain consist-
 ent friends, and indeed they were such, for ought
 I know to the contrary. 10th Month, 13th. I took my departure for Phila-
delphia, the road being through a pleasant country,
 diversified with hill and dale, and commanding a fine
 prospect of the Delaware and the opposite Jersey
 shore, nearly all the way. In passing by some
 farms near Wilmington, I was struck with the sight
 of several fields of Indian corn, the crops on which
 were finer than any I had ever before seen. On
 inquiry, I found they belonged to an innkeeper, who
 had manured them well. From various observa-
 tions I have made, I have no doubt that the land
 in this country, generally speaking, would, when
 plentifully manured, yield much greater crops than
 can commonly be obtained in England; chiefly
 owing to their summer, or season of vegetation
 continuing a greater length of time than with us.
 In the evening I arrived at Philadelphia. 10th Month, 14th. This being the first day of
 the week, I attended meeting; and, in the after-
noon was at the burial of S. E. who had been a
 friend and customer of mine some years. The uncer-
 tainty of life, and the fluctuating state of things in
 the world, were seldom more fully exemplified than
 in the case of this young man. Few men have pur-
 sued business with more reputation and success
 than he had done; so that, in a few years, he had
 honourably acquired a very large property; and,
 only a very few weeks before, was united to an ami-
able young woman, to whom he had for some time
 been sincerely attached. At this moment, when
 everything on earth seemed to smile around him,
 and there was every prospect of many years of
 happiness, a blight was brought over all, in an
 unexpected and awful way. He was suddenly
 deprived of reason, and, after a few weeks con-
finement, departed this life, leaving a mournful,
 although instructive lesson of the mutability of all
 earthly enjoyments. Having received an invitation
 from my countryman T. S. I supped and spent the
 evening at his house. 10th Month, 15th and 16th, I was employed in
 business; and having an opportunity, by a vessel
 which was ready for sailing, I wrote to my family.
 The next day I spent an hour or two in Doctor
 R.'s family. The Doctor, although advanced in
 years, is still very active in business; and his wife,
 who is an elderly woman, continues to be very
 active in her family. I found them amidst a nu-
merous group of promising children; some of
 whom are arrived at years of maturity. The con-
versation I had with the Doctor was interesting,
 he having been intimately acquainted with many
 of the leading characters in the Revolution, par-
ticularly with General Washington, and the Presi-
 dent, T. Jefferson . As Doctor R. had constantly
 been a warm advocate for the abolition of Negro
 slavery, he sometimes endeavoured to introduce
 the subject in conversation with the General; but
 always found him extremely backward at saying
 any thing on these occasions, as if conscious of the
 cruelty of the practice, although he was deeply in-
volved in it. Though a man of great character
 and talents in many respects, yet the detention of
 his Negro slaves in bondage during his life, will
 always be a shade to his virtues. Yet it is but
 justice to notice that, by will, he provided for the
 liberation of his slaves, who in course became free-
men at his death. Chapter IV.
 Occurrences, &c. in Philadelphia, during a stay of several
 Months. I staid in Philadelphia for some months longer;
 but my engagements being of a commercial nature,
 this period furnishes but little matter that would
 be interesting to the reader. I shall therefore pass
 along with extracting some few observations. 10th Month, 30th, 1804. I attended the North
 Division meeting. In the evening, being on a
 visit at J. P. 's, I notices a grave looking ancient
 friend, whose speech and apparel corresponded,
 excepting that the fingers of both hands were
 adorned with rings, which I supposed to be gold.
 On inquiring the cause, I was informed that the
 friend was an approved Minister, notwithstanding
 her fingers were so ornamented; that rings were
 commonly worn, by some, as a remedy for the
 rheumatism, and that this friend wore them on that
 account; but those she had on were only brass. 11th Month, 2d. I supped and spent the even-
 ing at S. S.'s, where a sister of John Pemberton's
 widow was present. She informed me, that her
 father was frequently in the practice of entertain-
ing different parties of Indians, who came to Phi-
ladelphia on public business; and that having once
 invited a number of chiefs, who were then in the
 city, to breakfast, they came to the house rather
 earlier than the servants expected, accompanied by
 their interpreter. However they were introduced
 into the breakfast room, where a servant was en-
gaged in brightening up some of the brass work
 about the fire-place, and were desired to sit down
 until her master made his appearance. They had
 not sat long, before one of the Indians made an
 observation in his own language, which the inter-
preter was desired to put into English; but this he
 objected to, alledging that what the Indian had
 said was a matter of indifference, and not worth
 repeating. On being closely pressed to keep back
 nothing the Indians might say, as every thing from
 them would be interesting, he complied, and said
 that the remark which the Indian made was this:
 Look, said he to his fellow Indians, at that ser-
vant, how she labours at those andirons. I dare say,
 if we had come yesterday, we should have found her
 at the same employment; and if we come to-
 morrow morning it is ten to one but we shall still
 find her at the same work. How foolish these
 white people are! thus to labour and toil about
 things which can answer no good purpose; cer-
tainly these white people must be fools! Thus
 the Indians judge the civilized part of the world;
 and what is called the civilized world, is not behind
 in judging the Indians; so apt are we to judge
 one another. 11th Month, 15th. In conversation with a friend
 of the name of R. W. he informed me that, in the
 early part of his life, he was on the island of the
 Havanna, where he had some considerable business
 to transact; but being ignorant of the Spanish
 language, an Irish Roman Catholic Priest kindly
 lent him his assistance on various occasions; and,
 so effectually, that the Priest was the means of his
 acquiring a large property, during a short stay
 there. At the time of parting with this friendly
 Priest, he presented him with a purse of one
 thousand dollars, as a small compensation for the
 assistance he had received; but the truly Catholic
 Priest declared, that he would not accept of any
 compensation of this sort; adding, All I ask of
 you, in return for any service I may have rendered
 you, is, that if, at and future period, you happen to
 meet a countryman of mine in need of assistance,
 you would do to him as I have done to you.
 This affords one amongst many proofs, that the
 truly Christian spirit is not confined to any pro-
 fession of religion. 3d of 12th Month. After attending the North
 Division meeting, I called at the widow --,
 where I saw the body of a young man from Sheffield,
 who was found dead in his bed that morning. I was
 conducted into the room by another person from
 Sheffield. From the appearance of the deceased,
 it seemed that he had departed without the least
 struggle. He went to bed in usual health. How
 uncertain is the tenure of human life! On the 1st of 1st Month, 1805, I attended the
 burial of the above-mentioned young man, in
 company with several of my countrymen; amongst
 whom was Phineas Bond , the British Consul.
 The Bishop of Pennsylvania performed what is
 called the burial service, after the manner of the
 Church of England. 1st Month, 4th. This day was remarkably cold,
 far beyond any thing I had ever experienced in
 England. The thermometer being down as low
 as 12, about 20 degrees below the freezing point.
 The river Delaware, which is more than a mile
 over, and which has a strong current, was quickly
 frozen over to that degree, that horses and car-
 riages, heavily laden, were seen traversing from
 one side to the other in great numbers; chiefly
 with fire wood from the Jersey shore. Exclusive
 of these, parties of pleasure were seen driving along
 in sledges or sleighs upon the ice. These kinds of
 carriages are made in various fantastic forms resting
 upon sliders shod with iron or steel. 1st Month, 6th. In company with T. W. I
 crossed the Delaware upon the ice. The tide flows
 to the height of about 6 feet in this river, and in
 it are some sand banks which are seen at low
 water. These circumstances produce a very singu-
lar and romantic appearance, by the large sheets of
 ice being obstructed and accumulated in various
 parts of the river, having the resemblance of large
 blocks of white marble piled on heaps. There
 being a constant intercourse between the two
 shores of the Delaware, it is curious to observe
 the various means which the owners of the ferry
 boats use, to counteract the effects of the frost, on
 its first setting in, so as to preserve the commu-
nication open. On these occasions they make use
 of a boat that has two sliders, one on each side
 the keel, shod with iron; and, as the shallow parts
 of the river are first frozen, they sail as usual over
 the deep parts, and on coming to those which
 are frozen, they drag the boat out of the water,
 and push it along the ice, until they come to the
 deep places, when the boat is again plunged
 into the water. Thus they go on till they reach
 the opposite shore; and as it will, in course,
 sometimes happen, in the early part of the frost,
 that between the ice and the shallow water, the
 ice is not sufficiently strong to support the boat;
 in this case it is common for one of the ferrymen
 to sit at the head of the boat, with his feet hanging
 out, loaded with a pair of heavy iron bound shoes,
 and, with a long pole in his hands. With these
 he labours with all his might, to break the ice, and
 make way for the boat. 1st Month, 7th, I supped and spent the even-
 ing at B. J.'s, in whose service is a young French-
man, a son of one of those friends who reside at
 times or in that neighbourhood; and I believe he
 conducts himself agreeably in the family. I have
 noticed a number of friends in Philadelphia, who
 have come from various parts of the continent of
 Europe. They appear thankful for the encourage-
ment and protection they meet with in this favoured
 land; and some of them having felt the heavy
 hand of oppression in their native country, know
 better how to estimate the value of the privileges
 which they here enjoy. 1st Month, 8th. I spent this afternoon at
 J. D.'s, a friend who, some years past, came from
 the neighbourhood of Darlington, with his wife
 and family. There is something so remarkable in
 the circumstances of his leaving England, that I am
 tempted to give them as related from his own mouth.
 He being a merchant of great respectability and
 liberality, who by industry has realized a large pro-
perty, I believe they may be relied on. For some
 time before he left England, his thoughts had been
 turned towards Pennsylvania; but before he had
 come to any fixed resolution, he dreamed that he
 had met with a friend, from that country, who was
 able to give him every necessary information on
 the subject. A short time after this dream he
 came accidentally to Darlington, where he saw a
 person in the street, who exactly resembled the
 friend he had seen in his dream. He accordingly
 applied to him, and found the individual he was
 speaking to, was John Pemberton , of Philadelphia,
 who was at that time on a religious visit to Great
 Britain. Having received what information he
 thought necessary, he made arrangements for his
 voyage to America, and, with his wife and children,
 took a final leave of England. 1st Month, 9th. I drink tea and spent the even-
 ing with R. J. at her comfortable habitation. It
 was pleasant to see how cheerful and lively this
 valuable friend is preserved in old age. On notic-
ing the coldness of the weather she observed that
 it was the most inclement season she had witnessed
 for 40 years. Considering how green and lively
 her faculties are preserved in the winter of her age,
 it is not surprising that she maintains the esteem
 and affection of her friends and neighbours. 1st Month, 14th. I dined at J. W.'s. in com-
 pany with Doctor Fothergill of Bath , who had
 lately come over to America, on account of his
 health. At J. W.'s hospitable table, we were
 treated with wild venison, which had been sent
 to him from among the Indians. Another of the
 company was a partner in a house at Antwerp.
 I was sometimes ready to think that Philadelphia
 might be considered as a kind of central depot, in
 which is found people of every nation on the
 earth; and where all appear to unite cordially, as
 in one common family. Such are the beneficial
 effects of a free and liberal policy, the seeds of
 which were sown by that enlightened patriot Wil-
liam Penn. 1st Month, 20th. The frost still continuing very
 intense, the use of wheel carriages was in a great
 measure discontinued: even the stage coaches
 being placed on sliders. Carriages fitted up in
 this way, glide along with such silent celerity, that
 the laws require the horses should have small bells
 fitted to their harness, that passengers in the streets
 may have notice of their approach; otherwise they
 would be liable to many accidents. On level
 ground, or in the most trifling descents, there is so
 little friction upon the sliders, that I have often
 noticed the traces to be quite slack for a consider-
 able time, when they have been driving along with
 great swiftness; the pressure on the reins being suffi-
 cient to keep the carriage in motion. The noise of
 carriage wheels, which is, in general, very consider-
 able, especially in the principal streets; is now
 supplanted by the tinkling of bells on every hand. 1st Month, 21st, to 1st Month, 31st. The frost
 still continuing very severe, I made frequent ex-
cursions upon the ice of the Delaware, where a
 great many ships lay bound fast by the frost. One
 very large vessel, I noticed, called the Connecti-
cut, which had now been fast near one month,
 with her whole complement of hands on board;
 being nearly one hundred in number. This ship
 was intended for a Voyage to Domingo, and was
 completely armed as a regular vessel of war. As
 most of the men had received part of their wages
 in advance, and the owners were fearful they might
 take advantage of the ship being thus detained
 and leave her, they had fixed a strong net work
 all round her, reaching from the beam, nearly as
 high as the yards. The crew being thus inclosed,
 had the appearance of a flock of birds in a cage.
 This kind of net work is sometimes made use of
 in time of action to prevent being boarded by the
 enemy. The Negroes in the island of Domingo, having
 thrown off the French yoke and set up an Em-
peror of their own colour, the French Government
 had, in consequence declared them rebels; and,
 having prohibited all intercourse with them, this
 circumstance occasioned the Americans to arm
 their ships which traded to that island. About
 this time James Pemberton sent a number of
 friend's books to the Black Emperor, as a pre-
sent, accompanied with a letter; to which James
 received a reply and acknowledgement, written in
 a very singular style; the substance of the reply was,
 as I understood it, that he was obliged to him for the
 books; but that he was determined to be Emperor
 of Haiti, (the Indian name for Domingo,) in de-
fiance of both the French and the Quakers. Not-
withstanding this determination, he has since been
 cut off by his enemies. This day I attended Market-street Meeting, and
 afterwards dined with A. A. and M. R. and
 spent a great part of the afternoon with them very
 pleasantly. 2d Month, 1st. This day I dined at J. D.'s, in
 company with J. F. one of the persons who ac-
 companied me on my voyage from England. The
 extreme severity of the weather had brought down
 several kinds of water fowls from the northern
 parts of this continent, which were quite unknown
 to the naturalists in this country. J. F. shewed
 one one of them which he had purchased, and
 which appeared to be a species of duck; but was
 much larger, and of a more beautiful plumage
 than the common kind. 2d Month, 4th. I attended the quarterly meeting
 in this city, in which a testimony on account
 of W. Savery , was produced and read, expressive of
 the high estimation in which he was held by friends
 here. 2th Month, 14th. Being invited, I attended the
 marriage of J. W. and A. A. of Philadelphia,
 where I met with with countrywoman A. A. and
 her companion M. R; and also T. S. formerly of
 Kendal, who is now married and well settled in
 this city. 2d Month, 21st. I still continued in Philadel-
phia; and this afternoon was pleasantly spent at
 S. S.'s. The next day I attended the Middle
 Monthly Meeting, where I was gratified with the
 sight of a young man presenting an acknowledge-
ment to friends, on account of having taken up
 arms; for which he had been disowned. During
 the time of his separation, he had married an
 amiable young woman, who was convinced of the
 truth of friends' principles, and joined the society.
 The impression made upon the meeting, on his
 presenting an acknowledgement, was such, that
 he was reinstated in the society before the meeting
 separated. Being invited by J. E. I supped and spent the
 evening at his house. A person as also in
 company with us, who had made himself re-
 markable, in being a principal leader and minis-
ter among those seceders, who give themselves
 the name of Free Quakers; and who, during the war
 with England, gave friends a great deal of trouble.
 The ground of their offence against friends, was,
 chiefly, the operation of the rules of discipline, in a
 variety of cases, that arose out of circumstances
 of attending the revolution; particularly with respect
 to taking up arms in defence of the country; and
 things of that nature. This person appears to be
 a man of good abilities, but of strong passions;
 and he is considered as the main support of his
 society; which is now reduced to a very small
 number, and will most likely become extinct on
 his removal. 2d Month, 24th. In company with T. S. his
 wife, and several other friends, I drank tea and
 spent the evening with J. W. and his bride. The
 company consisted mostly of natives of England,
 and on this account the visit was peculiarly grati-
fying to me in a foreign land. 3d Month, 1st. This afternoon at B. J.'s, one
 of our company was a young woman who was
 there on a visit. Her usual residence was in one
 of the new settlements, on the banks of the Ohio,
 about 500 miles from Philadelphia. She informed
 us that many families on the banks of this great
 river, are supplied with shop goods from vessels
 which navigate it, and are fitted up with counters,
 shelves, and drawers, in the same manner as are
 shops on land, and well stored with all kinds of
 goods. As they sail along the river, on coming near
 a plantation, they blow a horn or conch shell, to
 give notice of their arrival; then the planters, with
 their wives and daughters, repair to these floating
 shops, and select such things as they are in want
 of; and make payment in the produce of their
 plantations; such as grain, flour, cotton, tobacco,
 dried venison, the skins of wild animals, &c. &c.
 The shopkeeper having disposed of his goods in
 this way, returns home with the produce he has
 collected, and again renews his stock, and pro-
 ceeds on another voyage. The young woman re-
marked, that four or five of these floating shops
 have passed by her father's house, in the course of
 a day. She likewise informed us, such was the primitive
 simplicity in which they lived, that it was a very
 unusual thing to have locks on their doors; and
 that when more strangers called upon them, than
 they had beds to accommodate them with, it was
 customary for the family to spread temporary
 beds upon the floor, on which they passed the
 night, leaving their own to the strangers. Yet,
 notwithstanding the homely fare of some of the
 back settlers, luxury is making rapid strides amongst
 them; so that many of the most costly manufactures
 of Europe and Asia, begin to find a ready sale in
 some of their infant towns and cities; and several
 extensive manufactories are already established at
 Pittsburgh and in the neighbourhood; where
 coals are cheaper and more plentiful than in Eng-
 land. In some places the mountain side presents
 a front of coal, as our rocks of stone in England. 3d Month, 2d, 3d, and 4th, were spent in Phi-
ladelphia. The 2d I drank tea and spent a plea-
 sant evening at my kind friend T. S.'s, formerly of
 Kendal. On the 3d I attended the North Division
 Meeting, and was afterwards kindly entertained by
 J. W.'s family, in which I spent an agreeable even-
ing in company with A. A. and R. J.; and on the
 4th spent part of the day at my friend T. S.'s, in
 company with A. A. and her companion M. R. 3d Month, 10th. I went over to Germantown,
 attended their meeting, and returned to Philadel-
phia in the evening. At Germantown, I perceived
 that many of the friends were descendants of
 German parents; and I should suppose that most
 of the towns people are of German extraction.
 I observed here a number of stocking makers, who
 manufacture an excellent and substantial article. 3d Month, 11th. I dined at the house of a
 friend, a native of Bermudas. In the course of
 conversation he informed me, that his business
 having led him to St. Eustatia, he was there at the
 time that island was captured by Admiral Rodney;
 and was witness to many transactions consequent
 on the capture of such an island; which, like
 every other effect of war, produced great distress
 and misery to the inhabitants. 3d Month, 22d. After about three months con-
 tinuance the frost broke up, which was such as had
 not been felt for the last 40 years, and during which
 even the largest rivers were so frozen, that
 heavy carriages passed offer them daily, as on dry
 land. At one time I had the curiosity to measure
 the ice on the river Delaware, and found it was 22
 inches in thickness. Now the wind having shifted
 to the southward, the snow and ice were fast dis-
appearing; and, on taking a ride towards Glouces-
ter Point, it was curious to hear the loud croaking
 and whistling, that proceeded from the Lizards
 and frogs in every pool of water I passed by. 4th Month, 5th. During my stay in Philadelphia,
 I often experienced the generous hospitality of my
 friends in that city, in very frequent invitations
 to one or other of their houses. In the recollec-
tion of their kindness the feelings of gratitude
 often arise in my breast. Chapter V.
 Burlington--Allentown--New-York--Bristol--Philadelphia--Yearly Meeting there. On the 6th of the 4th Month, I left Philadelphia
 on my way to New-York, and, after a pleasant
 sail of three hours, arrived safe at Burlington.
 Among the passengers in the packet, was a British
 sailor on his way to England, being summoned as
 an evidence between the owners and
 underwriters of a slave ship. He told me, that
 he was the only survivor out of 380 persons; 350
 of which were slaves. We read that a sparrow does not fall to the
 ground without the notice of our heavenly Father.
 How great then must be the responsibility of the
 owners of one of these slave ships, who, in the
 wantonness of power, or the gratification of a base
 and sordid disposition, thus exposes the lives of
 his fellow-creatures to every species of suffering,
 and very frequently, as in the above case, to a
 premature death! I recollect once being in conversation with a
 person concerned in the traffic, and who was dis-
posed to defend it; at length being hard pressed,
 he gave up the point, in a good deal of warmth,
 with this remarkable declaration:-Why, Sir,
 you can't suppose that the Almighty looks so
 narrowly into our actions as you do!-Thus we
 see that the great adversary deceives his victims into
 a belief, that their actions are not seen by the Om-
 niscient Eye. I spent the evening and slept under
 G. D. 's hospitable roof. 4th Month, 7th. I attended Burlington Meet-
 ing; and in the afternoon set out in the stage for
 Allentown. My companion in the stage was a
 young man lately returned from St. Domingo. He
 had resided several years there, and had been wit-
ness to many atrocious cruelties which had been
 perpetrated on that island, both by the white and
 black people; and which are too shocking to re-
late. In making a comparison between the whites
 and blacks, as to the faculties of the mind, he
 declared that he could perceive no difference,
 where the advantages of education had been equal. 4th Month, 8th. I lodged last night at Al-
lentown, and came this day to Amboy; and, after
 dinner, went on board the packet for New-York,
 where I arrived safe this evening. I have often
 admired the prospects around Amboy, as well as
 those from the Sea, throughout the whole passage
 to New-York, particularly in passing Staten and
 Long Islands, and when the eye catches a first view
 of that city. The whole is indeed extremely beau-
tiful, but not easily described. 4th Month, 12th. Since my arrival in New-
 York, I have been engaged principally with busi-
ness. On the 11th I accompanied several of my
 countrymen on board the Laura, on their way to
 England, and was ready to murmur that I was not
 to continue one of the party. Whilst I stood upon
 the battery, watching the ship as she made her way
 towards the narrows, the weather being fine and
 clear, somewhat like one of our finest summer
 days, I thought that I had scarcely ever beheld a
 prospect more delightful. This afternoon, the 12th, I took my passage in
 the packet, and came again to Amboy in the even-
ing, where I lodged; and, on the 13th, I came to
 Bristol. On the 14th, being first day, I attended
 the meeting at this place. I have often had to notice the hospitality of
 friends in this part of the world. Here again I
 witnessed it, in the generous attention of a friend
 of this place, who kindly invited me to his house;
 where I dined. This friend I found was a relation
 to the Wilson's of Kendal. After spending an
 hour or two satisfactorily in his family, I went on
 board the packet for Philadelphia, accompanied
 by several friends from this neighbourhood, who
 were on their way to the yearly meeting about to
 be held in that city. The weather being warm
 and fine, and having a clear moonlight evening,
 we had an agreeable sail down the Delaware; the
 pleasure of which was heightened, by the unre-
served conversation of a number of sensible friends
 on board the packet. After landing near the spot
 where William Penn held his treaty with the In-
dians, I made the best of my way to my old quar-
ters in Arch-street, where I lodged this night. 4th Month, 15th, 1805. I attended the first
 sitting of the yearly meeting in Philadelphia. This
 yearly meeting comprises the following quarterly
 meetings, (viz.) Philadelphia, Abbington, Bucks
 Concord, Caln, Western, Southern, Bur-
 lington, Haddenfield, Salem, and Shrewsbury.
 The first sitting was chiefly occupied in calling
 over the representatives, reading several certifi-
 cates of public friends present, from distant
 yearly meetings, and in answering the five first
 queries. In the afternoon the remaining queries were
 answered. 4th Month, 16th. At the third sitting a number
 of epistles were received from different yearly
 meetings on this continent, as well as one from
 that held in London. Six thousand copies of the
 latter were ordered to be printed, for distribution
 within the district of this yearly meeting. Last evening I attended a committee of the
 yearly meeting, appointed for the revisal of the
 discipline. In the afternoon, I attended the fourth sitting;
 the early part of which was employed in reading
 several certificates of public friends present. Some
 committees were appointed; and a report
 from the committee on the revision of the disci-
pline, was read and agreed to. 4th Month, 17th. In the morning, I attended
 the fifth sitting, when the consideration on the
 state of society, as it appeared from the answers
 to the queries, as entered into. The minutes of
 the meeting for sufferings were also read; and an
 epistle to the yearly meeting in London was read
 and agreed to. In the afternoon was the sixth sitting, when a
 report of the state of Westown School was read.
 Afterwards a discussion took place on the subject
 of report of the Committee on Indian affairs
 being read in the meeting; but it ended without
 any decision of the question at that time. A testi-
mony respecting Wm. Savery was read, and also
 one on account of another deceased friend, which
 concluded the meeting agreeably. 4th Month, 18th. Meetings for worship being
 held at the three different meeting-houses in this
 city, I attended that in Pine-street, and afterwards,
 being kindly invited, I dined at N. W.'s, in com-
pany with a large number of friends, from different
 parts of the continent. In the afternoon, I attended the seventh sitting
 cf the yearly meeting, when it was almost imme-
diately agreed, that the report from the committee
 on Indian affairs should be read; and it turned out
 very interesting and satisfactory to the meeting at
 large. After this sitting, I drank tea and spent a
 pleasant evening at W. A.'s, in company with
 J. S. a worthy minister, and a broom-maker; a
 humble occupation, like that of the apostles of old. 4th Month, 19th. I attended the eighth sitting,
 when the minutes of the last yearly meeting were
 read; also the report of the committee on the revi-
sion of the discipline. In consequence of this
 report, it was agreed that any friend paying money
 in lieu of personal service in war, even though the
 money thus paid should be applied to the uses of
 the parochial poor, would infringe upon our testi-
mony against that dreadful evil. In the afternoon, I attended the ninth sitting,
 which was mostly occupied about money concerns;
 when it appeared that the national stock had a
 balance in hand. In the evening I attended the
 Westown School Committee 4th Month, 20th. I attended the tenth and last
 sitting of the yearly meeting. The epistles to
 several yearly meetings were read and agreed to;
 afterwards several female friends were introduced
 from the women's meeting. After a short pause,
 one of them addressed herself to the meeting; but
 more particularly to those employed in husbandry,
 who composed a large part of the body then pres-
ent. In lively and animated language she re-
marked to them, that the nature of their employ-
ment afforded, in a peculiar manner, an opportu-
 nity of observing the wonderful works of the
 creation; but, at the same time, she expressed a
 fear that some of them did not sufficiently, in
 these things, regard the Almighty and Beneficent
 Author of every mercy. In the recollection
 thereof, the words of a pious author recurred
 to her memory, which were descriptive of a mind
 truly alive to tile feelings of gratitude and adora-
tion to the Great First Cause of all things; and
 are as follows:- He looks abroad into the varied field
 Of Nature, and th' poor, perhaps, compared
 With those whose mansions glitter in his sight,
 Calls the delightful scenery all how own.
 His are the mountains, and the vallies his;
 And these resplendent rivers. His t' enjoy
 With a propriety that none can feel,
 But who, with filial confidence inspir'd,
 Can smiling say, 'my father made them all!'
 Are they not his by a peculiar right,
 And by an emphasis of interest his,
 Whose eye they fill with tears of holy joy,
 Whose heart with praise, and whose exalted mind,
 With worthy thoughts of unwearied love
 Which plann'd, and built, and still upholds a world,
 So cloth'd with beauty, for rebellious man? During the time of expressing the above lines,
 an unusual solemnity prevailed; and although a
 very large number of friends were present, which
 might amount to two thousand, yet not the least
 discordant sound was heard. A few the women
 friends had withdrawn, some discussion took place
 relative to the slave trade, in which it was lamented
 that the endeavours of friends and others, had not
 produced the desired effect; but, that it was still
 carried on with rather increasing avidity. Under
 these considerations, friends were called upon in
 the most impressive terms, to remember the
 oppressed Africans, in their supplications at
 the Throne of Mercy; and, under the weight thereof,
 the yearly meeting concluded to general satis-
faction. Chapter VI.
 Philadelphia, &c.--Trenton--New-York--Burlington--
 Philadelphia--Newcastle--Baltimore--Washington--
 Richmond--Alexandria--Contrast between Pennsylva-
nia and the States cultivated by Slaves. I remained at Philadelphia, or in its vicinity,
 for some weeks after the yearly meeting; and
 the 13th of 5th Month, 1805, was spent at
 my relation's W. B. Our time passed on
 very agreeably in traversing his plantation, or
 farm, on the Banks of the Schuylkill and
 Perkioming. The more I see of it, the more I
 am convinced that it is one of the most beautiful
 and healthful situations I have known, either in
 America or in England. The ground rising till it
 becomes elevated high above the banks of the
 rivers, commands a prospect as delightful as can
 well be conceived. A view of some of our No-
blemen Parks, on the more extensive scale, may
 give a faint idea of the prospect here seen; for
 even with such it is comparing small things with
 great ones or putting art in comparison with
 nature. As far as the eye can command, one wide
 spreading Forest is seen, interspersed with planta-
 tions or farms, and sheets of water; which have
 a little the appearance of lawns and fish-
ponds, such as are seen about the ancient seats of
 our nobility; but upon a scale exceeding all com-
parison. 5th Month, 14th to the 16th. I continued at
 my relations; and, in one of our walks along the
 margins of the Schuylkill, I observed a neat little
 cottage, inhabited by a black family, to which
 the former owner of the plantation had given their
 freedom, with this cottage and a few acres of land.
 This little domain was managed with great econo-
 my, and afforded them a comfortable and inde-
pendent livelihood. We picked up several land
 tortoises, a species of animal which abounds in
 these meadows. Here is also a great abundance
 of that kind of tortoise, called the snapping turtle,
 which makes very good soup; and, as far as I am
 able to judge, nearly equal to, that made from the
 sea turtle. The snapping turtles are voracious
 animals, destructive to young ducks and goslings,
 layering hold of them by the legs and dragging them
 under water to devour them. 5th Month, 17th. My relation kindly brought
 me to Philadelphia in his coach, and remained with
 me at our lodgings until next day; after which I
 spent about a week in the company of my friends
 in Philadelphia. 5th Month, 24th. I put 10 hogsheads of to-
 bacco on board the Rose, Captain Hathaway , for
 which I paid fourpence halfpenny per pound. The
 Captain offering to take with him any little matter
 I was inclined to put under his care, I transmitted
 a packet of letters, and several little articles for
 my family; and with them eight land tortoises,
 which all got safely to England. In the same vessel
 M. R. took her passage home, in company with
 an English family, and a young man from Lan-
caster, in Pennsylvania. They were favoured to
 arrive safe at Liverpool; but this poor young
 man, taking his passage in the Ontario, on his in-
tended return to America, was lost at sea; the ship
 having never been heard of after she left Liverpool. After parting with Capt. H. I set out for New-
York, accompanied by J. J. and his sister; and
 having five other friends in company, we took the
 whole stage to ourselves, as we were all going to
 attend the yearly meeting in New-York. On our
 way we passed the Delaware at Trenton, where we
 dined. I have remarked that some people in Ame-
 rica, have a great predeliction for wearing boots,
 and for smoking segars. Even children of five
 or six years of age, are sometimes seen, in their
 boots, smoking segars. At Trenton, I was enter-
 tained with the sight of a company of journeymen
 tailors, at the work-board, all booted as if ready
 for mounting a horse. This article of dress is
 full as expensive here as in England; yet a
 boot-maker told me, that he sometimes sold
 no less than three pairs within the winter to
 some individuals who earned their bread by their
 daily labour; and, for these, they paid 35s. ster-
 ling per pair. In the afternoon we passed Prince-
 town, and, that night, lodged at Brunswick. 5th Month, 25th. We breakfasted at Elizabeth
 Town; and arrived at Paules-hook Ferry about
 noon. Here I saw a fleet of armed vessels, i. e.
 four ships and one brig. As they were full of
 meat and guns, and the men were dressed in uni-
forms, they had a very warlike appearance. This
 fleet was just returned from the island of St. Domin-
go, with a very valuable cargo of coffee; and was said
 to have made the most successful voyage ever re-
membered. At the ferry we were told it was
 O--'s fleet, and was principally belonging to a
 merchant in New-York of that name, who had
 acquired very great riches thereby. This was a
 remarkable instance of the great extent to which
 the merchants of this country carry their mercan-
tile concerns; yet so uncertain is trade, that this
 man stopped payment a few months afterwards.
 We crossed the North River, and arrived at New-
 York to dinner; where I took up my lodgings at
 my old friend P. P.'s, whom I found in a weak
 state of health. 5th Month, 26th. I attended New-York meet-
 ing; afterwards dined at J. B.'s, in company with
 two friends from Canada. In the afternoon I
 drank tea at J. M. 's, in company with several
 other friends: and spent the evening at C. and
 E. C. 's. 5th Month 31st. The last five days I spent in
 attending the yearly meeting at New-York; and
 on the evening of the 31st attended a Committee
 on Indian Affairs. This committee corresponds
 with the Indians, who are disposed to be instructed
 and assisted by friends. I observed that the com-
 munications from the Indians consisted chiefly in
 requests that friends would furnish them with iron-
work, and workmen to assist them in building
 their houses and barns. 6th Month, 1st. I went to Flushing on Long
 Island, along with my relation T. W. and ano-
ther friend. On the 3d we returned to New-
York, and, in the afternoon, I set out for Phila-
delphia, in the Amboy Packet, in company with a
 French merchant, his wife, and three children.
 They came from Bordeaux, whence they were
 just arrived. We had lo on hoard a young
 man from Montego Bay, in Jamaica. The after-
 noon being fine and clear, the wind fair, and
 the company agreeable, we had a delightful sail
 to Amboy, being about 30 miles. 6th Month, 4th. I came to Burlington; and
 after a pleasant evening spent in the family,
 slept at G. D.'s. 6th Month, 5th. This morning I called upon
 J. H. with whom I spent an hour or two very
 pleasantly, in company with Geo. Dillwyn . Most
 of the time, we sat upon the benches at his door,
 the weather being very fine and warm. It is very
 common here to have benches, facing each other,
 on the outside of their houses, at the oars, un-
der the shade of trees planted in the streets;
 where they frequently sit enjoying the fresh breeze,
 and the shade. Burlington is a pleasant place
 in these respects; the principal street being
 fronted by the Delaware, has the benefit of the
 cool air blowing from it. This evening I arrived
 at Philadelphia, after a pleasant sail of 18 miles
 down the Delaware. 7th Month, 28th. After spending about seven
 weeks in Philadelphia and its neighbourhood,
 principality in attention to commercial engage-
 ments, I this day set out, accompanied by Edward
 Wilson, for Baltimore, in the Newcastle packet-
 boat. We had a pleasant sail down the Delaware,
 and arrived at Newcastle a little before noon; 40
 miles. This place had the appearance of con-
siderable antiquity, though it is not very large;
 and, in the neighbourhood of it are many thorn
 fences, which are seldom found in America. 7th Month, 29th, we set out this morning for
 French-town, by the stage, where we arrived to
 breakfast, 16 miles; and that place being on the
 basks of the Chesapeake Bay, we there met with
 the Baltimore Packet, in which we embarked,
 after our refreshment. In sailing down the Bay,
 the weather being fine, the Captain sent his boat
 along shore to collect drift wood, for the fire; and
 she soon returned well loaded. On board the
 packet, we dined, supped, and lodged, and break-
 fasted next morning. For all this and our passage,
 we paid five dollars each. 7th Month, 30th. After breakfasting on board
 the packet in Chesapeake Bay, we landed at Balti-
more; and, passing a few miles up the river
 Potapsco, I spent the remainder of the day in
 business, and took up my lodgings at J. T.'s. 8th Month, 3d. This evening I visited Ellicot's
 Mills, in company with J. T. and his wife. The
 overseer of these mills informed me they could
 grind and pack 30 barrels of flour per day. A
 barrel being 196lbs. or 14st. the annual returns,
 at 3s. Per stone, would be nearly 200,000l. The
 stones were 7 feet in diameter. 8th Month, 6th. I left Baltimore, in company
 with T. M. of Sandy Springs. In the evening we
 reached George-Town, where he is employed, by
 the corporation, to fill up the deep channel of the
 Patowmack, on the south side of Mason's Island,
 in order to turn the stream of that river to the side
 next to George-Town, that the harbour may be
 deepened. Near Bladensburg we passed a Caro-
lina Slave Merchant, with a company of slaves,
 men, women, and children; who all stopped at the
 door of the inn where we dined. Some of them
 appeared much dejected; and, on my questioning
 them, they told me they, were taken from their
 relatives and friends by force. One of the females
 being known to a black man in the stage, he asked
 her how he came there, knowing her to be a free
 black. She replied, that some time since, her
 husband had been taken from her, and carried
 into the Carolinas; and that she had determined
 to follow him in his bondage. This appeared to
 be a remarkable proof of conjugal affection, and
 showed a high degree of sensibility: but, in thus
 following her husband, there is great reason to
 fear from the general conduct of these Slave
 Merchants, that she herself would be sold as a slave
 by this man; who, under pretence of taking her to
 her husband, would probably betray her. This
 night I lodged at Wm. Morgan 's, in George-Town,
 at whose house T. Moor also lodged. 8th Month, 7th. I went to Washington city.
 The next day I visited Doctor Thornton , of the
 Patent Office, and was shown a variety of curious
 models. I noticed one in particular, for picking,
 carding, and spinning cotton, which might be
 wrought by a child of five or six years old; and
 though in but little compass, would spin 18 threads
 at once. In the afternoon I visited General
 Mason's residence on Mason's Island, which is a
 very beautiful spot. In this excursion I had the
 company of T. Moor , Samuel Brooks , and the
 Mayor of the city, who assisted in rowing the
 boat. The great officers of these cities are not
 above occasional offices of this kind. In the even-
ing, I came to Wm. Morgan's , and lodged there. 8th Month, 9th. I sailed down the Patowmack
 to Alexandria, and took up my quarters with my
 kind friend and relative P. J. who had married
 M. I. a cousin of my brother J. L. 8th Month, 13th. I spent this day at Fredericks-
 burg, a considerable town on the Rappahannock,
 to which I came in the stage yesterday. Some
 business continues to be done here in tobacco; but
 that trade is much on the decline. 8th Month, 14th. I came to Richmond, through
 a country cultivated by black slaves; where, as
 a matter of course, poverty and wretchedness
 seem to abound. The different appearance of
 those States, in which slaves are employed, when
 compared with Pennsylvania and the other States
 where slavery is not permitted, is truly astonishing. 8th Month, 15th. I spent this day at Rich-
 mond. In the evening I walked to Manchester, over
 the bridge at James's River which at this place is
 nearly half a mile wide. From my own observations,
 and the information I received from an inhabitant,
 Richmond appears to be a place of great dissipa-
 tion; chiefly arising from the loose and debauched
 conduct of the white people with their black
 female slaves. It sometimes happens here, as in
 other places, that the white inhabitants, in selling
 the offspring of these poor debased females, sell
 their own sons and daughters, with as much indif-
ference as they would sell their cattle. By such
 means, every tender sentiment of the human
 breast is laid waste, and men become so degraded,
 that their feelings rank but little above these of
 the beasts of the field. In the treatment of their
 offspring, how far do some of the brute creation
 surpass them! An active clever woman of this place, with a
 servant and two children, came with me in the
 stage part of the way to Fredericksburgh. She
 told me that she was a native of Edinburgh, and
 that her husband and family had been settled for
 some time to Richmond, as linen-drapers and mil-
liners; had been successful in business, and had
 the prospect of a continuance of success; but, as
 a longer residence there, would, in their view, be
 attended with almost certain ruin to the morals of
 their children, they had determined to leave the
 place, and remove to a less exposed situation;
 where they would not be tried with the con-
taminating influence and effects of this unhollowed
 system of slavery. For an active, industrious
 couple, with a numerous rising family, thus to
 come to the resolution of quitting a lucrative bu-
siness and situation on these ground, is, I think,
 a mark of best wisdom and sound judgment, and
 is worthy the imitation of all those who are alike
 circumstanced. 8th Month, 16th. I left Richmond in the
 morning; and reached the Bowling green Tavern
 to dinner. The owner of the plantation on which
 this Tavern stands, it was said, had more than 200
 slaves in his employment. I reached Fredericks-
burg this night. In passing along, I saw some
 Yams growing, at a little distance, south of Fre-
dericksburg. 8th Month, 17th. I came this day to Alexan-
dria. In coming we passed Mount Vernon, the
 habitation of the late General Washington, a little
 on the right, about 10 or 12 miles from Alexan-
dria, when we came within about 5 miles of this
 city, the stage driver told us that before sun-rise
 in the morning, while it was yet rather dark, close
 by the place we then were at, his 4 horses suddenly
 stopped; but for what cause he could not con-
 jecture. However, on giving them a smart stroke
 or two with the whip, they suddenly started for-
ward, when he immediately saw a very large
 snake entangled amongst their legs; but, push-
ing on with great violence, they soon cleared
 themselves; and the stage drove directly over it.
 The sound of the horses hoofs, and the sensation
 he felt when the carriage passed over the snake,
 raised in him the idea of driving over several
 sheaves of wheat; and, to the best of his judgment,
 from the faint view he had of the reptile, he be-
lieved it to be as thick as the calf of of a man's leg.
 The passengers were alarmed, but, on recovering
 from their fright, insisted upon getting out, and en-
deavouring to find the snake, believing that he must
 be disabled by the wheels of the carriage. They ac-
cordingly searched about the place, but could see
 nothing of him; and, as there was a stream near,
 they supposed he had got into it, and had floated
 down with the current. The senior Magistrate of
 Alexandria was present in the stage, as the driver
 gave this account; and being well acquainted with
 the man, considered him worthy of credit. 8th Month, 18th. I attended Alexandria meet-
ing; and, in the afternoon, drank tea with a friend
 from Birmingham, now well settled here with his
 wife and children. My home was at P. J.'s where
 I lodged and was kindly entertained. The member of black slaves kept in and near
 Alexandria, is very great. On market days many
 come out of the country with fruit, vegetables,
 &c. and some, even girls of 10 or 12 years of age,
 are seen walking the streets with baskets on their
 heads, without any clothing. Some, both men and
 women, are nearly without clothing; and what little
 is allowed to many of them is all in rags. Their com-
mon full dress is a coarse sacking or linsey woolsey
 shirt and trowsers for the men; and, for the women,
 a long garment or a petticoat, and a short waist-
coat of the same meterials; both sexes go without
 shoes or stockings, and mostly without hats. I
 understood from a respectable person that farther
 to the South he has seen, at the houses of what
 are called gentlemen, the young blacks waiting
 at table, quite naked; without discovering any
 appearance of shame either in master or slave There is a very striking contrast between the ap-
pearance of the horses or teams in Pennsylvania,
 and those in the Southern States where slaves are
 kept. In Pennsylvania we meet great numbers
 of waggons, drawn by 4 or more fine fat horses;
 the carriages firm and well made, and covered
 with stout, good linen, bleached almost white;
 and it is not uncommon to see 10 or 15 together,
 travelling cheerfully along the road, the driver
 riding on one of his horses. Many of these come
 more than 300 miles to Philadelphia, from the
 Ohio, Pittsburgh, and other places; and I have been
 told by a respectable friend, a native of Phila-
delphia, that more than 1000 covered carriages
 frequently come to Philadelphia market. Indeed
 the appearance of them on market-days, in Market-
street, which is 2 miles in length, and about 40
 yards in width, is such as no stranger can have a
 just conception of; to say nothing of the adjoining
 streets, which are crowded with farmers's carts and
 waggons from every quarter. The appearance of things in the Slave States is
 quite the reverse of this. We sometimes meet
 a ragged black boy or girl, driving a team consist-
 ing of a lean cow and a mule; sometimes a lean
 bull or an ox and a mule; and I have seem a mule,
 a bull, and a cow, each miserable in its appear-
ance, composing one team, with a half-naked
 black slave or two, riding or driving, as occasion
 suited. The carriage or waggon, if it may be
 called such, appeared in as wretched condition
 as the team and its driver. Sometimes a couple
 of horses, mules, or cows, &c. would be dragging
 a hogshead of tobacco, with a pivot or axel driven
 into each end of the hogshead, and some thing like
 a shaft attached, by which it was drawn or rolled
 along the road. I have seen two oxen and two
 slaves pretty fully employed in getting along a
 single hogshead; and some of these come from a
 great distance inland. In the evening of this day, I had a pleasant sail
 up the Patowmack to George-Town, where I
 lodged. Chapter VII.
 Washington--Frederick-Town--York-Town--Columbia--
 Lancaster--Merion--Radnor. 19th of 8th Month, 1805. I spent this day at
 Washington City and George-Town; dined at
 Doctor Thornton 's, an old school-fellow, and a
 descendant of Governor Pickering of Tortola. I
 likewise spent the evening with the Doctor at the
 Patent Office, from which we had a beautiful
 prospect down the Patowmack. 8th Month, 20th. I went in the stage from
 George-Town to Frederick-Town, in Maryland.
 At this place the death of a person of the name
 of Smith, was a general subject of conversation.
 I was informed that, in early life, he had been a
 transported convict from England, and had lived
 and wrought with the black slaves, and had
 taken a wife from amongst them. Since the time
 of his servitude expired, he had, by industry
 and management, acquired 70,000l. part of which
 he gave to his children by his black wife; and the
 residue, being the largest proportion, to his
 white children. This man, I was told, was the
 principal stockholder in the Columbia Bank. I spent two days more at Frederick-town, be-
ing detained by the stage. Great numbers of
 black slaves are kept in this part of Maryland.
 One farmer was mentioned to me who kept up-
wards of 200; and from the quantity of land he had
 under cultivation, there did not appear to be more
 than 10 acres to one slave; which of course could
 yield but little profit to the owner. I was told of
 one couple of slaves he had, who lived as man and
 wife, and were valued at more than 400l. on ac-
 count of their stout healthy children; whom he
 could sell at a very high price when young. From
 the information I received, it appeared that breed-
 ing slaves was the best part of his business. Such
 is the corrupt state of things where slavery is
 permitted. 8th Month, 23d. I came to Hanover, in com-
pany with two persons of the name of Smith,
 grandsons of a friend in the ministry who for-
merly resided at Marlborough, in Fairfax County,
 Virginia. John Woolman makes honourable men-
tion of this friend in his journal. 8th Month, 24th. This morning we passed
 through York-Town, where we breakfasted. At the
 Assizes or Sessions, which were held at that time, a
 boy of about 15 years of age, was convicted of the
 wilful and deliberate murder of his play-fellow, a
 little boy 2 or 3 years younger than himself. The
 reason he assigned for this cruel act was, that his
 companion had won a few pence from him at some
 game of chance. A lawyer who had attended the
 trial, was with us in the stage, and said that the
 culprit appeared unconcerned as to the issue;
 and when convicted, showed no emotion; but with
 a great deal of indifference requested that his
 acquaintances would attend at his execution; which
 they did. At noon we came to the Susquehanna, on the
 opposite shore to Columbia, where we dined.
 This is one of the most beautiful and romantic
 parts of America. The river is here about one
 mile broad, with a number of beautiful little
 islands spread over it. What added greatly to the
 beauty of the scene, were the high rocks which
 rise from the margin of the river, and near which
 were seen many eagles and fish-hawks soaring in
 the air; the latter frequently darting into the
 water, where they make a prey of the fish. In
 rising again, it frequently happens that the eagles
 pursue the hawks, and compel them to let go their
 prize; and such is the swiftness of the eagle, that
 he will often dart down and seize the fish, before
 it reaches the water. In the shallow parts of the river, many beauti-
ful white herons are seen, stalking along in
 search of food, making a beautiful variety in the
 prospect. I saw a number of large flat-bottomed boats in
 this river, some of which had come upwards of
 300 miles, and could carry 1000 bushels of wheat.
 The largest of them are more than 70 feet in length,
 but calculated for one voyage only, and for floating
 down the rivers with the stream, over shallows and
 falls; for when they arrive at the place of their
 destination, they're taken in pieces and the
 timber is used for other purposes. Exclusive
 of these boats, which are called arks, and have
 frequently a kind of cottage upon them, in which
 several persons are accommodated during the
 voyage; there are also many large floats of timber
 which are so fixed together, that they appear like
 one large compact body, on which a small dwelling-
house is built for the accommodation of a family.
 These floats sometimes contain several thousand
 feet of timber, which are conveyed in this way se-
 venty hundred miles, at a very trifling expense. After
 crossing this beautiful river in the ferry boat, we
 came to Columbia, a small new built town rising
 fast into importance. Here we again entered into
 the stage, and passing through a fine well-cultivated
 country, on a good turnpike-road, we came to
 Lancaster; which is considered the best inland
 town in North America, and is about 12 miles
 distant from Columbia. 8th Month, 25th. This was the first day of the
 week: and there being no meeting of friends in
 Lancaster, I was induced to inquire if no friend
 resided there, and was informed of a person resident
 in the town, who was a member of our society.
 I called upon him and was kindly entertained by
 him the whole of the afternoon. After a little
 conversation with him, I found he was a father
 to one of my customers in America. I have often
 thought it a great privilege in our society, that
 such an interchange of hospitality and freedom pre-
vails among us. It has a great tendency to smooth
 the path of life, especially to strangers in a strange
 land. In the course of conversation in this family,
 I found that Major Andre and Colonel Despard
 had both taken up their lodgings with them,
 when prisoners on parole to the Americans.
 They spoke very respectfully of Major Andre, who
 had so conducted himself as to gain much upon
 the affection of the whole family. Some of his
 drawings and letters were shewn to me, which
 they preserved with great care. 8th Month, 26th. The short time I remained
 in Lancaster, I found that considerable business
 was done in the manufactory of locks, latches, and
 rifle guns, all of which are esteemed to be superior to
 those imported from England. This day I came to
 Philadelphia and had the company of Judge Yates
 the whole of the way. In the evening, I attended
 the burial of C. W. a young man whom I had left
 but a few days before in good health. 8th Month, 31st. The last five days have been
 spent at Merion. At this place I was told that
 as William Penn was once coming up from New-
 castle to Philadelphia, a friend in the vessel re-
 marked that both the wind and the tide were against
 them; William Penn immediately replied, that
 himself had been sailing against wide and tide
 all his life. This reply was very descriptive of
 the difficulties which this great man encountered
 in the world. 9th Month, 21st. The last three weeks I con-
 tinued at Merion, occasionally going to Philadel-
 phia on business. In the afternoon of this day I
 visited P. A. and his wife at H. Bowman 's.
 They are an ancient couple of plain, honest friends,
 both in the ministry. The grandfather of the for-
 mer came amongst friends in a remarkable way.
 He resided near the sea coast in the Jerseys, and
 being an active lively young man, he used some-
 times to employ himself in playing upon a violin
 amongst his neighbours; especially when the young
 people were collected to dance and make merry.
 After one of these occasions, as he was returning
 home, late in the evening, he observed a human
 skull lying upon the sand; which, as he passed by,
 caused some serious reflections; but they passed
 off for the present. Going that way again some-
time after, the impressions very renewed, and
 while he was musing over the skull, which had
 thus, a second time, been the means of bringing
 into his mind a train of serious reflections, he con-
cluded to bury this dry bone which had so power-
fully preached to him. He covered it carefully
 up in the earth, and went home, enjoying the
 pleasing reflection of having performed this last
 office to the remains of a fellow-creature. Such,
 however, were the weight and solemnity occasioned
 by the impressions of his mind from this circum-
stance, that a total change in his life and conversation
 succeeded; and, shortly after, he joined friends
 and became a valuable minister in the society.
 Some mention is made of this friend, I believe in
 Thomas Chalkley's Journal. His name was Peter
 Andrews. 9th Month, 29th. I still remained at Merion;
 and, this morning, attended meeting there. In the
 afternoon, I had the curiosity to take a view of a
 large methodist meeting, held near us, called a
 camp meeting; which had been continued about
 a week, almost night and day. The concourse of
 people was very great; and numbers of them, it
 was said, had come several hundred miles to attend
 the meeting. Many tents and huts were erected
 on the spot; and a great number of carriages of
 various descriptions, such as coaches, coachees,
 chairs, covered waggons, carts, &c. &c. were col-
lected under the shade of a lofty forest. From
 some conversation I had with one of the conductors
 of this assembly, I understood that great exertions
 had been used to preserve order, especially through
 the night; and, that, at ten o'clock in the evening,
 patrols went round the encampment to see that
 all were in their proper tents and places. Those
 who had not a birth within the camp were sent out.
 Their meetings had been kept up for several days with
 almost incredible zeal, from early in the morning
 until late in the evening; and, even after they had
 withdrawn into their huts and tents, numbers of
 them continued in prayer through a great part of
 the night. It may well be supposed therefore
 that the preachers were a good deal exhausted;
 especially as their language and gestures were
 generally violent. Some of the most zealous
 would quite exhaust themselves in less than an
 hour; but, there being a considerable number on the
 stage on which they preached, their places were sup-
plied immediately on their siting down. I observed
 that a great number of Negro families attended;
 and many of them in handsome carriages. The
 whole number of persons composing this meeting
 was said to be 5000. 10th Month, 3d. I spent the last four days at
 Merion. We have lately had the agreeable com-
pany of divers friends, some of whom left Phila-
delphia on account of the yellow fever, which
 prevailed in the city. 10th Month, 4th. I attended Merion meeting,
 where we had the company of Elizabeth Cogshall 
 and Elizabeth Bird . After meeting I spent some
 time with them pleasantly, at the house of a
 young man who had been disowned for taking up
 arms; but who had lately been reinstated; and his
 wife, who is an agreeable friend, was received into
 membership about the same time. 10th Month, 5th. Joseph Paul kindly took me
 in his carriage, to see a large encampment on the
 Ridge Road, where many poor persons were accom-
 modated, who had left Philadelphia to avoid the
 infection of the yellow fever. Afterwards, we visited
 the gardens and green-houses of Wm. Hamilton ,
 where we saw a number of plants and shrubs,
 natives of every quarter of the world. 10th Month, 10th. I went to Radnor monthly
 meeting; at which was a couple, who were about
 to be married; for whose accommodation the meet-
ing at Merion was agreed to be held on 5th day,
 instead of 6th; and the alteration appearing eligi-
ble for a continuance, was so determined. After
 meeting, I dined at J. H.'s, and supped and spent
 the evening at O. J. 's. This friend was one of
 those who suffered banishment on account of their
 supposed attachment to the British, during the
 revolution. His sister told me that on William
 Penn's arrival in America, he lodged at her great
 grandfather's at Merion. At that time her grand-
 father was a boy of about 12 years old; and being
 a lad of some curiosity, and not often seeing such
 a guest as Wm. Penn, he privately crept to the
 chamber door, up a flight of steps, on the outside of
 the building, which was only a log-house. On peep-
ing through the latchet-hole, he was struck with
 awe, in beholding this great man upon his knees,
 by the bedside; and could distinctly hear him in
 prayer, and thanksgiving, that he was thus pro-
 vided for in the wilderness. This circumstance
 made an impression upon the lad's mind, which
 was not effaced in old age. Chapter VIII.
 Haverford--leaves Merion--Borden Town--Amboy--
 New-York--Hudson--Nine Partners--Quarterly
 Meeting--Hudson--Albany--Troy. 12th of 10th Month, 1805. I returned from
 Radnor to Merion , and this day attended Haverford
 meeting, at which were several strangers. This is
 one of the oldest meeting-houses in America; and
 at the early settlement of this meeting, friends of
 Philadelphia went every third first day to attend
 it; most of them coming on foot a distance of
 about ten miles. At that time nearly the whole
 of the road was through a shady forest. Amongst
 the rest, Wm. Penn used to come on horseback,
 and would occasionally take up a little bare-footed
 girl behind him, to relieve her when tired. By
 the early minutes of the monthly meeting, it ap-
 pears that several friends were appointed to mark
 out a road through the woods from Philadelphia,
 to Haverford and Radnor meetings. 10th Month 13th. I attended Merion meeting,
 at which was Sarah Harrison , who visited us at
 our lodgings after meeting; and we spent the after-
 noon with her at the widow George's. 10th Month, 14th, was spent at Merion, prin-
 cipally in writing to different correspondents in
 America. 10th Month, 15th, was employed in writing to
 my dear wife and the children, and to some of
 my relations and friends in England. 10th Month, 16th, was spent at Merion in writ-
ing, and in the very acceptable company of a
 family, our fellow-boarders, whom I was about to
 leave with regret; intending next day to set out on
 a visit to my cousin H. M.'s family at Hudson's,
 on the North River, and to my cousin J. E.'s, at
 Elkland's, near the head of the Susquehanna. 10th Month, 17th. This day I came to E. W.'s,
 and J. P. being so kind as to take me to Frank-
 fort in his carriage, I embraced the opportunity
 of visiting a brother of his on the banks of the
 Delaware, where I spent an hour or two agreeably.
 Afterwards, he took me in his chaise to the stage
 office, whence I rode to the shore opposite Borden
 Town in the Mail Pilot. In crossing the Dela-
 ware to that place, I fell in company with a respec-
 table old Scotchman, who had been amusing him-
self in fishing. He told me that he had sometimes
 had the company of General Moreau in his amuse-
ments, of whom he spoke highly, as a man of mild
 and agreeable manners. I spent this evening at
 Borden Town, the residence of the noted Thomas
 Payne. My lodgings being at the tavern from
 whence the stage set out early in the morning, I
 was thrown into a mixed company of the towns-
people. Being a stranger, this extraordinary
 person was introduced as a subject of conver-
sation; but the company being of different reli-
gious and political sentiments, I found that nothing
 correct could be gathered respecting the charac-
ter of this man, even amongst his townsmen and
 neighbours. Some of them asserted that he was a
 drunkard; others the contrary. Some asserted that
 he was not fit to live, and others with equal earnest-
ness that he was an upright honest man, and kind
 and friendly to the poor. Perhaps all might have
 some ground for their assertions, by viewing dif-
ferent periods of his life; but what appeared the
 most remarkable was an observation of the land-
lady, who asserted her belief, that he was an
 enemy to American freedom, and that he was
 supported by Great Britain, and was the friend of
 that Government. In proof of her assertion, she
 said that he had treacherously mixed black sand
 in the American gunpowder, intended to be used
 against the English. All this, however, manifested
 that the mind of man is liable to be darkened and
 clouded by party spirit, which so much prevails in
 the world; and which seems inseparable from free
 Governments, when mankind, individually, are
 unwilling to come under the government of the
 Prince of Peace. 10th Month, 18th. I set out for Amboy, through
 the Jerseys. 10th Month, 19th. I came to South Amboy;
 some parts of the road were through a fruitful
 land, and others through a land almost as sandy
 and barren as the deserts of Arabia. 10th Month, 20th. I was unexpectedly detained
 at Amboy, the packet not arriving in time.--
 This being first day, and there being no meeting
 near the place, I spent my time in walking along
 the sea shore, and observing the variety of marine
 productions that were spread along the coast.
 Having my little bible, it was not the least of
 gratifications, occasionally to sit down upon a piece
 of the wreck of some stranded vessel, which the
 stormy ocean had cast upon the beach, and read a
 page or two in that instructive volume. Whilst
 thus employed I could not help pitying that poor
 man of Borden Town, whose name I have recently
 mentioned, for having so unwisely deprived him-
self of the great consolations which the Scriptures
 afford, by cultivating a disbelief of the truths
 which have been recorded for our comfort and
 instruction through time.--The situation of Amboy
 is peculiarly beautiful as to prospects. It com-
 mands a full view of the Neversink Mountains,
 and of the light-house at Sandy-Hook, by which
 vessels generally pass in going to and from New-
 York and the Atlantic; particularly those in the
 European trade. Other vessels also come up the
 Raritan and the Hackinsack rivers, which add to
 the beauty of the scene. 10th Month, 21st. I went on board the packet
 for New-York directly after a breakfast made
 chiefly of stewed oysters. These shell-fish abound
 so much here, that little children are taught to eat
 them to breakfast. The landlady told me, that she
 sometimes had 2 or 300 bushels in the cellar, at a
 time, in the winter season. After being on board
 about a quarter of an hour, we were invited by
 signal to touch at Perth Amboy, on the opposite
 shore; where we landed about ten o'clock, and
 took in two families for New-York. As we sailed
 along this Bay, I had an opportunity of seeing the
 oyster fishers, who were busily employed. The
 instruments they generally used, somewhat resem-
 bled two hay-rakes, with long iron teeth, having
 the handles, which are very long, pinned together
 about two feet from the heads of the rakes, so as
 to open and shut like a pair of large pincers.
 These instruments, which are called tongs, are
 opened wide when the heads are let down from
 the boat; and, as soon as they reach the bottom,
 the men close them, and the teeth of the rakes
 meeting drag the oysters together. By this method
 from one to three or four oysters are taken at a
 time. In sailing from Port Amboy to New-York,
 we picked up a good new boat, worth 10 or 12
 guineas, which was drifting out to sea. Having
 been so detained at Perth Amboy, and the wind
 proving unfavourable, we did not arrive at New-
York until after dark. As the yellow fever had for
 some time prevailed at New-York, I was desirous of
 being put on shore at Brooklyn, on Long Island;
 but, the night being dark with wind and rain, I
 could not prevail upon the Captain of the packet
 to land me; nor could I obtain a boat of any kind
 to take me over. I was therefore under the neces-
 sity of going to New-York, where all was silent
 and solitary; and what used to be the busiest parts,
 were now without an inhabitant to be seen. Having landed at Quince's Wharf, I went along
 Water-street to the Fly-market wharf, hoping to
 meet with the ferry-boat; but here likewise all was
 silence and solitude. I then went through the
 whole length of Fly-market, which had the ap-
pearance of having been untrodden for weeks past;
 the light of some lamps shewing the boarded floor
 to be as clean as that of a parlour. From the Fly-
market, I crossed Pearl-street, into Maiden-lane,
 and went on to Broad-way, to the City Hotel, a
 large spacious inn; where I was the only guest.
 When I was here last, the house was crowded with
 company; so much had this awful visitation varied
 the scene in every part of this busy city. Some
 of its inhabitants, with whom I had been well
 acquainted, had been suddenly taken away by the
 ravages of that dreadful disease. The next morn-
 ing I left New-York, and passing through Green-
wich, and over Harlem Bridge, I arrived at
 T. W. 's to dinner. There I spent the afternoon in
 company with one of the Pilots for the Sound, a
 healthy old man between 80 and 90 years of age, who
 frequently walked 20 miles a-day. In coming up
 to T. W. 's, I passed through Greenwich, a village
 to which the business of New-York, together with
 the banks and public offices, were removed on ac-
 count of the yellow fever. The bustle and con-
fusion occasioned thereby is not easily conceived.
 For the accommodation of the merchants, many
 temporary wooden buildings were erected. 10th Month, 23d. I accompanied T. and E.
 W. to West Chester meeting; and, in the after-
noon, drank tea and spent a few hours with I. C.'s
 family, who were under affliction on account of
 the decease of his wife. She had been lately re-
moved by the yellow fever, having, it was sup-
 posed, taken the infection the day previous to
 her coming to West Chester; to which place the
 family had removed for safety from the infection.
 The removal of this valuable friend, has been a
 very trying dispensation to her husband and family.
 If I understand right, she has left 13 children. In conversation with her daughters, I under-
stood that that the family were not aware that her
 complaint was the yellow fever, until after her
 decease. She was preserved in so much stillness
 and quietness, and, apparently, under so little
 bodily pain during the progress of the disorder,
 that they had no apprehension of its being this
 dreadful complaint, until afterwards informed by
 the medical attendants. I lodged this night and
 the preceding at T. W.'s. 10th Month, 24th. I came down with T. W.
 in his chair, to Greenwich, on business. There I
 received letters from home, and also forwarded
 divers others to England, by the Centurion. 10th Month, 25th. This day and yesterday I
 made my home at F. T.'s, where I lodged. 10th Month, 26th. This afternoon I left F. T.'s,
 and went on board a Hudson packet, called the
 Traveller, of which Ely Bunker, a friend of Hud-
 son, was owner and captain. As soon as the tide
 served, we sailed up the North River, having in
 company a young man from Hudson, and a young
 woman that way on her way to visit a sister who
 lay sick at Hudson. 10th Month, 27th. This and the preceding night
 I lodged on board the packet. In sailing along this
 river, the scenery and prospects are in many
 places grand and beautiful in a high degree; espe-
cially in sailing by the Highlands, Stoney Point,
 and the Katskill Mountains. Sometimes, for a
 considerable distance, the rocks rise from the edge
 of the river, in bold, lofty precipices, similar to
 those of Middleton Dale, in Derbyshire; and the
 river, in many parts, is from one to two miles
 over. This gives room for the vessels, which
 navigate the river, to pass and repass each other
 without danger; although the number is said to be
 upwards of 1600. They consist chiefly of sloops
 of about 70 tons burthen; yet large ships are occa-
sionally seen as high up as Hudson's and Athens,
 being about 150 miles up the country. In sailing
 on this river, we sometimes had the sight of 15 or 20
 vessels within a short distance of us; and Captain
 Bunker mentioned that he had sometimes seen 30
 in company. Although this river is pretty straight,
 in general, yet it frequently winds its way between
 lofty rocks and mountains, which cause a variety
 of currents in the wind, so as to require a good
 deal of care and management to work the vessels
 to advantages. It was amusing sometimes to ob-
serve that, while we lay becalmed on one side of the
 stream under a lofty rock, the vessels which hap-
 pened to be on the contrary side, would skim past
 us like an arrow, with a fair wind, leaving us far
 behind; and at the same time the company would
 divert themselves at our difficulties as they glided
 past; but, before we got many miles, it sometimes
 happened that the tables were turned; and the winds
 would favour us to get before those who had so
 recently derided us. To persons disposed to
 moralize, there was somewhat instructive in these
 changes of scene; as we may not unfrequently
 observe similar occurrences in our passage through
 life. 10th, Month, 25th. I arrived at Hudson early
 in the afternoon, and paid for my passage, of
 about 150 miles, one dollar and a half; and was
 charged three quarters of a dollar per day for
 board and liquor during the voyage. As we
 were about leaving the sloop, a boy came on
 board, and abruptly told the young woman, our
 fellow-passenger, that her sister, whom she was
 come to see, had just breathed her last. That
 proved more than the poor girl could bear; and
 she was not in a situation to leave the vessel while
 I staid. It was a great pity that more caution
 was not observed in conveying such afflictive intel-
 ligence. In stepping ashore at Hudson, one of the
 first persons I met with was George Bunker , the
 first mate of the ship in which I came over
 to America, whose family reside here. He
 kindly sent his son as my guide to T. C.'s, whence
 I went that evening to H. M.'s, and lodged at his
 house on the banks of Claverick Creek. 10th Month, 29th. I spent this day pleasantly at
 Sunnyside, the residence of a relation, and went with
 him over his farm. He has purchased 300 acres
 of land, with a dwelling-house and barn, for 900l.
 sterling. The estate runs near a mile on the
 banks of a river, which is stored with plenty of fish,
 and which passes into the North River about five
 miles below. On the opposite side of the farm,
 there is a good turnpike-road, leaving to Hudson,
 &c. About 100 acres are cleared from wood,
 and are in a state of cultivation; remaining
 200 acres being wood land, are esteemed the
 most valuable. There are about 20 acres of
 meadow near the river. This land is very rich
 and productive; and the whole of the estate,
 if in many parts of Yorkshire, would be thought
 good and valuable land: inferior, I believe, is
 sometimes sold for 100l. per acre. 10th Month, 30th. This morning I walked to
 the residence of H. M. jun. near his mill on
 Claverick Creek. At this mill is a fall of about
 30 feet, over one of the most rugged rocks I ever
 saw. In England the strata of rocks commonly
 lie horizontally, but here they are nearly perpen-
 dicular, forming many rugged points and pin-
nacles, over which the water is thrown with no
 little foam and noise. After dining, and spending
 a few hours very pleasantly, we returned to Sun-
nyside in the evening. 10th Month, 31st. This day I came to Hudson
 meeting, in company with as many of H. M.'s
 family as could ride in their coachee, a handsome
 carriage drawn by two horses. After meeting I
 dined at the house of a worthy elder. In conversa-
tion he gave me a little history of H. B. whose near
 neighbour and friend he had been for many years;
 even for some time before she appeared as a
 minister. Her first appearances, he observed,
 were very acceptable, and in a good degree of
 humility. About that time he accompanied J. T.
 on a visit to her, who expressed his belief that she
 was rightly called, and encouraged her in the
 exercise of her gift. This circumstance tended
 to open her way more fully in the minds of friends,
 and her communications became more frequent,
 and were enlarged. Notwithstanding this, the
 friend observed to me, that he very often had his
 fears on her account, and sometimes imparted them
 to her. About the time she applied for a certi-
 ficate to visit England, he felt more forcibly her
 danger, and that it would he increased by her in-
troduction to the cities of Europe; and it was
 some time before he could determine to sign her
 certificate; but the fear of appearing singular,
 outweighed his better feelings, and he accordingly
 signed it. Notwithstanding the very fallacious
 sentiments she had propagated, I felt charity and
 good-will towards her; and called to see her hus-
 band; she being from home. 11th Month, 1st. I spent this day pleasantly at
 Sunnyside. In the morning I went out with my
 cousin Charles into the woods, and caught an Ame-
 rican hare in a hollow tree; but we were obliged
 to hew down the tree before we could come
 at the prize. The American hare is not like
 either the hare or the rabbit of England, but has
 the appearance of a mixture of both. When the
 poor creature was taken, it cried like an infant. 11th Month, 2d. I remained at my relation's,
 and, in the afternoon, accompanied my cousin
 Samuel on the water, with a design of taking a
 minx, but we were disappointed. 11th Month, 3d. I attended Hudson meeting,
 and afterwards visited H. B.'s family from Eng-
 land, in company with my relations. 11th Month, 4th. I set out for Nine Partners
 Quarterly Meeting, accompanied by Charles
 Marriott and three of his sisters. We took our
 provisions with us in the coachee, and found the
 innkeepers very cheerfully spread a table, with a
 cloth and knives and forks, being well satisfied
 with the profit on the feed of our horses and the
 little liquor we drank. This being the general
 practice, it makes travelling more easy as to ex-
pense; for the whole the innkeeper had to receive
 of us, being a company of 5 or 6, was not more
 than half a crown at dinner. By retail, a glass of
 brandy or rum and water, such as is commonly
 called for in England, is charged at the inns 3 1/2 d.
 Although the means of intoxication are more
 easily attained than in England, yet I think, on
 the whole, that all classes are more sober here
 than in my native land. The frequent elections
 have a strong tendency to promote intemperance;
 but as a seat in the legislature in this country, is
 not, in its consequence, so lucrative as in England,
 there is not the same inducement for corruption
 and intemperance. This evening we reached
 Jonathan Marriott 's, and lodged there. 11th Month, 5th. We continued our rout and
 reached T. M.'s to dinner, where we spent the after-
 noon, and lodged at night. This friend made re-
 spectful mention of Tho. Colley , whose companion
 he was for some time in his travels in this country.
 During the Revolution, T. M. with some other
 friends, was taken prisoner by the British, and
 confined a long time on board a prison ship.
 Whilst there, he employed himself in making a
 variety of little articles in wood, some of which
 he showed me. They were very neatly executed,
 and bore testimony that they had been made,
 rather to pass on time than to earn wages. In
 one of these memories of his captivity, he had
 a quantity of tea, which had been gathered in the
 woods about his dwelling. It had much the ap-
pearance and flavour of common bohea tea. 11th Month, 6th. I attended Nine Partners
 Quarterly Meeting. At this meeting there were
 three friends in the gallery, sitting near together,
 whose ages united made about 300 years. After
 meeting, we spent an hour or two in the school
 for friends' children, where the teachers kindly
 brought forward a few of their best readers, both
 boys and girls, and gave us a specimen of their
 abilities in that branch of learning. Some of them
 read well, and did credit to the institution.
 Amongst the teachers, I observed a young couple,
 who had been married some time: the husband
 was between 17 and 18 years old, and the wife a
 little older, but not much. One consequence of
 such early marriages is, that many generations are
 frequently seen living at the same time. The
 children of my acquaintance, John
 Biddle, of Philadelphia, are the seventh genera-
 tion; the female head of which family was a friend
 then living. In the afternoon I visited T. R. and
 his wife, in whose company we spent half an hour
 pleasantly. After leaving them, we set out for
 Stamford quarterly meeting, and lodged at A. S.'s. 11th Month, 7th. Came to P. U. 's, where I
 lodged. Here I saw several articles very neatly
 painted, and which appeared to me neater and
 more lively than oil painting, and which, I was
 informed, consisted of nothing but the colouring
 substance ground down with curds. Here I also
 saw a quantity of sewing silk made in this coun-
 try, and produced from silk worms raised in
 Mansfield, in Connecticut; in which place upwards
 of ten tons of silk had been produced the last year.
 In the afternoon of this day we visited M. C. at
 his farm, which is one of the neatest and best
 conducted I have seen, where I saw a ram from
 the Straits of Magellan, which had been presented
 to him by his brother Captain H. who had brought
 it from thence. The animal was of great strength,
 and much larger than any English sheep. He had
 two large horns standing upwards, somewhat like
 those of a goat; and two others growing from
 near the roots of the former, twisted like those of
 other sheep. His colour was black, and his wool
 of a coarse quality. Afterwards we visited Captain
 S. C. at his farm, which is, I believe, a very good
 one; and it has an excellent house and good accom-
modation, and is very pleasantly situated. On our
 way this friend met and passed us, with a waggon
 load of slaughtered hogs for the next country store;
 but he soon returned, and we supped and spent a few
 hours very pleasantly with him and his wife. As
 Captain C. was the commander of the Fortitude,
 in which I came over to America the first time,
 in company with Thomas Scattergood , this visit
 afforded a pleasing opportunity of talking over a
 variety of circumstances that occurred during our
 voyage. 11th Month, 8th. I attended Stamford quar-
 terly meeting. From my observations here and
 in other meetings, in New-York State in particular,
 I thought some friends, active in the discipline, suf-
 fered loss, by placing too high a stamp on a
 coarse, homely appearance in dress and furniture,
 without sufficiently coming under that ameliorating
 influence which draws out of any reliance on par-
ticular forms of dress and furniture. Truth and
 sound sense lead into neatness, decency, and mode-
ration in these respects; but extremes do harm. By
 keeping the eye and attention constantly fixed too
 much on outward things, the better part is in some
 danger of being neglected. In the evening we
 returned to J. M.'s, where we lodged that night;
 and the next morning set out for Sunnyside,
 where we arrived safe in the evening. 11th Month, 10th. I attended Hudson meeting.
 Afterwards dined and spent a few hours with T. C.
 a valuable public friend; and, in the evening, re-
turned to my relations. The three following days
 were spent pleasantly in their family. A part of
 the time was occupied in taking two drawings of
 the house, &c. &c. intended as a present for my
 cousin's sister in England, which will give her
 friends there some idea of American scenery. 11th Month, 14th. I attended Hudson meeting,
 and afterwards dined and spent a little time with
 Captain R. B. in his family. In the afternoon, ac-
 companied by several of H. M.'s family, and E. C.
 I went across the North River to Athens. After
 spending about an hour there, I took leave of these
 agreeable young friends, and went on board the
 sloop, called the First Counsellor, for Albany. The
 time I spent at my cousin M.'s, was pleasanter
 to me than any I have passed in this land; and his
 house was the most like home. 11th Month, 15th. I slept last night on board
 the packet; and this day arrived safe at Albany,
 after a pleasant sail up Hudson River, on the
 banks of which are many beautiful prospects.
 Albany has more the appearance of an English
 town than any I have seen in America. Some
 of the streets are narrow and irregular, and
 many of the houses are old. On approaching the
 city, in sailing up the river, the roofs of many of
 the buildings, from being covered with tin plates
 instead of slate, exhibit a very singular and glit-
tering appearance in the sun. I lodged this night
 at the coffee-house in Albany. 11th Month, 16th. This day I rode up to Troy,
 on B. S.'s horse, which he was so kind as to fur-
nish me with, to Whites Town, near Utica. Troy
 is a beautiful city, and improving rapidly. It is
 already of considerable extent, although, like
 Hudson, of but few years standing. Divers of
 the steeples and towers of their public buildings,
 being covered with tin plates, as at Albany, gives
 the place a very splendid appearance. I lodged
 this night at Troy, having had the company of a
 friend from New-York, in the evening. 11th Month, 17th. I attended the meeting at
 Troy in company with the before-mentioned friend.
 Here is a very neat meeting-house, kept clean and
 in good repair. There is something not quite right,
 or at least something that produces very unpleasant
 feelings and reflections, in suffering meeting-houses
 to become dirty and out of repair. We sometimes
 judge of the estimation in which people hold their
 guests by the room assigned for their reception and
 entertainment. What those people think who
 suffer their places for worship to remain a scene of
 dirt and ruin, whilst perhaps their own habitations
 are superfluously elegant, I cannot comprehend;
 I fear it bespeaks their having no very high idea of
 the Divine Majesty, to whose service they profess
 to appropriate such buildings. This meeting-house
 at Troy, I was informed, was built chiefly by two
 female friends, whose husbands had sometime
 before been disowned for dealing in spirituous
 liquors; this traffic being contrary to the rules of
 friends in New-York State. Those persons not
 seeing the propriety of the rule, or not choosing to
 forego the profits of this branch of their trade,
 had suffered themselves to be disunited. At
 the same time they declared that although
 friends disowned them, they would not disown
 their friends. Since their separation they have
 attended friends meetings for worship; and,
 being people of property, they have, on all
 occasions, encouraged their wives to be ge-
nerous in their contributions towards the neces-
 sary expense of the society. I was told that in
 this instance their two wives had furnished the
 means of defraying nearly the whole expense of
 building this handsome meeting-house. In the
 afternoon I parted with J. B. and set out for
 Schenectady on the Mohawk River. I arrived
 there early in the evening where I lodged. This
 day I sent letters to my dear wife by J. B. to
 be forwarded from New-York. Chapter IX.
 Genesee Country--Utica--Brothertown--Indian Tale--
The Orchard--Indian Inn--Lakes Skaneatedes, Owas-
 co, Seneca, and Canandarque--An Atheist--Holland
 Land Company--Praries. 18th of 11th Month, 1805. I crossed the Mo-
 hawk river, and travelled about 30 miles on the
 Genesee Turnpike. Having company I stopped
 with them at an inn, where we lodged. This inn
 does no credit to the country. 11th Month, 19th. I was joined by an agree-
 able young man from Hudson, of the name of
 Osborne , who is in the practice of the law. He
 had also in company with him a respectable trades-
 man from Balls-town Springs; so we travelled along
 pleasantly through the romantic valley of the Mo-
hawk, and, in our journey, saw a few straggling
 Indians climbing up the mountains. In the even-
 ing we came to the smaller falls of that river,
 where the navigation is aided by a number of well
 constructed locks. The fall is about 70 feet.
 Here is a pretty little town having some good inns,
 and standing in a most beautiful and romantic situa-
tion, somewhat resembling Matlock; but the
 scenery is more rugged and stupendous. Here we lodged; and the next morning, the 20th
 of 11th Month, we set out, along the German
 Flats, to Kerseymere, where we breakfasted at
 a very good inn, although about 200 miles inland.
 In travelling this road, we sometimes observe ves-
tiges of the devastation formerly made, through
 the instigations of the English or French Govern-
ments, by the Indians, as they were prevailed upon,
 sometimes one power and sometimes by the
 other, to join in their wars and quarrels. How
 degrading that men, placed in authority, and pro-
fessing to be the followers of Christ, should be
 thus employed in working upon the simplicity of
 the poor Indians! In the afternoon we came to
 Utica, an improving place, of considerable busi-
ness, a little distance from Fort Schuyler. In the
 evening I came to B. S.'s, where I lodged and left
 the horse which his son so kindly lent me at
 Albany; having replaced him with one I bought
 at Fort Schuyler. 11th Month, 21st. This day I passed through
 Clinton, where I dined; and, in the evening came
 to an Indian village, called Brothertown. Here I
 was comfortably accommodated at the house of
 an Indian, whose name was Obadiah Scipio . His
 wife Elizabeth , is the daughter of an Indian Chief
 of the name of Fowler. She was a personable
 woman and of art expressive countenance, and
 was very industrious. Her dairy produced ex-
 cellent cheese and butter, notwithstanding a
 great part of her time was employed in spin-
 ning for the family apparel, which was very
 decent. It was mostly prepared for the weaver
 by her own household; and, whilst I was in the
 house, a female weaver of the village, brought in
 a piece of cloth made from yarn spun in this
 family, which was such as would have done cre-
dit to any female in England. This reputable
 Indian couple had four fine healthy children, who
 sat by the fire; and, though of a copper colour,
 their countenances were far from unpleasing.
 Their names where Denis, Calvin, Cinthia, and
 Celinda. The schoolmaster of this Indian village, who
 is paid by friends, introduced me to a chief of
 the name of Hendricks , with whom I had some
 conversation; and we sat about an hour by the
 fire-side of a pretty large family of Indians, where
 it was pleasant to see the spinning-wheel go
 briskly round. There were 16 or 18 Indians
 round the fire; the older part of the family sat
 on a bench in front, and the little Indians on the
 ground on each side. The fire was made at the
 end of the building, and the smoke found its way
 through the roof, without the aid of a chimney.
 The walls and roof were hung with ears of Indian
 corn, and other winter provisions. It is difficult
 to describe my feelings, on sitting down with an
 Indian family in this way. In a sympathising
 mind, sensations of pity and compassion will pre-
dominate. On the other hand it is not unlikely
 that a similar feeling may prevail in the breasts of
 these children of the forest, towards those who
 may consider themselves as raised far above them
 in education and civilized life. It is remarkable
 that an Indian boy or girl is rarely found willing
 to change native habits, for those of towns and
 cities; but there are many instances, I am told, of
 those who are called civilized people, assimilating
 their manners with the Indian's; and of giving their
 mode of life the preference. Man, as man, is a
 strange and incomprehensible being when left to
 himself; whether in what is called a savage or a
 civilized state. In either, when so left, he stands
 equally a ready instrument, in the hand of the
 common enemy of the peace and happiness of the
 world. I spent the remainder of this evening by Scipio 's
 fire-side, and was accommodated with a good bed
 at night, on which I slept comfortably. Both the
 sides and ceiling of that part of the building in
 which I lodged, were covered with ears of Indian
 corn in the husk; which, to me, had a novel but
 not an unpleasant appearance. 11th Month, 22d. I visited the Indian school-
 master and his school, and was presented with a
 few specimens of writing. Here I met with a
 little poem on an Indian boy, who was sent to
 Harvard college for his education, which I
 thought worth copying, it being founded on facts.
 It is as follows:-- From Susquehanna's farthest springs, 
Where savage tribes pursue their game, 
His blanket ty'd with yellow strings, 
An Indian of the forest came. From council grave the fathers rose, 
Viewing the hopeful youth with joy; 
To Ha'rford's Hall, over wastes of snow, 
They sent their tawny-coloured boy. Awhile he wrote, awhile he read, 
Awhile he learnt the grammar rules; 
An Indian savage, so well bred, 
Much credit promis'd to the schools. Some said in law he would excel; 
And some in physic thought he'd shine; 
Others, who knew him passing well, 
Hop'd he might prove a sage divine: But those of more discerning eye, 
Could then far other prospects show, 
As oft he threw his Virgil by, 
To wander with his dearer bow. The tedious hours of study spent, 
The drowsy lecture haply done, 
He to the woods a hunting went; 
But sigh'd to see the setting sun. The shady bank, the murm'ring stream, 
The woody wilds, his heart possess'd; 
The dewy lawn, his morning dream, 
In fancy's gayest colours dress'd. And why, he cry'd did I forsake 
My native woods, for gloomy walls; 
The silver stream, the limpid lake; 
For these dull books and college halls? A little could my wants supply: 
Can wealth or honour give me more? 
Or will my father's God deny 
The humble treat he gave before? Where Nature's ancient forests grow, 
The flowering laurel never fades; 
There is my heart; and I must go, 
And die amidst my native shades. He spoke, and to the western springs, 
Stripp'd of his gown, his way he bent; 
His blanket tied with yellow strings, 
This native of the forest went. Returning to his native plain, 
The Indians welcom'd him with joy; 
The Council took him home again, 
And bless'd their tawny-colour'd boy. From the Indian village of Brother Town, I
 came to another settlement of theirs, called the
 Orchard. Many of their habitations are formed
 principally of the bark of trees, attached to posts,
 which are fixed in the ground; the roofs being
 also of bark; but as it is taken off the trees in
 broad pieces, they contrive to make a pretty warm
 dwelling. A few chiefs, and others, have good
 houses of wood, well furnished; and some of the
 Indians, being very good workmen, and having
 complete sets of tools, I have seen houses of their
 building superior to many in England. As the whole of this day's journey lay amongst
 the Indians, whose habitations are pretty numerous
 in this quarter, I had a fair opportunity of forming
 some judgment of the progress they have made in
 the useful arts of civilized life; and I confess it is
 my opinion, that many in these villages, are further
 advanced in this respect, and enjoy more of the
 comforts of life, than many of the inhabitants of
 the remote parts of Great Britain and Ireland. In passing by one of their habitations, I noticed
 the Indian manner of preparing deer skins for use.
 After taking off the hair, they sew up the skin
 like a bag; and one end being suspended by a
 support, the lower end is brought close over a
 vessel, containing a small fire, of green wood,
 at the bottom. The carbonic acid ascend-
ing with the smoke, so impregnates the skin,
 that it becomes a dutiable and elastic leather;
 very suitable for their shoes, or moccasons, and
 other useful purposes. This operation was going
 forward under the piazza of a very good frame-
 house; and, from the appearance of the inhabi-
 tants, I suppose the matter was a chief of the first
 order. Upon his head he had a very grotesque
 kind of cap, much resembling a lofty antique
 helmet. His daughter, who appeared to be a girl
 about 13 years old, had a very pleasing Indian
 countenance; and her arms were ornamented with
 silver bracelets of considerable breadth, both above
 and below the elbow. Though her dress was en-
tirely in the Indian fashion, with moccasons, leg-
 gings, blanket, &c.; but, being neat, clean, and of
 finer materials than usual, she had not an inelegant
 appearance. These people understood a little
 English; but, at several of their habitations, where
 I called in the course of the day, they either could
 not or would not understand what I said. Some
 of the younger boys and girls laughed immo-
 derately, on my inquiring of them the road; but
 without being able, seemingly, to give me any
 other answer. As I went along, I met with two
 clever-looking Indian young men, carpenters,
 having their tools with them. And under the
 piazza of a commodious Indian dwelling, I saw,
 hung up in that order, the harness and yokes of
 horses and oxen. There was also a good farm
 yard surrounded with barns and stables, the whole
 having every appearance of good management. In the evening I joined my old companion again
 on the Genesee road; having parted with him in
 going to B. S.'s. This night we took up our
 lodgings at a very good inn, kept by a Doctor
 Stockden. Although in the midst of the Oneida
 Indians, and 300 or 400 miles inland from Phila-
 delphia or New-York, the room in which I slept
 was elegantly furnished. It had an excellent
 bed, &c. the floor was spread with good carpet,
 and the curtains of the windows and of the bed
 were of smart Manchester print. I observed
 several stout Indian men sitting in the bar room;
 but they were not suffered to get intoxicated, which
 I thought was greatly to the Doctor's credit, as
 many of the tavern keepers supply them to excess. 11th Month, 23d. We set out early and came
 to a large good inn, belonging to an Oneida Indian,
 who has assumed the name of John Denny . This
 is a large brick house, having four good rooms,
 and a spacious passage and staircase on the ground
 floor. The rooms were not less than 18 feet by
 20 feet, lofty and well furnished. He had an offer
 of 82l. 2s. 6d. a year rent for it, or one dollar
 per day, which he had accepted. This house
 of Denny 's, and that belonging to Stockden ,
 were built by Indian workmen, and do them great
 credit. Denny has two daughters, one of whom
 was lately married to a German, a respectable
 farmer; and her father, according to a promise
 he made, gave him one bushel of dollars as her
 portion; and, I was told, he sometimes says, that
 if his other daughter marries a prudent respectable
 young man, he will give her two bushels of dollars
 for her portion. The Genessee turnpike road passes through a
 large tract of land belonging to this Indian; and
 has so much raised the value of it, that he has
 sold some small lots near the road, as high as 6l.
 sterling per acre, which is a great price in such a
 remote situation. As I sat in John Denny 's house, I was told by
 an intelligent person of the family, that build-
 ing so good a house, and making such improve-
ments had nearly cost him his life, by raising the
 envy and indignation of the neighbouring chiefs.
 Under the influence of these unworthy passions,
 they had called him before one of their council
 fires, and informed him that they had taken his
 proceedings into consideration, and were deter-
 mined that he should have the improvements he
 had made, and remove into some other part of the
 country; that they had observed he was become
 proud, like the white people; that the house he
 had built was very unbecoming an Indian; and
 that he must quit it without further delay. In
 reply, he told them that he was ready to comply
 with the orders of the chief of his nation, provided
 they would make him satisfaction for the great
 expense he had been at; but not otherwise. The
 council broke up without any thing further being
 done at that time. Shortly after another council was held by the
 chiefs; and a messenger was sent to the house
 requiring his attendance; but, fearing some vio-
 lence was intended, he refused to comply. This
 refusal so irritated the chiefs so far that they imme-
 diately sent out four warriors, with orders to put
 him to death; but, observing them as they ap-
 proached the house, he put himself in a posture
 of defence; and, being joined by his brother and
 two white persons who happened to be in the
 house, they were able to make such a defence,
 that, after a sharp contest, in which both sides
 suffered severely, the warriors were compelled to
 fly, covered with blood, being grievously wounded.
 Thus circumstanced, he applied for protection to
 the government of the United States; and abjuring
 his allegiance to the Oneida nation, and taking the
 oaths of allegiance to the United States, he became
 a citizen thereof. In consequence of this conduct,
 an officer of the United States duly apprised the
 Oneida chiefs that John Denny was now become a
 citizen thereof, and of course was under the protec-
 tion of that government; and that the government
 was determined to protect him. The officer also
 stated, that if the Oneida nation committed any fur-
 ther outrage against Denny , it would be considered
 as a reach of the treaty of peace and amity then
 subsisting between them, and they might take the
 consequences, which would fall very heavily upon
 them. Since this period, he has not been dis-
turbed by the Indians; but is going quietly for-
 ward with the improvement of his lands, which
 are rising rapidly in value. My companion, who had come with me from
 near Skenectady, having some business with John
 Denny, the Indian, respecting a mill seat which
 he wished to purchase, I left him, and pursued
 my way on the Genesee road. In the evening I
 reached Moss's tavern, in company with an agree-
 able person, whom I met with soon after leaving
 John Denny's house. In travelling along this day,
 saw some wild deer cross the road. They ap-
 peared more light and a native than those in the
 parks of England; and, in bounding along, seemed
 almost as light as air, being at that time pursued
 by a hunter's dog. Here they are hunted for food,
 and not for sport, as in England. 11th Month, 24th. I travelled along the Genesee
 turn-pike, and passed many fine tracts of land,
 covered with beech, the sugar maple, &c. &c.
 Much of the land in these parts, I believe, could
 scarcely be sold tor 10s. per acre, to be paid for
 in cash; and yet, in the neighbourhood of many
 principal towns in Great Britain, would be
 thought cheap at 100l. per acre. From the many
 local advantages of sod, climate, &c. I think it is
 very probable that the long-extending line of the
 Genesee turnpike-road, may, in a few years, be as
 thickly inhabited as some parts of Europe are at
 this time. In the afternoon I refreshed myself
 and horse at a comfortable inn on the outlet of
 the Lake Schaneatetes, which forms a sort of mill-
dam, covering a space of about 3 miles by 15.
 It was pleasant to observe, on this outlet, a num-
 ber of mills, sufficient to do the work of some
 thousands of Virginia slaves. It is greatly to be la-
mented that the absurd policy of the Southern
 States, has placed these poor creatures as a barrier
 against every improvement in mechanics, &c.
 Vice as well as virtue brings its own reward; but
 the sufferings of those poor objects, on whom this
 false policy of the vicious exerts its baneful in-
fluence, are much to be lamented; and a truly
 feeling mind will deeply sympathize with the un-
happy sufferers, thus deprived of every outward
 consolation that can make an existence in the
 world desirable. Some of the mills were employed in the manu-
factory of cloths. On the banks of this lake are
 many delightful situations, which would be highly
 valued in a country like England. On every side
 they descend with a bold slope, and are generally
 covered with fine timber, excepting here and there
 an insulated plantation, where the ground is
 cleared. These cultivated farms add greatly to
 the beauty and variety of the scenery. After
 taking some refreshment at an inn in the village,
 which is close by the lake, I again mounted my
 horse, and, in the evening, came to an improving
 town, and took up my quarters at Bostwick's
 Tavern. 11th Month, 25th. After passing by the Lake
 Owasco, I arrived at Cayuga, where I breakfasted
 at a very good inn. Cayuga is situated at the
 outlet of the lake of that name, where there is a
 bridge over the lake 1700 yards in extent, which
 I passed after paying 13 1/2d. toll. I was informed
 that on the setting in of the frost, the preceding
 winter, more than 1500 sledges, loaded with pro-
duce, passed this bridge in one day. This lake is
 nearly 40 miles in length, and about 4 in breadth,
 and opens an extensive communication with New-
York, by joining the Mohawk and North Rivers,
 with the exception of a short portage or carrying-
 place, where the vessels cannot pass. In the evening I came to Geneva, a handsome
 town, situated on a high ground on the banks of
 Lake Seneca. This lake also extends about 40
 miles in length, and generally from 3 to 5 miles
 in breadth; and is navigated by sloops. On in-
quiry I found that land sells here from 13s. 6d. to
 27s. per acre, though of very good quality. There
 being a bold shore along this lake, there are,
 as may well be conceived, many beautiful situa-
tions on its banks. This night I lodged at Powel's Tavern, in
 Geneva, which is, in every respect, a most excel-
 lent inn, and capacity of accommodating a large
 number of guests. At this inn, I met with an
 agreeable and entertaining young man, with whom
 I spent the evening. 11th Month, 26th. This day I passed the out-
 let of Lake Canandarque, and the town of that
 name. The lake is nearly equal in magnitude to
 Lake Seneca, and the town extends to its borders.
 These lakes abound with a variety of fresh-water
 fish, particularly salmon and salmon-trout; and,
 what is a little extraordinary, the latter are much
 larger than the former, frequently weighing from
 70 to 80lbs. each. In the evening I came to General Hall 's Tavern,
 where I was well entertained by him and his
 family. The General, though an innkeeper,
 stands very high in the estimation of his country-
men. In the Revolution, though very young, he
 was a Sergeant; and, having little or no property,
 he has been raised to the rank of a General on
 account of his good conduct, and he is now ac-
quiring wealth. 11th Month, 27th. After leaving General
 Hall's, I crossed the Genessee River, and soon
 came to an Indian village, where I called at one
 or two dwellings, wishing to have some conversa-
 tion with the inhabitants; but we were unable to
 make each other understand. Before crossing the river, I passed through
 Hartford, where are several good inns. In the course of the day I met with many
 Indians; and after dining at Ganier's Tavern, I
 came to Beamus's Tavern, where I lodged. The
 last 5 or 6 miles of my way lay in a line through
 the thick forest; the roads, in many parts where
 the ground is soft, being formed of the straight
 trunks of trees, laid close to each other across the
 road, and then covered with earth or gravel; but
 in some parts the latter is neglected, and the path
 lies over the bare timber. At the last-mentioned inn I met with what I had
 often heard of, but seldom, if ever seen, a professed
 atheist, who openly advocated his opinions. To
 all appearance he was sober; yet his arguments
 were extremely weak; indeed the poor man seemed
 to be labouring under great mental darkness.
 Although this was a season of the year in which
 thunder and lightning are not common; yet, it
 was very remarkable, that during the time the
 atheist was delivering his opinions, the thunder
 rolled over our heads in an awful manner, accom-
 panied with vivid flashes of lightning; and, as we
 were surrounded with an almost boundless forest,
 a most solemn effect was produced. This, how-
 ever, he seemed not to regard. I was not disposed to
 think uncharitably of any one, on account of his opi-
 nions respecting religion; yet I confess I was not a
 little perplexed, in my endeavours to make out what
 could be this man's motives, for propagating his
 cold and comfortless doctrines; and was not able
 to devise any common ground of action, unless it
 were a desire to gain celebrity, even through ab-
 surdity. I am aware that it is not in any man's
 power to command his religious opinions; yet a
 great deal depends on our cultivating, or reject-
ing such as offer themselves to our notice. In
 considering the character of this poor atheist,
 who I am told, is a man of good moral con-
duct, I am ready to think that some have suf-
 fered loss, under the apprehension that it is of
 little consequence what our religious opinions are,
 provided a good moral conduct is observed; as if
 religion and morality were the same thing. But,
 alas! notwithstanding a truly religious character
 will ever be found a character of clean moral con-
duct; yet, as in the case of this deluded individual,
 some moral characters may be found, who can
 even deny the God who made them, and thus shut
 up the fountain of every mental consolation; yea,
 even of hope itself. The Indian town I passed through is called
 Cannawagas. 11th Month, 28th. This day I passed through
 Batavia; and, near this place, met an Indian with
 his dog, driving a flock of sheep before him of
 about 30 or 40 in number. In the course of the
 day I met several hunting parties of Indians, and
 came to Vandeventer's Tavern in the evening;
 which I spent with one of the Holland Company's
 Surveyors. He and his companions had been oc-
 cupied in the woods, more than three months,
 and had not in all that time, slept in a house or
 on a bed. He was a young man of stability, very
 agreeable, and well informed. The tract of land
 they were surveying, was purchased by some per-
sons in Holland, and is therefore called the
 Holland-land-Purchase. It consists of 3,500,000
 acres, for which they paid at the rate of 1 1/2d. per
 acre. The principal proprietor is Shimmelpennick.
 This land they are now selling from 9s. to 27s. per
 acre, but purchasers may be accommodated with
 the money remaining at interest, provided they
 settle upon the purchase, and improve the land.
 By their books of surveys, I observed that they
 meted out the tract into divisions and ranges, which
 are numbered; a square of about 10 miles making
 a township; and these townships being subdivided
 into lots for farms. The maps describe every
 stream and mountain, the quality of the land in
 each division, and the timber upon it, in a very
 neat and accurate stile. This surveyor, by living
 so much in the woods, had acquired a good deal
 of the Indian air in his dress, wearing leggins and
 moccasons, as is the manner of the Indians, with
 whose company he was sometimes obliged to be
 contented. 11th Month, 29th. This day I passed over a
 large extent of country, of a very unusual appear-
ance in America. It consisted of what are called
 prairies, or pastures. These are large tracts of
 land, some miles over, where the trees have all
 been leveled with the ground, by some violent
 wind or hurricane; and which the Indians, by oc-
casionally setting fire to the dry grass, &c. have
 kept clear for the greater convenience of hunting;
 and also for planting and grazing. The large trees
 thus blown down, drag up with their roots consi-
 derable quantities of earth, which, as the tree de-
cays away leave a little mound, with a cavity on
 that side of it where the earth was torn up. This
 rugged appearance of the earth through the whole
 extent of these prairies, is a convincing proof of
 the manner in which the ground has been cleared.
 In riding along these pastures, I met several
 parties of Indians, who, from the quantity of their
 baggage, seemed to be pretty wealthy, having
 several loaded horses. Thus far I have not met
 with the least rudeness or improper behaviour
 from these people; though I have several times
 passed individuals, as well as large companies of
 them, when I have been without a companion,
 and might have been an easy prey. Chapter X.
Buffalo Town--Fenning's Tavern--Falls of Niagara--
Black Creek--Fort Erie--Batavia--Vandeventer's 
Inn--Ganser's Tavern--Lake Seneca. Tiaga Point--
Eldridge's Tavern--Elkland's--Muncy--Cattawessy--
 Roaring Creek--Maiden Creek--Bethlehem--Falmouth
--Merion. 29th, of 11th Month, 1805. In riding along yes-
 terday, a few miles from Buffalo Creek, I thought
 I could very distinctly hear the noise of the Falls
 of Niagara, although then about 24 miles from
 that stupendous cataract. The distance at which
 the people in these parts say the Falls may be
 heard, when the wind and other concurring cir-
cumstances are favourable, is almost incredible. I
 met with a reputable looking family, driving a team
 of our fine oxen upon the road, who told me,
 with all the gravity of a man speaking the truth,
 that he sometimes heard them very plainly at his
 residence, 40 miles distant from them; when
 the wind was favourable, or the air calm and
 serene. Last night I came to Crow's tavern in
 Buffalo Town, on Buffalo Creek, just upon its
 outlet into Lake Erie. Crow, the keeper of this
 inn, told me that in cold weather, or when the wind
 suited, the noise of the Falls was generally heard
 in Buffalo; which is a distance of 20 miles from
 them. In this place is commonly a number of
 Indians, many of them being settled in the neigh-
bourhood, some of whom are accounted clever
 farmers. I saw one of these, of the name of
 Little Billy , a chief, accompanied by his squa, going
 into a merchant's warehouse, with whom they did
 business; and I was told, that this Indian raised
 more horses and horned cattle than any other far-
 mer in the neighbourhood; and had, by this busi-
 ness, acquired considerable property. 11th Month, 30th. After breakfasting at Buf-
falo Town, I crossed the Rapids, about three miles
 below Lake Erie. These Rapids are a very con-
siderable River, being at this place nearly one
 mile over, and conveying a vast body of water,
 which passes in its course from Lake Erie
 to Lake Ontario. I observed, as I rode along,
 a number of large fishes that were thrown on
 shore; and saw many ravens hovering about and
 devouring them. In travelling upon the banks of
 the Rapids, for many miles, the roaring of the
 Falls is heard resembling distant thunder. Being
 in Upper Canada, which is under our own govern-
ment, it felt to me something like being in Eng-
land, and occasioned a pleasing sensation. Here
 I observed a number of good farm-houses; the
 pastures and the wheat looked remarkably fresh
 and green, and a large fine herd of cattle were
 grazing in the fields. In conversing I found that
 many of the inhabitants are of German or French
 descent. In the afternoon I came to Fenning's
 Tavern at Chippaway, a town on the Creek of that
 name. Here is a block-house fortification, at which
 an English garrison is stationed. From the windows
 of this tavern, clouds of mist are seen rising from the
 Falls; and the noise of them is so loud, that a per-
 son seems to be close upon them, although they
 are nearly three miles distant. I was informed by
 several of Fenning's family, that the concussion
 occasioned by the descent of so large a body of
 water, is such, that in a still summer's evening, a
 constant tremor of the earth is perceptible; and
 the loose glass in the windows is so shaken as to
 produce considerable noise. 12th Month, 1st. I lodged last night at Fen-
 ning's tavern, where I had as good accommoda-
tion as could be desired. In this family I met
 with a young man, who had his education in our
 society, and is a commissioner or surveyor under
 the English government, for the dispose of lands
 to new settlers. This young man kindly offered
 me his company and assistance, in visiting the
 curiosities in this neighbourhood. However it be-
ing first day, and there being no meeting near, I
 preferred spending the forenoon alone. There-
fore, immediately after breakfast, I walked down
 to the Falls by myself; the tremendous noise, with
 the volumes of spray and mist arising from them,
 being a sufficient guide to the spot. The first
 view of this wonderful cataract, is from the prin-
cipal road, which, though not the most complete,
 is perhaps as beautiful as any; but being from a
 situation which is level with the river above the
 Falls, a considerable part of the cataract is hid from
 the eye. After taking a circuit of about a mile,
 the path leads down a steep precipice, which is
 descended with considerable difficulty, and not
 without the aid of a long ladder, placed there by
 a neighbouring planter, as when for his own con-
 veniency, as for that of strangers. Immediately
 below the cataract, the river is confined between
 two steep rocks that form a deep winding valley,
 through which the waters flow in their course to-
 wards Lake Ontario. This valley is terminated
 by a perpendicular rock of 53 yards in height,
 which runs across, forming angle pointing up
 the river, over which this vast body of water pre-
cipitates itself with astonishing rapidity, and with
 a noise so tremendous that it can scarcely be de-
scribed. On the top of the rock is a small island,
 which divides the cataract into tracts, and in
 such a manner that the greater part of the water
 pours over the rocks at the extreme head of the
 valley; and the rest on one side of it. A little
 above, opposite Chippaway, the river is two miles
 over; but directly above the Falls it narrows to
 about a mile in breadth. I was informed by
 Joseph Ellicot and his brother, at whose house I
 lodged, that they had twice measured the falls, and
 found them to be 158 feet in height, and about
 1800 yards in width from the opposite edges of
 the riverThis includes both Falls and the intersecting
 island, which is about 450 yards over. I was told by the ferryman, that about
 16 miles above the Falls, the river was nearly one
 mile in width, and that, in the middle, it was 40
 feet in depth; and, in common, the stream ran
 at the rate of six miles in the hour. If this is
 really the case, and I have no cause to doubt it,
 the quantity of water passing over the Falls, and
 continually suspended between the top and bot-
tom, may be more than 400,000 tons. If the
 additional height and velocity, gained by a fall
 of 158 feet, be added, the weight of these prodi-
gious columns of water would exceed three mil-
lions of tons. Such an enormous specific gravity
 falling at once into the gulf below may bring the
 accounts or the Falls being heard, under favour-
able circumstances, at the distance of 40 or 50
 miles, within the limits of credibility Arrowsmith in his map of the United States,
 says, this column of water is supposed to descend into
 the column about 65 feet. He also observes, It is said by
 those who have visited this stupendous cataract, that the
 descent into the chasm is very difficult, because of the great
 height of the banks. A person having descended, however,
 may go to the bottom of the Falls and take shelter behind the
 torrent, between the falling water and the precipice; where
 there is a space sufficient to contain a number of persons,
 in perfect safety; and where conversation may be held with-
out interruption from the noise; which less than at a
 considerable distance.. Having reached the bottom of the precipice,
 and approached as near to the cataract, as I could,
 with apparent safety, I sat down, and spent about
 two hours in contemplating this astonishing natural
 curiosity, which is said to be the greatest cataract
 in the world. The tremendous roar arising from
 the Falls, added to the awful sublimity of the
 spectacle of such an uncommon body of water
 rushing headlong from the rock, with the beautiful
 surrounding perspectives altogether form a scene
 which it is impossible to describe. As the morning
 was bright and clear, a beautiful rainbow was
 constantly observable in the clouds of mist and
 spray, that are continually rising from the water
 below. Here I held my forenoon meeting, and
 though no words were uttered, it could scarcely be
 called a silent meeting; the objects before me
 loudly proclaiming the power and majesty of the
 Great First Cause and Creator of all things. In the afternoon I returned to the inn, and, after
 dinner, was invited by the commanding officer of
 the English garrison to drink tea with him, and
 his wife and family, in the fort. I accepted his
 invitation, and spent the evening with them very
 pleasantly. This officer, whose name is Tallant ,
 had spent some time in Sheffield, a few years
 back, and had married his wife at Liverpool; she
 is an agreeable young woman, and well acquainted
 with some friends of Liverpool. They had a fine
 child with them, and upon the whole seemed hap-
 pier than could be expected in such a situation.
 They behaved with great kindness to me; and it
 appeared a gratification to them to entertain an
 Englishman. 12th Month, 2d. This morning I had the com-
 pany of W. S. a minister of our society, belonging
 to Pelham monthly meeting, in this neighbour-
 hood. He kindly invited me to his house, to spend
 a few days with him, but I could not conveniently
 accept his invitation. In the forenoon I paid
 another visit to the Falls, and it being a dark cloudy
 day, the whole view had a more gloomy and solemn
 aspect. There being none of the glare and glitter
 of the sunshine, the eye could rest steadily upon
 it; and, having a pencil and paper with me, I
 took a sketch of the scene. In the evening I came to D. P.'s of Black Creek
 meeting, at whose house I lodged. This is a plea-
sant situation, on the banks of Lake Erie; and
 D. P.'s establishment presents an agreeable spe-
cimen of a Back Wood family. In the room
 where we breakfasted, was a loom for weaving;
 in another apartment were spinning wheels, and
 some of the girls actively platting straw and mak-
 ing it into hats and bonnets for the family. In
 addition to our tea and toast, we had excellent
 broiled fish taken in the Lake, where they easily
 procure great quantities. These persons were so
 situated, that, in their own family, they had the
 means of procuring nearly all the necessaries, and
 even many of the luxuries of life. It was a very
 beautiful sight, to see ten fine orderly children
 sitting round the table with their father and mo-
 ther, who were still in the prime of life, and living
 independently of the uncertainties of commerce.
 The eldest daughter appeared to be about 16 years
 old. One of the sons, who was but a boy, enter-
 tained me with full account of his having lately killed
 a bear, as it was in pursuit of his father's hogs.
 The English government, in order to encourage
 the settlement of Upper Canada, grant to new
 settlers, 200 acres of land for heads of families,
 and 50 acres additional for each child; reserving
 to the crown the minerals and the white pines.
 D. P. gave me the perusal of his grants, from
 which I gathered the conditions. Some little ex-
 pense attends the grants in the fees of office,
 though but trifling, and their tax amount to a
 very small sum per annum for each 100 acres. 12th Month, 3d. I left Black Creek; and the
 morning being clear and calm, the scenery around
 was beautiful. After riding about 10 miles on the
 banks of Lake Erie, I came to Fort Erie, where
 I got some refreshment at the inn, and proceeding
 a little further, I got into the ferryboat, in com-
pany with an old drunken Indian, and his squaw.
 These poor creatures I had seen the morning be-
 fore, at the inn, endeavouring to persuade Fenning,
 the landlord, to exchange spirituous liquors for a
 piece of printed callico, which the Indian had re-
 ceived as a present from the agent of the British
 Government in Canada. I was glad to observe
 that Fenning had the uprightness to refuse taking
 advantage of this poor creature, which he might
 easily have done, as the Indian was then in a state
 of intoxication, and scarcely able to utter any
 thing but Whisko, the name he gave to spirits.
 I was told in Canada, that many thousand pounds
 per annum are expended in presents to the Indians,
 in order to insure their friendship in time of war;
 and that the greater part of these presents are ex-
changed for spirituous liquors, which they use to
 great excess, many times to the loss of their lives,
 and always at the expence of their health. After crossing the Rapids, I passed through the
 Prairies, or large open plains, already described.
 In the evening I slept in an inn kept by a person
 called Esquire Ransom. This is the title given
 to all justices of the peace, and my landlord was
 one, and a miller also. It seemed to me a little
 strange, that men in such low stations should be
 appointed magistrates. On making a remark to
 this effect, they also thought it very strange that
 we should measure peoples understanding by their
 wealth. 12th Month, 4th. I travelled this day mostly
 through the woods, and met with some Indian
 hunters, who behaved with civility. On one large
 tree I saw an Indian painting that had been re-
 cently done. The figures were, Indians, bows
 and arrows, and deer with arrows pierced through
 the neck. The colours were chiefly black and
 red, upon the white ground of the tree where the
 bark was taken off. In passing through these
 woods I saw divers very fine and lofty pines; some
 of them were 12 or 14 feet in circumference, and,
 I suppose, not less than 170 feet in hight. I saw
 many which had been blown down, and, in their
 fall, had, with their roots, torn up mounds of
 earth of considerable height. At night I came to
 Batavia, and took up my quarters at the house of
 J. E. and his brother, where I was kindly and
 generously entertained. We had part of a fine
 haunch of venison for supper, which they told me
 they had bought of the Indians at 1 1/2d. per lb. and
 which was the regular sum paid tor the best parts
 of the fattest deer. In the centre of a good room, in which I slept,
 was fixed one of the most beautiful and curious
 clocks I have ever seen. It was in the form of
 an elegant mahogany pillar, on the capital of which
 were four faces. On one of them was an orrery,
 shewing the motions of the earth and planets
 round the sun. On another face were marked
 the hours and minutes; and on the third face were
 marked the names of 24 musical tunes, with a
 pointer in the centre, which, being placed against
 any name, repeated that tune every quarter, until
 the pointer was moved to another. On the fourth
 face was seen, through the glass, the curious
 machinery of the clock. The value set upon this
 ingenious piece of mechanism was 1000 dollars,
 or 225l. The cabinet work of the casing, as well
 as the engravings and paintings about it, and also
 the movements, although done in a beautiful and
 workman-like manner, had all been executed
 by men, none of whom had served an apprentice-
ship to their respective lines of business. The
 mechanism was executed by the grandfather of
 the kind friend in whose house it stands. This
 family are remarkable for ingenuity, and have ren-
dered essential services to this country, by the
 improvements they have made in the machinery
 of flour mills. One of their progenitors had been
 clock-maker to a King of England, and was con-
sidered a first-rate mechanic in his day. Thus
 propensities and talents sometimes run in families
 from one generation to another. 12th Month, 5th. After breakfast my hospita-
 ble friends shewed me into the land office of the
 Holland purchase, where every thing is arranged
 in great order; and several clerks and surveyors
 are employed. At one of the desks I saw
 the surveyor whom I had met with a few days
 before, in his Indian habiliments, just come out
 of the woods, in which he had been surveying.
 He was now transformed into a smart looking
 clerk, so that I scarcely knew him. In the fore-
noon I left Batavia, and passed several hunting
 parties of Indians. Yesterday, while breakfasting
 at Vandeventer's, I observed them sending out a
 boy to a neighbouring settlement of these people,
 to buy Indian corn; and, on inquiring the cause,
 I was told that in the settlements of the white
 people thereabouts, the corn harvest had generally
 failed. This not having been the case with the
 Indians, the white people were therefore indebted
 to them for support that season. The mistress of
 Vandeventer's Tavern, who is a sober religious
 woman, informed me that she sometimes employed
 the Indian females in needle work, at which some
 of them arc exceedingly clever. On my inquiring
 how it happened that they decreased in numbers
 so fast, she told me that she often had conversation
 on this subject, with the females she employed;
 and, on close inquiry, they would freely confess
 that they used various unnatural means to prevent
 an increase. On the landlady pleading with them,
 and endeavouring to convince them of the sinful-
 ness of their practices, they would sometimes
 reply, that it was impossible for them to carry
 about a child, and also use the skins, &c. which their
 husbands procured in the woods; and which they
 were always forced to carry in the hunting season.
 Such is the affecting situation of these poor Indian
 mothers. In the afternoon I came to Capt. Ganser's Ta-
vern, in approaching which, I observed a young
 Indian female, who was standing not far from the
 road, apparently full of trouble. On coming near
 the house, I heard a noise very much like the
 growling of a wild beast; and on looking into the
 house, I saw a stout young Indian singing a kind
 of war song in his own language. The master of
 the inn told me that he was much intoxicated, and
 had been beating his wife, the female I had just
 seen. She had, notwithstanding, taken from him
 his tomahawk and scalping knife, and put them
 out of his way; and I was informed that it is the
 general practice of the Indian females, to take
 away these instruments of death, whenever there
 is any appearance of intoxication. Even the little
 girls are so instructed, that whenever they see the
 men in the way of being intoxicated, they will slily
 take away these instruments and hide them until
 the drunken fit is over. After leaving this place I passed by a settlement
 of white people, who were mostly Scotch High-
landers. Here I heard a company of drunken
 Indians singing their war song; and, passing on a
 few miles farther I overtook a company of Indian
 women with their children. The women were
 disposed to talk with me, but I could not under-
 stand a word they said, except scos, scos , and too
 scoss; the first of which I knew meant good, and
 the latter, not good. Not long after I parted with
 them I came to Cannawagas, an Indian village,
 near the Genessee river, which I crossed, and, in
 the evening came to Osmar's Tavern in Hartford,
 where I spent the evening with two young men,
 who had also been on a visit to the Falls of Niagara. 12th Month, 6th. This morning I came to
 General Hall's inn to breakfast. This repast con-
 sisted of tea and toast, and broiled venison. In
 the evening I came to Canandarque, and lodged
 at Taylor's hotel. 12th Month, 7th. This morning, as I arose,
 I saw many Indians, both men and women, com-
ing into the town on business with the shop-keepers;
 and, when about mounting my horse, I saw a
 beautiful salmon trout borne by two men upon a
 pole which was put through the mouth and gills
 of the fish. I thought it could not be less than
 4 or 5 feet long, as its tail trailed upon the ground
 when thus carried. In the afternoon I passed through Geneva, and
 dined there at Powel's hotel. In the evening I
 rode about 8 miles on the banks of Lake Seneca;
 and lodged at Captain Knight's tavern, a beautiful
 situation on the banks of the Lake. The landlord
 informed me that he had been a long time in the
 service of Daniel Ofley , a friend of Philadelphia,
 of whom he spoke with respect. 2th Month, 8th. This day I travelled along
 the Bank of Lake Seneca, on which are many
 pleasing prospects. I had, throughout the day, the
 company of a young man, a son of the postmaster
 Newtown; and, in the evening we came to Ely's
 tavern in Hector township. One son of our land-
lord was called Hector, being the first white boy
 who was born in the town-ship, after its settlement;
 he appeared to be about 12 years old. This part
 abounds with deer and black squirrels, of which
 sort of provisions they had plenty in the house; and
 we had some for supper. The squirrels were very
 fat, much more so than I could have expected. 12th Month, 9th. We left Ely's tavern early, and
 passing through a romantic country, where we had a
 view of one of the prettiest water falls I had ever
 seen. It descended, as by an easy flight of steps, down
 the declivity of a mountain, at the foot of which
 is Lake Seneca. I was told that both the white
 inhabitants and Indians kill a great many deer by
 hunting them down into the Lake, on which they
 continue to pursue them in a boat or canoe. The
 pursuers soon overtake the deer, throw a halter
 over the horns, and dragging it to the side of the
 vessel, take the life of the poor animal with a large
 knife, and then drag it on shore. About noon we reached Catherines, a village at
 the end of Lake Seneca; at this village there is a
 wharf, and some business is carried on in vessels of
 about 50 tons burden. After taking some refresh-
ment, we passed on through Catherine's Swamp,
 a deep narrow valley with mountains on each hand,
 covered with lofty trees. Here, as the evening
 approached the valley resounded with the howling
 of wolves; the sound very much resembling the
 noise of a number of large dogs, howling as they
 sometimes do in the night, or on hearing the sound
 of the horn. My companion, by way of encou-
ragement, informed me that he had never heard of
 an instance of either a wolf or a bear attacking a
 man, except in case of themselves or their young
 being first wounded; and from what I can learn,
 I believe this statement to be correct. This evening we came to Newtown and had
 good accommodations at Ellis's tavern, where I
 spent some time with a person of the name of
 Goldbride, who informed me that he was the first
 person who had attempted the navigation of the
 Shoumonge into the Susquehanna, and so down
 to Baltimore and the Chesapeake Bay. In this first
 attempt he sustained considerable loss, and several
 of the boatmen were drowned; but, from the im-
provements made in the navigation of this river,
 considerable business is now done upon it. 12th Month, 10th. I left Newtown, and, tra-
velling along a thinly peopled country, came to a
 small inn kept by one Esquire Wincope , where I
 got some refreshment. The innkeeper was not
 only a justice of the peace, but also a watchmaker.
 Having broken the glass of my watch, he put a
 brass cap over the face as none of his glasses
 would suit. He appeared to be a very ingenious
 artist; and as a Magistrate, possessed a good
 share of useful knowledge. I perceived an edition
 of Burn's Justice on the shelf, with his watch-mak-
ing tools, and therefore I suppose he administered
 justice according to law. Towards evening I
 came to Tioga Point, where is the junction of
 the Shoumonge with the Susquehanna; and took
 up my quarters at Doctor Hopkin's, an acquain-
 tance of my relation J. E. to whose habitation
 at Elklands I was bending my course. This
 night I lodged at the Doctor's, and, next morn-
 ing set out for Elklands. After travelling along
 the Bank of the Susquehanna, and passing by
 Sugar Creek, I came to Dotherly's tavern in the
 evening, on the Banks of Tawandy Creek. Here
 I supped, and the next morning breakfasted on
 wild venison. 12th Month, 12th. This morning I left Dother-
ly's, and rode many miles through the woods, with-
 out seeing one habitation, or meeting one in-
 dividual. The land in general is of good quality,
 and the forest trees are mostly beech, hiccory, oak,
 a species of pine, called hemlock, and the sugar
 maple. From the last, considerable quantities of
 sugar are made; and I saw several sugar camps,
 fenced in, where the sap is collected in small
 wooden troughs, about two feet long, coarsely
 made with the hatchet, and capable of containing
 one or two gallons each. One of these troughs is
 placed at the foot of each tree, and above it a hole
 is pierced, with an inch and a half auger. In the
 hole is fixed a spout, about one foot long, made
 of the elder tree, with the pith taken out. As the
 sap is collected, it is carried to the boilers, which
 are fixed in the camp. Some farmers not only col-
lect sufficient sugar and treacle for their own
 use, but have several hundred pounds weight to
 dispose of to the grocers. After travelling about
 12 miles, I came to a habitation called Eldridge's
 Tavern. The situation of this inn was very soli-
 tary and romantic, in the midst of a very extensive
 forest. The mistress of the house told me that
 her husband and she had lately emigrated from
 London, where they had carried on business in
 Longacre, more than 14 years. In the course of this day I came safe to my
 relation's at Elklands, and found his family well.
 The situation he has chosen is very solitary; his
 nearest neighbour being about one mile off; but
 there are several at about that distance; and some
 of them being of our society, they have united
 and built a meeting-house near them. 12th Month, 13th. I spent this afternoon at
 J. H. 's, whose family were busily employed in
 making maple sugar. J. H. is a minister in good
 esteem, has an agreeable wife and a group of fine
 children, who have plenty of employment in
 clearing and cultivating his plantation in this wil-
 derness, which, however, appears to be an excel-
 lent soil; and the situation being dry and healthy,
 on a rising ground, there is every probability that
 at some future day this may become a property of
 great value. 12th Month, 14th. This day I visited E. H 's,
 a nephew of J. H 's. He, with his wife and one
 fine child, had but lately come into this country,
 and had cleared only a very few acres, but which
 appeared to be well managed, and very produc-
tive. He had just nailed up the skin of a large
 bear, against the side of his house. He had shot the
 beast, whilst in the act of seizing one of his hogs,
 having been led to the scene of action by the
 shrieks of the poor animal, while under the rude
 embraces of the bear. By E. H. 's attention, the
 tables were quickly turned in favor of the hog,
 which was rescued, and was in a fair way of re-
covering from its wounds. 12th Month, 15th. I attended Elklands meet-
ing. During the sitting of it, a company of
 hunters came in, and, leaving their rifle guns at the
 door, behaved in a becoming manner until the
 meeting broke up. 12th Month, 16th. I spent this day at my re-
 lation's. In the course of it I saw two of his
 men cut down a hemlock tree, which is a species
 of pine. This tree was 4 yards in circumference,
 and 50 yards in length; yet it was of but little
 value here. The timber which most abounds on
 this farm is the sugar maple, the beech, the locust,
 and the oak. This day I saw a family from near
 Derby, in England of the name of Lambert, who,
 I understood, were likely to do well. 12th Month, 17th. I rode from Elkands to
 Muncy, across the Allegany Mountains, in com-
 pany with J. H. and one of his neighbours. When
 near the top of the Allegany Mountains, we passed
 the company of hunters who had attended the
 meeting at Elklands. The principal objects of
 their pursuit were deer, although they had no ob-
 jection to meeting with a bear or a wolf. In
 passing down the Allegany Mountains, we came
 near the house of a man of the name of Webster ,
 who had killed 36 bears the last season. In the evening we came to Muncy, where I took
 up my lodgings at W. E.'s, a very hospitable friend.
 This being the evening preceding the monthly
 meeting, upwards of 20 friends lodged at his
 house; and, as far as I could judge, were both li-
berally and comfortably entertained. I was told, by
 a neighbour, that it was not very uncommon for as
 many as 30 strangers to dismount at the door of
 this friend's house, in the course of an evening,
 and for themselves and horses to be all well ac-
 commodated. W. E. has a family of 8 or 10
 children, and his wife, who is an amiable woman,
 sometimes appears in the ministry. Here I met
 with my cousin S. M. who has taken up her abode
 at this place for the present. It affords a fine field
 for the exercise of her talents; and I believe she
 makes herself exceedingly useful. 12th Month, 18th. A deputation from Half-
moon valley monthly meeting, in Maryland, attended
 this meeting at Muncy, with a proposition to unite
 these two monthly meetings into a quarterly meet-
ing; the friends of each of them having to travel
 about 150 miles to their respective quarterly meet-
ings, according to the present arrangement. After attending the monthly meeting, I dined
 and spent the afternoon at W. E's, where I had the
 company of my relation J. E. and that of many
 other friends from the neighbouring meetings. 12th Month, 19th. I spent this day at W. E's,
 who appeared to be much employment as an agent
 in the sale and purchase of lands in these parts;
 and, I understand, he has, by this means, acquired a
 large property. A sale of 100 acres of land was
 made while I was here. The estate sold for about
 330l. sterling, with a tan-yard and some buildings
 and other improvements thereon. It was considered
 well worth the money; although, 10 or 15 years
 ago, 50l. would have been thought a good price
 for the land; it being 150 miles inland from Phi-
 ladelphia; but there are now many good houses
 and plantations scattered up and down in the
 neighbourhood; and the roads are generally in
 good order. 12th Month, 20th. I came this day to Jersey
 town where I slept. In passing through the woods
 this afternoon, I saw a flock of wild turkies run-
 ning along the ground. 12th Month, 21st. This morning I came about
 12 miles on my way on the banks of the Susque-
 hanna opposite to Cattawessy, and breakfasted at
 the house of a friend of the name of Yarnal .
 Observing something very wild and singular in the
 countenance of an infant, which the friend's wife
 was nursing on her lap, I inquired if it was her
 own; on which she informed me it was the child of
 an Indian, and that she had taken charge of it. After breakfast I attended Cattawessy monthly
 meeting. Here I took up my quarters at J. L's,
 a friend I had before been acquainted with.
 J. L. and some of his neighbors were endeavour-
ing to dispose of their property at Cattawessy,
 with a view of removing to the Ohio, the tide of
 emigration now setting in strongly that way. Gene-
rally speaking, it is observable that local attach-
ments are very slight in this country. 12th Month, 22d. I came to Roaring Creek,
 and attended the meeting there. Afterwards I
 spent the afternoon and lodged at W. P's, having
 been kindly invited to his house, by him, when at
 J. L.'s. A neighbour of P.'s told us, that, some-
time before, when hunting deer with his dog and
 rifle gun, he was suddenly alarmed by a large wolf
 running by him. On presenting his gun, he observed
 a considerable number following after as fast as
 they could run, being in all 17 large wolves. They
 all passed by without taking the least notice of
 him; however he fired at the last of them, and
 killed him on the spot; the rest pursuing their
 rout without taking the least notice of their fallen
 companion. In that neighbourhood many friends had sold
 their plantations, and had gone to reside in Upper
 Canada, where they had each a grant of 2 or 300
 acres from the British Government, without fur-
 ther expense than the fees of office, which are very
 small, as already noticed. 12th Month, 23d. I came this day to Miller's
 Tavern, where, in the evening, I observed a hun-
 ter exercising himself in shooting at a mark, with
 his rifle gun. The mark at which he shot, was a
 lighted candle. The accounts that are given of
 the expertness of these shooters, are almost in-
 credible. Most of this day's journey was through
 a rough, stony country, very little of it being in a
 state of cultivation; but the sides of the mountains
 were mostly covered with the flowering laurel; and
 the streams of the Mahony were seen winding
 along the vallies. At the tavern where I dined, there
 was a hunter who, the landlord said, had shot one
 hundred deer that season. 12th Month, 24th. I came on with J. M. to a
 German tavern, about 6 miles from Hamburg,
 where we lodged. At this house I found but one
 person who could speak English, and he being
 out when I rose in the morning, I was unable to
 make the family understand what I said to them. 12th Month, 25th. I came this day to T. L.'s,
 at Maiden Creek. Afterwards, at the house where
 I lodged, I met with a venerable looking man,
 whose countenance was almost lost in a large
 bushy beard, which extended a considerable way
 down his breast. On conversing with him, it ap-
peared he was of the religious society called
 Dunkers. I enquired of him the reason why the
 men of their society were so tenacious of their
 beards, and expected to have heard some motive
 assigned that had at least the appearance of
 weight; but in this I was disappointed; for he
 either could not, or would not assign any other
 than this: That as they believed the practice of
 shaving originated from a desire in the men to
 make themselves agreeable to the women, it was
 unbecoming the gravity of a religious character to
 act from such motives. 12th Month, 26th. I came this day to Beth-
 lehem, a town inhabited almost entirely by
 Moravians. They have here a well-conducted
 boarding-school for girls, where children of all
 persuasions are taught every branch of learning
 that is deemed necessary for females; and, for this
 purpose, the best masters and mistresses are pro-
 cured from different parts of Europe and America. The inn is large and commodious, and conducted
 with a good deal of order and regularity; and is
 not inferior to some of the principal inns in Eng-
 land. Soon after I alighted, I was invited by a
 respectable old man to look over the schools that
 evening. I was glad of the offer, as I had an op-
 portunity of seeing nearly 100 of the girls collected,
 and of hearing many of them repeat a number of
 short pieces in verse and prose. 12th Month, 27th. I remained in Bethlehem,
 and this morning was again kindly invited, by the
 person who was my conductor last evening, to go
 oven the different apartments in the school and
 establishment. I gladly accepted his offer, and
 was pleased with the neatness and order that
 prevailed throughout the whole. This town is
 pleasantly situated on the banks of the Lehigh, a
 branch of the Delaware, which is navigable
 down to Philadelphia. The town was founded by
 Count Zinzendorff, and a large tract of good land
 was purchased here by him, which is now of very
 great value. 12th, Month, 29th. I went to Falmouth, and
 attended the meeting there, and afterwards came
 forward to Spring Mills, where I dined at T. L.'s,
 in company with N. W. jun. who, with T. L.'s
 sister, narrowly escaped with their lives as we
 came from Falmouth. They were both in a single-
 horse chaise, and the horse being in high condition
 of spirits, took fright at something he saw,
 and set off on a full gallop: the rein breaking, he
 became ungovernable, so that one of the wheels
 soon came in contact with a post, on which the
 carriage was immediately whirled over, and they
 were both thrown out with great violence; but
 providentially they received little or no injury. This afternoon I returned safe to Merion, hav-
 ing, in this excursion, travelled about a thousand
 miles. Chapter XI.
 Merion--Cruel murder of a black boy--A few lines ad-
 dressed to the author's family--Preservation of a ship's
 company--Baltimore-Emigrants from Germany and
 Holland--Elkridge--Company of slaves--Washing-
ton--A faithful slave. 12th Month, 31st, 1805, I was employed in my
 commercial concerns in Philadelphia. In passing
 along the market-house in this city, the variety of
 wild animal food exposed to sale was very striking;
 such as bear's flesh, oposums, racoons, squirrels,
 deer, badgers, or ground hogs, &c. &c.; besides
 a great variety of wild fowls. Many of the latter
 were of beautiful plumage, but quite unknown
 to me. 1806, 1st Month, 1st. I returned to Merion,
 and spent the following day there, in writing to
 my family and friends in England. I thought it
 remarkable, especially at this season of the year,
 that, notwithstanding there was a good deal of
 plate in constant use, in the house where I lodged,
 the doors were never locked at night, nor even had
 any locks on them: the only fastening to the prin-
cipal front door, was a nail or a pin put over the
 latch; and even this precaution was not unfre-
 quently omitted. From what I could learn, it was
 generally the practice, in this neighborhood, to
 leave the doors unlocked, although the town stood
 upon one of the most public turnpike-roads in
 America, only about 7 miles from Philadelphia, a
 city containing considerable more than one hun-
 dred thousand inhabitants. 1st Month 3d. I attended Merion Preparative
 Meeting, where a discussion of a rather singular
 nature took place, by which it appeared that, ad-
 joining to Friend's burying ground, there is ano-
 ther grave yard, set apart by Friends, for the use
 of people of other persuasions who incline to bury
 in it. For many years past, a number of the
 neighbouring families had availed themselves of
 the privilege; but not satisfied with burying only,
 they had taken down nearly the whole of the stones
 which composed the wall that separated the two
 grave yards; and had placed them at the head and
 feet of the graves, by way of tomb-stones, and thus
 the two burying groups had nearly become one.
 Many Friends of the Preparative Meeting thought
 it was necessary to build up the partition wall, whilst
 others were for having the remains of this wall
 entirely taken away. However, as it appeared on
 discussion, that persons of other persuasions were
 in the practice of using certain ceremonies at
 their burials, and of erecting tomb-stones, &c. it
 was at length concluded that it would be right to
 rebuild the wall, in order that the peculiar testi-
monies of Friends, in these respects, might be
 more clearly manifested; and the wall was accord-
ingly ordered to be rebuilt. As my commercial and other engagements oc-
 cupied chief of my time during my further stay in
 America, I shall now again make occasional ex-
tracts from my diary, instead of detailing the various
 transactions it records. 1st Month, 5th. I attended Merion meeting,
 and spent the afternoon at H. B.'s, whose neigh-
bour, H. J. handed me a note, containing an
 account of the number of families, &c. in the
 Middle Monthly Meeting of Philadelphia, as they
 stood in the 1st Month, 1800, as follows;-- Total number of Members........... 1330 Families........... 280 Male heads of Families. 160 Men Friends 21 years of age and upwards. 200 In the year 1806, the time when the note was
 handed to me, the numbers in that monthly meeting
 were increased, and amounted to between 3
 and 4 hundred families. 1st Month, 10th. In conversation with H. B. he
 related to me an affecting narrative of a black boy,
 who came under the observation of his brother J. R.
 and resided near his dwelling at Lewis-Town, in
 Delaware State. It happened that the master of
 this poor lad had missed a piece of leather, and he
 charges the boy, who was his slave, with stealing
 it. The boy denied the charge. However, as
 the master was unable to discover what was be-
come of the leather, and looked upon the denial
 of the charge as a thing of course, he was very
 much irritated that he was unable to bring any proof
 against the lad. In order to extort confession, the
 master tied him up by the hands, a considerable
 height from the ground, and fixed a heavy piece
 of wood (a fence rail) to his feet. In this situa-
 tion he beat the poor boy in so unmerciful a man-
ner, that he died under the torture thus cruelly
 inflicted by his brutal master. Scarcely had the
 poor little innocent breathed his last, under
 these torments, before the master's son, smitten
 with remorse on being the occasion of such
 dreadful cruelties, confessed that it was himself
 who had stolen the leather, for which the poor
 little slave had just paid the forfeit of his life.
 However void of the feelings of humanity, it may
 well be supposed, that this hard-hearted master
 was not a little mortified at having wantonly put
 to death a valuable slave; but, such was the pro-
tection which that State afforded these oppressed
 fellow-creatures, that the master escaped punish-
ment, as is commonly the case on occasions of
 murder committed by the whites on their black
 slaves. 1st Month, 12th. On a retrospect of my tra-
 vels in this continent, I could not avoid recalling
 to mind the beauty and grandeur of the surround-
ing scenery, which I have so often admired; whe-
 ther in looking down from the Allegany Mountains
 upon vast forests, extending, on every hand, as far
 as the eye can reach; or in wandering along the
 banks of those extensive lakes in the Genessee
 Country, and Upper Canada, in the midst of
 which, the stupendous cataract of Niagara stuns
 the ear. Equally impressive was the scene in
 sailing on those majestic rivers, the Delaware,
 the Hudson, the Patowmack, or the Susquehanna,
 whose ever-varying banks open prospects extremely
 wild and beautiful; or in traversing those almost
 boundless forests which still remain in an unculti-
vated state, where I often beheld the native Indian
 families rambling in search of game. In all these
 changing scenes, however striking and impressive,
 the recollection of my near connexions at home
 was almost ever with me; and the remembrance
 of these tender ties induced a short address to my
 wife and family, which led me to exhibit the ef-
 fects of divine love in a few additional stanzas.
 Though they may have little to recommend them,
 I insert the lines in this place:-- Tho far divided, still I feel thee near,
 And oft, on thee, remembrance loves to dwell,
 As on a friend well tried, and doubly dear,
 Whose worth my heart can better feel than tell.
 Thro' all thy conflicts, may the hand of power,
 Lead thee in safety on the devious way;
 And match around thee, thro' each varying hour,
 Thy guard and guide unto the latest day.
 Those tender plants the pledges of our love,
 True to themselves, as to known duty true,
 By thy example led, oh! may they prove,
 The joys of virtue; and her paths pursue.
 As oft, at early dawn, or evening's close,
 These widely, waving woods, I pensive trace,
 This tender wish within my bosom flows,
 In love unbounded still by time or space.
 Not this Atlantic's vast extended flood,
 Encircling many an Isle in his embrace;
 Nor these wide forests that have ages stood,
 A shade and shelter to an Indian race;
 Not all the deeps where oceans waves combine,
 With ev'ry forests broad extended space,
 More widely spread than does that love divine,
 Which, as it flows, embraces every race.
 With its mild influence cloth'd, the mind can view,
 All human kind with one benignant eye;
 Whate'er their nation, or whate'er their hue,
 For suffering man the heart can heave a sigh.
 Behold yon slave with wretchedness cast down,
 Torn from his wife and children's weeping eye,
 He toils unpitied in a land unknown,
 And eats his bitter bread with many a sigh.
 Free and untainted, from its source sublime,
 Tho' the pure current of the gospel flows;
 Yet what avails it to this favour'd clime,
 If man, obdurate still, no pity knows!
 Or what avails it, tho' fair freedom rear,
 Her beauteous throne upon a fertile land,
 If there ten thousands still the chain must wear,
 And, unregarded, lift the suppliant hand!
 1st Month, 18th. I spent this day at Philadel-
phia. In crossing the floating bridge at the upper
 ferry, I observed the people engaged in a singular
 kind of harvest, being employed in breaking up
 and taking away large quantities of ice, to lay up
 for summer use. Those who have never visited
 warm climates, can scarcely conceive how pleasant
 the use of ice is, for various purposes of the table,
 in the summer season. 1st Month, 25th. In crossing the Schuylkill on
 the floating bridge, at the upper ferry, I passed a
 Negro boy apparently about 12 years of age.
 Round his neck an iron collar was locked, and
 from each side of it an iron bow passed over his
 head. His dress was a light linsey jacket and
 trowsers, without hat, shoes, or stockings. Soon
 after passing the boy, whom I supposed to be a
 runaway slave, I met a person of whom I inquired
 the reason of the boy is having so much iron about
 him. The man replied that the boy was his, and
 was so often running away that he had used that
 method to prevent him. 1st Month, 29th. After having passed several
 days at Merion, chiefly in writing to my family
 and connexions, I went this day to Philadelphia,
 and forwarded various letters and papers to Eng-
 land. Afterwards I dined at J. A.'s, an English-
 man, who had often kindly invited me to his house.
 He had been sent to this country by D. B. on
 business. J. A. gave me an account of singular
 preservation experienced by the ship's company
 in crossing the Atlantic, when more than 500
 miles from land. His narrative was nearly as
 follows:--Lying awake early one morning, he was
 alarmed by the people's continuing a long time at
 the pump. About five o'clock the Captain came
 down and informed him that the ship had sprung
 so considerable a leak, that he was fearful the
 consequence would be serious, for the water gained
 fast upon them; that in all probability it would not
 be many hours before the vessel would sink, and
 that there was no alternative but taking to the long-
boat. Preparations were accordingly made to
 leave the ship, by providing the few stores and
 necessaries they were able to stow in the boat.
 While this was doing the water increased so rapidly,
 that, early in the forenoon, it filled the lower hold
 and began to make its appearance on the cabin
 floor. About noon all were under the absolute ne-
cessity of leaving the ship, from an expectation she
 would go down every moment. With this awful pro-
 spect before them, the ship's company committed
 themselves to the waves, with scarcely a ray of hope
 of ever reaching the land. The afternoon was spent with
 heavy hearts, being every moment in danger of hav-
ing their boat overset or filled with water. When
 the darkness of the night came on, it added to the
 horror of their situation. However, soon after
 it was dark, about eight o'clock, the Captain stood
 up, and being stiff with long sitting in a confined
 posture, stretched himself out, with his face to-
 wards that part of the horizon, where the moon
 was at that moment rising and casting a stream of
 light along the surface of the waters. This afforded
 him an opportunity of discovering a vessel which,
 providentially, at that very time, was passing be-
 tween them and the moon just as she rose above the
 waves. The prospect of so unexpected a deliver-
ance, gave such new strength to the poor sailors
 at the oars, that, in a short time they came up
 with the ship, and were all taken safely on board. It is difficult to describe the feelings of a grate-
ful mind, on an occasion like this; but from such
 an event, we may all draw this useful lesson: not
 to be too much discouraged even under the most
 adverse circumstances of life. On the 30th of the 1st Month, I left Merion,
 and this day, the 1st of 2d Month, I crossed the
 Susquehanna to Charleston, and thence came to
 Bush. Here I rested about an hour at an inn, the
 landlord of which told me that he was a native of
 London, and had received his education in Christ
 Church Hospital. On coming over to America
 about 60 years ago, he landed near the place where
 Baltimore now stands; but, at that time, the town
 was not begun, altho' it now contains near 30,000
 inhabitants, and is one of the best built towns I have
 seen. Indeed I do not know any in England su-
 perior to it in beauty. In the evening I came to
 an elegant inn called the Stone-house, and the next
 day reached Baltimore, and it being 1st day, I at-
 tended the meeting there. 2d Month, 3d. I attended the quarterly meet-
 ing at Baltimore, which was held in the new
 meeting-house, a very handsome brick building,
 about 50 yards in length and proportionably broad.
 It cost nearly 6000l. This meeting-house is so con-
 structed, that both men and women keep their seats
 when the meetings for worship close, which are held
 previously to proceeding to their respective busi-
 ness. The partition which divides the house into
 two parts, is so constructed, that it winds round a
 windlass with flat sides. The pannels of the par-
 tition are joined to teach other by hinges; are so
 proportioned that they wrap round the windlass as
 truly and regularly as a piece of canvas; and are
 so nicely managed, that in winding up or letting
 down, they make no more noise than a common
 curtain. It is obvious that the first range of pan-
nels at the top, next to the windlass, must be the
 narrowest; and that they must gradually increase
 in breadth to the lowest range, otherwise they
 could not wrap regularly round the axle. The
 gradual decrease in the breadth of the pannels has
 a very pretty effect, when the shutters are down;
 and, contrary to my expectation, I did not observe
 that the meeting suffered any inconveniency from
 the voices of the women, in the other division of
 the house. 2d Month, 4th. This day I visited a friend, his
 wife, and family, who in company with several
 others had lately emigrated from the neighbour-
hood of Pyrmont in Germany. Their object in
 coming to America, was, that they and their chil-
 dren might have more of the company of friends.
 As the wages of the poor are very low in that part
 of Germany, not exceeding 3d. or 4d. per day,
 and the necessaries of life are high in proportion,
 few labourers there can afford to have any thing
 better than coarse rye or barley bread, sprinkled
 with a little salt, to their tea or coffee; and these
 Germans, being all labouring people in low cir-
cumstances, found a great alteration in their situ-
 ation every way, and appeared very thankful for
 the change. 2d Month, 5th. In the course of the day I vi-
 sited a family of friends, who had lately emigrated
 from Amsterdam, of the name of Poppeleim, and
 who had come to this country with the same views
 as the Germans just mentioned; but, being men
 of property, were engaged in business. These
 friends having been eye witnesses of the ravages of
 war, which of late have so desolated some of the
 finest countries in Europe, often expressed their
 thankfulness, in broken English, that they were
 permitted thus to sit down in a land, where peace
 and plenty so generally prevailed. One of the last
 mentioned family, of the name of Valentine , a man
 of a very delicate constitution, and who had suf-
 fered a great deal through bad health, and the
 almost constant state of alarm his country had
 been kept under for years past, by contending
 armies, used sometimes to say to his brothers:
 How thankful ought we now to feel for being
 thus placed amongst friends: we can sleep peace-
 fully in our beds, and, rising in the morning, we
 can pursue our business without interruption or
 alarm; and can sit down in a land of plenty, eating
 our bread in quietness and peace. This evening
 I supped with I. P. an English friend, who some
 years back had emigrated from York, and is now
 well settled in business here. 2d Month, 6th. I attended Baltimore week-day
 meeting. In the afternoon I set out for Washing-
ton city, in company with E. W. and slept this
 night at his house near Elkridge, where he has a
 valuable estate, and a large well constructed flour
 mill. During the continuance of the war car-
 ried on by Great Britain, in this country, he
 was tried with the loss of all his property, and a
 long confinement in prison; but his integrity and
 perseverance rose above all his difficulties; and he
 is now placed in a situation of life far above most
 of his persecutors. 2d Month, 7th. I left E. W's hospitable roof,
 and, in the evening, came to Bladensburg, where
 I had the company of a young surgeon to supper,
 of the name of John Bell , who had accompanied
 the American squadron in the late expedition
 against the Dey of Tripoly, and was at the storm-
ing of the fort and town of Deane, on the coast
 of Africa. In hearing narratives of this kind, the
 mind is often lost in astonishment in the consi-
deration that a man, endowed with reason, can
 bring himself to believe there is any thing meri-
 torious in thus exposing his life and limbs to de-
 struction, and oftentimes when he is a total
 stranger to the causes of the quarrel which he has
 espoused. How lamentable is it that the noblest
 faculties of man should be debased, and the funda-
 mental principles of the christian religion trodden
 underfoot, through the indulgence of ferocious and
 warlike dispositions. 2d Month, 8th. In travelling this day, I passed
 by a company of black slaves, chained together,
 with a white man of a savage countenance, holding
 a large pistol in his hand, driving them before him.
 Behind was a cart, in which were some Negro
 children, who had been torn from their parents by
 this member of civilized and polished society, who
 was now taking them down into Georgia, there
 to remain in abject slavery for life. In viewing
 this painful scene as it passed before me, it was
 almost impossible to avoid noticing how different
 were the countenances on the infant company in
 the cart, compared with that of their unfeeling
 conductor. On the former were seen the smiles
 of innocence, whilst on the latter sat brooding
 a mixture of cruelty and avarice, which no pen or
 pencil can describe. In the afternoon I came to Washington city;
 and on the 9th I attended the meeting at Wash-
ington. After meeting I was kindly invited by
 M. P. to her son-in-law's house, who is Secretary
 of State; but, having engaged to spend the after-
noon elsewhere, I was obliged to decline the offer.
 In the evening I had the company of a native of Fal-
mouth; but, of late years, he has been employed in
 the national dock-yard at Washington city, as naval
 architect. I understood that he had, early in life,
 been invited over to this country Doctor
 Franklin, as one skilled in ship-building. Having
 had his education in our society, it appeared in-
consistent that he should be employed in con-
 structing ships of war; but I found he had forfeited
 his membership. However, I am mistaken, if the
 building of ships of war is not a burden greater
 than he will be able long to bear. A friend of
 the name of J. A. supped with us this evening.
 He was from Providence in Rhode Island, and
 gave us an interesting narrative of a journey he
 took through the wilderness parts of this continent,
 to New Orleans in Louisiana. A considerable
 part of the way he went by water in canoes, hav-
 ing Indian conductors, and passed through many
 Indian settlements, by the chiefs of which he
 was, in general, kindly and hospitably entertained.
 At one Indian village in particular, the chief,
 calling together the inhabitants to a place where
 they held their public meetings, and placing
 Jonathan by his side, made a long harangue. The
 substance of it was, his approbation of the prin-
ciples and practices of friends, concerning which
 he had obtained information at some former pe-
riod, and which he then endeavoured to explain
 to the Indians about him. Amongst other things
 he remarked, it was a self-evident truth, that the
 Power which gave life and breath to man, alone
 had the right to take it. At another settlement
 of Indians, he was agreeably surprised to find
 what great progress was made in agriculture and
 manufactures. He was told, that in this district
 there were 200 looms employed by Indians; and
 at the table of the chief at which he was enter-
 tained, there was every kind of vegetables and
 fruit common in the cities of America; such
 as pease, beans, cabbages, asparagus, melons,
 peaches, &c. At dinner, amongst other things, a
 quarter of roasted lamb was served up; a thing
 hardly to have been expected at an Indian table. 2d Month, 10th. This morning I visited S. B.
 at his office in the Treasury, of which he is the
 head clerk. From the Treasury I was kindly
 conducted by J. P. to his mother's, who was
 then resident with her son-in-law, J. M. the pre-
 sent Secretary of State to the United States. I
 spent a little time pleasantly with the Secretary,
 who was confined to his house, by a hurt he had
 received upon his knee; and although pretty much
 a stranger in the family, I received a kind invita-
 tion to call at his house, whenever business might
 lead me to Washington city. As I had never seen Thomas Jefferson , the
 President of the United States, this hospitable
 family offered to introduce me to him, and the
 Secretary's brother-in-law accompanied me to the
 President's house, where I was received by him
 with a shake by the hand, as though we had been
 old acquaintance; and immediately he entered into
 conversation with as much freedom as if we had
 been long known to each other. After sitting a
 short time in this friendly way, I informed him,
 that as my object in calling upon him, deserved
 scarcely a better name than curiosity, I should be
 very sorry to detain him; especially as his time
 must be fully occupied with the important con-
 cerns of Government; Congress being then sitting.
 After this, rising from my chair, he came forward,
 and again taking me by the hand, bade me farewell.
 From his disregard to all useless forms and cere-
 monies, not excepting these of religion, his ene-
 mies accuse him of being deficient both in religion
 and politeness. But there are men, that have
 seen a great deal of the world, who believe, on
 good grounds, that where true religion and true
 politeness most abound, there we see least of
 forms and ceremonies, and that true religion and
 true politeness generally go hand in hand. Having received an invitation from one of the
 Members of Congress, to attend their sitting, I
 this day went to the Capitol and heard their de-
 bates. I also visited the Hall where the Senate
 was sitting; but as there was nothing very interest-
ing before them, I had not an opportunity of
 hearing their principal orators. After visiting the Senate and House of Repre-
sentatives, I spent a short time in the Supreme
 Federal Court; where the Chief Justice was then
 sitting. Although a great part of the Capitol is
 already finished, in a convenient, and indeed, in a
 superb style, yet a great deal remains to be done
 before the whole will be completed. After dining at Washington, I set out for Balti-
more; and arrived there the 2d of 12th Month,
 accompanied by E. W. and his wife, from their
 own habitation, where I lodged last night. E. W.
 gave me an affecting account of a black slave,
 residing near his house, who is a pattern of inte-
 grity and industry. Such is the confidence re-
 posed in him by his master, that for many years
 past it has been his practice to send this slave to
 Baltimore, with his waggon laden with various
 kinds of produce, the sale of which he intrusts to
 this black man; also the care of receiving and
 bringing home the money; by which means it fre-
 quently happens that large sums of money pass
 through his hands. This service he has performed
 so much to the satisfaction of his master, that he
 scarcely ever ventures to employ any other person
 for these purposes. This faithful slave has a wife and a large family
 of children, who reside in a hut close by his mas-
ter's house. He is allowed a small portion of time
 weekly to do something for himself and family;
 and being frequently employed by the neighbours
 to do little errands for them in Baltimore, he has,
 during many years of care, and frequently by hard
 labour when others were at rest, scraped together
 about 200l. He lately made an offer of all this
 to his master for the freedom of his family; but
 the master absolutely refused to give him his liberty
 on any condition, alleging that he could not meet
 not meet with another in whom he could so confide. The poor man had greatly flattered himself with
 hopes, that considering his time of life, being now
 about 50 years old, a much smaller sum would have
 procured his liberty; and it would indeed have pur-
 chased that of almost any other slave in the neigh-
 bourhood. On finding his master inexorable, his
 disappointment and distress were extreme, and, in
 the anguish of his heart, he determined to leave
 his wife and children, and take the first opportu-
 nity of quitting the country for ever. However
 he concluded first to call on E. W. who had
 always been his friend and adviser, to inform him
 of his resolution. E. W. sympathized with him
 in his affliction, but did not let that suffice; for he
 went immediately to the master, and used every
 endeavour to prevail upon him to accept the
 money offered, and, to grant the man and his
 family their freedom. In order to induce the mas-
 ter's compliance, E. W. represented to him the
 exceedingly ungenerous return he was making to
 the poor man for his fidelity and industry; as the
 only plea urged by this unfeeling master, for his
 cruel conduct, was the uprightness and integrity
 of the Slave!! But, alas! avarice is deaf to all
 arguments except those of self-interest; it was
 therefore in vain that E. W. thus pleaded the
 cause of suffering virtue; for the hardened task-
 master was inexorable to all his reasonings; and
 the poor black man and his family remain in bon-
 dage, living witnesses to what a pitch of obduracy,
 avarice and self-interest can harden the heart of
 man. As nothing that E. W. could say had any
 effect upon the master, he thought it his duty to
 endeavour to reconcile the poor slave to a hard
 lot, and to persuade him not to leave his wife and
 family, as it appeared his full determination to
 have done. In this he was more successful; for
 the poor man concluded to remain with them, and
 endeavour to bear his burden with patience. Chapter XII.
 Baltimore-Gunpowder Falls--Mary Stroud-Civilizing
 the Indians--Negro Boy Sado--Battle of Brandy-wine,
 and events in the neighbourhood--Westgrove--Another
 Negro Boy--Merion--Occurrences there, &c.--General
 Moreau--A Negro Slave who had been liberated--Dr.
 Franklin. 2d Month, 13th, 1806. I attended Baltimore
 monthly meeting, and afterwards dined at J. M.'s,
 a friend who after many years successful applica-
 tion to business, had retired from it, and was em-
 ploying a part of his leisure hours, in promoting
 an extensive work for supplying the town with
 water, in which he has embarked considerable pro-
 perty conjointly with many others. I took a walk
 with him to view the work as it was in progress,
 and, from what I could judge, it will be attended
 with very great expense; but no doubt it will prove
 highly beneficial to the inhabitants of Baltimore. 2d Month, 14th. This day I dined with G. M.
 an ancient friend, who held the office of inspector
 of beef and pork, exported from the Port of Bal-
 timore. The United States not requiring any
 oaths from those appointed to offices under go-
 vernment, it frequently happens that friends accept
 of them. 2d Month, 15th. I visited G. P. one of the
 friends lately come from Amsterdam to settle in
 Baltimore. They had opened a shop here which
 they had furnished with the manufactures of
 France and Germany; and for the short time they
 had been in business, had met with good encou-
 ragement. I was rather surprised to see that in
 some of the shops in this place, as well as in Phi-
 ladelphia, although nearly the whole stock con-
 sisted of the manufactures of other countries, yet
 but little of it was from England. 2d Month, 16th. I attended Baltimore forenoon
 meeting, and in the afternoon attended by J. T.
 and G. M. left that city. In the evening we came
 to H. J. 's, a minister who is well respected in this
 neighbourhood. His house and plantation lie near
 the Gunpowder Falls, and not far from the meet-
 ing which bears that name. I was told of a re-
 markable preservation which the friends of this
 meeting experienced during the revolutionary war
 in America. As our society generally had shewn
 an attachment to the government of England, at
 the breaking out of the revolution, and had, as a
 body, adhered to their peaceable principle in re-
 fusing to take and active part in the struggle, there
 were many amongst the most violent of the revolt-
 ing colonists, who were greatly exasperated against
 friends. However a few individuals in the society,
 were not so careful as in common prudence they
 ought to have been; and several of them were
 accordingly tried, convicted, and executed, as
 traitors to their country. The conduct of these
 of imprudent individuals, increased the disgust of
 those violent partizans, and it sometimes happened
 that innocent friends were dragged from their
 meeting-houses to prison. At that period, a part
 of the American army lay near the Gunpowder
 Falls meeting-house, which, however, did not pre-
vent friends from holding their meetings for wor-
ship. Amongst the troops of which this part of
 the army was composed, there was a Colonel of a
 regiment of dragoons, whose resentment against
 friends was raised to such a pitch of malice, that
 one day, when traversing the country, he came to
 the most extraordinary and cruel resolution of
 putting to the sword, the friends who were then
 collected at their place of worship; considering
 them as no better than a company of traitors.
 Drawing up his men near the spot, he ordered
 them to halt, in order to make arrangements for
 the execution of his dreadful purpose. At this
 moment an awful silent pause took place, in
 which he felt his mind so powerfully smitten
 with conviction that he not only drew off his
 men, but conceived very favourable sentiments of
 the society; and continuing to yield to his convic-
tions, he afterwards joined in communion with
 friends, and continued faithful to the principle of
 truth as professed by them. 2d Month, 18th. This morning we passed by
 Nottingham meeting house, in the neighbourhood
 of which John Churchman formerly resided.
 About noon we came to S. C.'s to dinner, where
 we had the company of Mary Stroud , one of the
 fifteen children of Joseph Gilpin , mentioned by
 by Thomas Chalkly in his Journal, page 313, Edit.
 1766. This friend was in very low circumstances
 at the time Chalkly first visited him, and
 his habitation was a cave by the side of a moun-
 tain; although many of his descendants, at this
 time, are people in opulence in America. The
 cave is now in the possession of one of them, at
 whose house I was once hospitably entertained,
 and who considers it as reflecting honour upon the
 family, rather than as being any disparagement to
 it. Mary Stroud , although about 100 years old,
 still retained her faculties in an extraordinary
 manner, and her observations were often shrewd
 and pointed. 2d Month, 19th. I attended the quarterly meet-
ing at London Grove, the closing sitting of which,
 was one of the largest I ever was at. W. J. and
 R. M. two valuable American ministers, were
 here; the latter of whom appeared in an extraor-
 dinary manner, and being a young man of an
 amiable disposition, and pleasing delivery, he will,
 I trust, continue a useful ornament in the church.
 Yet how frequently do we see the fairest hopes
 and prospects troubled; sometimes by the unwise
 attentions and adulations of the admiring crowd.
 It is greatly to be lamented, that even those who
 in an especial manner are placed as guardians and
 overseers of the shepherds, are not altogether clear
 of fanning that little spark of vanity, which the
 grand enemy contrives, in one form or other, to
 light in almost every human breast. On coming out of the house after the breaking
 up of these meeting, I was surprised at the great
 number of horses and carriages standing on the
 ground before the meeting-house. The space
 they occupied consisted of several acres; and, from
 the best judgment I was able to form, there were
 nearly 200 carriages of different descriptions,
 mostly on springs, and more than double that
 number of horses, exclusive of those used in the
 carriages. The trifling expense at which horses
 and carriages are kept in the country parts of Ame-
 rica, enables even those in slender circumstances
 to keep them, which certainly is a great privilege
 in warm climates. After this meeting I took my
 leave of several of my friends, never expecting to
 see them again on this side of the grave. I spent part of this afternoon with J. P. an agree-
 able friend, who had devoted some years to the in-
 struction of the Indians in letters and agriculture,
 &c. and had been long amongst them in their settle-
 ments. He related a variety of little anecdotes
 concerning these untutored sons of the forest, cha-
 racteristic of their habits and manners, from which
 it seemed, that the restraints and confinement of
 mechanics and labourers in civilized life, are con-
 sidered by them as the greatest of human miseries;
 and that one nation should even wish to spread
 their manufactures amongst other nations, and thus
 become labourers to those for whom they have no
 knowledge or regard, was, in their eyes, the height
 of human folly. As the plan in which J. P. was engaged did
 not profess to interfere with the religious concerns
 of the Indians, they were not often a subject of
 conversation with; yet the Indians would some-
 times observe, that they should have no objec-
 tion to attending Friends' meetings, if it were not
 too long to sit doing nothing, without the privilege
 of a pipe. Instances, however, have occurred,
 amongst such untutored individuals, wherein they
 have evinced conviction that the Great Spirit may
 be known and worshipped in silence. On my arrival at S. P.'s, I found his wife in a
 poor stage of health; and although considerably
 reduced by sickness, yet her natural lively and
 cheerful disposition seemed to rise superior to her
 bodily affliction. She made respectful mention of
 number of European friends, who had visited
 her habitation; particularly M.R. and J.W.;
 the manners of the latter, and her dialect, in broad
 Irish, had entertained her very much. While in this family, I could not avoid noticing
 the innocence and simplicity of a little Negro
 boy, named Sado ; and on my making some in-
quiry, Martha Painter gave an account to the
 following effect:--Importing Negro slaves from
 the coast of Africa, is contrary to the laws of the
 United States, notwithstanding some of the
 Southern States allow the keeping of slaves, and
 it sometimes happens that an American ship is
 detected transgressing the law, in which case both
 ship and cargo are confiscated. Not long since,
 two American ships with cargoes of slaves were
 seized by a frigate belonging to the United States,
 and brought to the Port of Philadelphia, where
 they were both condemned; but the poor black
 people on board were put under the care of the
 Society instituted for the Abolition of the Slave
 Trade, and were all provided with places as ser-
 vants or apprentices. Amongst the latter was
 little Sado , who was put out to S. P. Although
 he was treated with the greatest tenderness, yet he
 was often seen weeping at the recollection of his
 near connexions. He said, that himself and sister
 were on a visit to a relation's, and that, after the
 family had retired to rest, they were suddenly
 alarmed, in the dead of the night, by a company
 of Man-stealers breaking into their habitation.
 They were all carried off towards the sea, where
 they arrived at the end of three days, and were
 confined until the vessel sailed. Sado 's sister was
 placed in a situation near S. P.'s, which afforded
 them frequent opportunities of seeing each other.
 Not long after this Negro boy had been brought
 into S. P.'s family, he was taken ill of a bad fever;
 and, for a time, there appeared but little hopes of
 his recovery, although the best medical help was
 obtained, and every kindness and attention was
 shewn to him. While he laid in this state, M. P.
 inquired of him, if there was any thing he wished
 to have, or if there was any thing she could do
 for him; as they desired to do every thing in their
 power to relieve him. In reply, he expressed his
 thankfulness for their good intentions, but said,
 There was nothing they could do that would
 cure him; yet if he was at home with his mother,
 she would soon make him well; adding that there
 was a plant grew in his country, the leaves of
 which she gathered, and poured hot water upon
 them, covered his body all over with them, and it
 always soon made him well. Martha desired him
 to prescribe the plant, and they would endeavour to
 procure it. He replied, It was not to be had in
 this country, for he had often looked for it in
 vain. There being now scarcely any prospect of his
 recovery, his mistress was desirous of administer-
 ing some religious consolation, and observed to
 him, as he had always been a very good boy, she
 had no doubt that if he died at this time, his
 spirit would be admitted into a place of everlast-
 ing rest and peace. On hearing this, he quickly
 replied, I know; that if I die I shall be happy;
 for as soon as my body is dead, my spirit will fly
 away to my father and mother, and sisters and
 brothers, in Africa. The boy recovered. His
 good conduct had gained him the favour and re-
 spect of the whole family, and I have no doubt
 that the care bestowed upon his education, will,
 in due time, afford him a brighter prospect of a
 future state, than that of returning to Africa. I have sometimes turned my attention to the
 orderly conduct, and pleasing dispositions of some
 of these Black children, whom I have seen in
 friends families. On considering that they have
 been violently torn from their near relatives and
 friends, and exposed to all the horrors and sick-
 ness of transportation in a slave ship; I have
 compared them with the kidnappers, and with the
 owners, captains, and crews of slave ships, who
 assume the name of Christians, and, with the
 greatest self-complacency, make pretensions to
 being governed by the precepts and example of
 Christ; whilst they give the appellation of Hea-
 thens and Infidels to these poor unoffending Negro
 children, as a cover to their cruelty. In such a
 contemplation and comparison, the mind is over-
 whelmed with sorrow, at the idea of the atrocity
 and darkness in which human nature may be in-
 volved, by the unbounded thirst of gold. 2d Month, 20th. I left S. P.'s hospitable roof
 accompanied by his brother-in-law J. T. The
 ground I travelled over this day was the scene of
 much bloodshed during the revolutionary war; it
 being that part of the country where the bat-
 tle of Brandywine was fought. My companion
 was present at the time, with several other
 friends, who were led forth by the dictates of hu-
 manity, in order to lend some assistance to the
 poor wounded and dying soldiers, that lay scat-
 tered over the fields, through an extent of several
 miles. On this occasion friends meeting-house of
 Birmingham was converted into an hospital, in
 which many of the poor mangled creatures breathed
 their last, and where many more suffered the am-
 putation of their limbs, with many other pain-
 ful operations concomitant with the carnage of
 war. Amongst those who ended their earthly
 course in this meeting-house, were several officers,
 who were buried in friends burying ground. One
 of them, a near connexion of the Duke of North-
 umberland, was a young man of the name of
 Percy, whose amiable and exemplary conduct
 under his severe sufferings, had procured him the
 particular regard and esteem of the friends about
 him. The shocking situation of some they found
 in the fields, would not bear description; in others
 who lay lifeless on the ground, it was some time
 before any wound could be discovered, a single
 bullet having passed through some vital part;
 others had the fleshy part of a leg or a thigh torn
 to pieces by larger balls, and had sunk under the
 loss of blood. These scenes of horror were followed by others,
 if possible, still more revolting to human nature.
 Those who have travelled much in America must
 have observed the deep channels that are in many
 places worn in the declivities of their fields, owing
 to the great depth of soil and the heavy showers
 to which they are subject in that country. It so
 happened that the dead bodies of many of those who
 were slain in this battle, were interred in these chan-
 nels, and remained so for some time undisturbed;
 but, afterwards, some heavy rains falling, the earth
 was washed away, and many of the dead bodies
 were again exposed to view in a putrid state. After spending an hour or two at West Chester
 we came to S. J.'s, where we dined and spent the
 rest of the day. At this friends house, General
 L'Agneau made his head-quarters for some time
 before the battle of Germantown, where he lost
 his life. That part of the English army under his
 command was encamped in S. J.'s fields and
 orchard, round about the house. 2nd Month, 21th. This morning I came to J. K.'s
 habitation and spent a few hours with him in con-
 versation respecting my friends in England, he
 having lately returned from a visit to that nation. 2d Month, 22th. I slept last night at W. T.'s,
 and this day went over J. T.'s estate, where I vi-
 sited the old family mansion, which was erected
 on the first settlement of this country. In many
 parts of America, and particularly in this neigh-
 bourhood, it is the practice of many farmers to
 reserve about 15 or 20 acres of land for hay,
 which they continue to mow from one generation
 to another, many of them laying on but little or
 no manure; but taking the advantage of situation,
 where the land may easily be irrigated or over
 spread with water from time to time. By this
 means they obtain heavy crops of grass without
 the aid of manure, and thus supply themselves
 with winter fodder at an easy expense. On in-
 quiry of W. T. and P. P. two very respectable
 farmers and land-owners, they informed me that,
 upon an average, they got about 2 1/2 tons per acre
 each year, upon this plan. The land usually
 chosen for this purpose is not a dead flat or
 marshy land, but commonly the two sides of a
 narrow valley of easy ascent on each hand, having
 a small stream running through the bottom. When
 the land is to be watered, the stream at the upper
 end of the valley is diverted from its natural bed,
 and is conducted in narrow channels along each
 side of the valley on as high ground as the head
 of the stream will admit; and, by placing obstruc-
 tions to the current of the streams, in different
 parts of the artificial channels, the water continues
 to trickle down the sides of the valley, so as plen-
 tifully and regularly to water the roots of the
 grass, but not in such quantities as to cover the
 herbage. In the course of the day we paid A. S. a visit,
 and in that evening came to A. H.'s, another
 brother-in-law to J. T. Here I met with one of
 the oldest copies of the English Bible I had ever
 seen; it was translated by Coverley, at a period
 when the sacred volume was not divided into chap-
 ters and verses, and both the language and the
 type bore evident marks of great antiquity. The
 word shoes I noticed was always spelled shoon,
 and righteousness was always spelled rightwiseness,
 and in many other respects the language was so
 very different from what it is at this day, as scarcely,
 in many places, to be like the same tongue. During part of the revolutionary contest, this
 friend's house was the head-quarters of General
 Stirling, and, sometimes, consultations were held
 here by the American General Officers, at which
 General Washington attended. While the armies
 lay in this neighbourhood, the farmers suffered
 severely in their property; one instance of which
 this friend mentioned to me, as descriptive of the
 situation of things amongst them;--A near neigh-
 bour, who had a considerable stock of cheese on
 hand, which it was found needfull to hide to pre-
 vent being plundered of it, was in hopes an op-
 portunity might occur when it might be sold at a
 fair price, and to a regular customer; but it so
 happened, that some officers who were encamped
 in the vicinity, had got some information respecting
 this stock of cheese. One of them sent a servant
 to the mistress of the house, who stated, that his
 master was extremely anxious to taste one of her
 cheeses, having been told that she made a better
 article than any of her neighbours, and that not
 having tasted any of a long time that was fit to
 eat, he would freely give her a guinea for a small
 one. However the servant was not able to ascer-
 tain the fact, and of course returned without
 accomplishing his errand. Upon this the officer
 went himself to the house, and, after a deal of
 persuasion, prevailed upon the mistress to furnish
 him with two or three, for which he very freely
 gave her a guinea each. He had watched the mistress so closely, that he
 discovered where the stock of cheese was laid up,
 without appearing to have observed whence she
 brought the cheeses for him. After many expres-
 sions of thankfulness, that be had been supplied
 with such an excellent article, he returned to the
 camp; but the result was, that, next day, a party of
 armed soldiers came to the house, and, after forci-
bly taking the money which the officer had paid the
 day before, they went to the room where the
 cheese was kept, and carried the whole out, with-
 out paying any thing for it. Such is the morality
 of war! 2d Month, 23d. We rode to W. J.'s house,
 at West Grove, to breakfast; and after attending
 their meeting, spent the afternoon at his house, in
 pleasant conversation with himself and his wife,
 who is an agreeable cheerful woman. W. J. gave
 me a little history of the emigration of his family
 into this country, from Ireland:--Being in very
 low circumstances, they were glad to put up with
 what way then considered the worst lot of land in
 that part; and on their first coming here they were
 visited by a friend who was already settled, and
 had got his house built, and his land in a state of
 cultivation. This friend being touched with com-
passion, went home and told his own family how
 deeply he felt for the poor Irish family, who, he
 feared would never be able to get bread to sup-
port themselves, the land was so very indifferent;
 and taking out a bushel of malt, sent it to them to
 make a little beer to support their spirits under
 their discouraging prospect. Such is the altera-
tion that has taken place, that, at this time, the land
 which was then thought insufficient for the support
 of one family is now divided into several planta-
tions or farms, each of which is considered as
 amply sufficient for the support of a family in
 ease and even in affluence. One of these plan-
tations is that now belonging to W. J. and on
 which he resides. This night I lodged at P. P.'s. Here also I
 met with a smart little Negro boy, who had been
 stolen from his parents in Africa, and was placed
 in this family by the Abolition Society. He had
 the character of being a boy of a bright capacity;
 and although not very communicative to his
 master and mistress, he was open and free with
 the children of the family, and would often, by
 the fireside in the winter evenings, recite to them
 the mournful story of his being made captive; with
 many shocking circumstances that attended his
 transportation in the slave ship; from which he
 was liberated by an American ship of war. After breakfast I set out for Merion, in com-
 pany with I. J. and in my way passed by the front
 of Westown school. By his school is managed upon
 a plan somewhat similar to that at Ackworth, but
 with this difference, that the children of friends in
 affluent circumstances are not excluded. The
 number of scholars in the house is generally
 about 200, including boys and girls. In the evening I came to Merion where I found
 letters from my family and friends, as late as the
 27th of 12th;Month which contained the pleasing
 account of their being all well. 3d Month, 2d. Being the first of the week I
 attended meeting in the forenoon, and spent the
 evening at H. B.'s, where I had the company of
 his father and mother, and R. J.; the latter being
 far advanced in years, of an active lively disposi-
 tion and having a retentive memory, would fre-
 quently favour me with little anecdotes of the first
 settlers in the neighbourhood, which he had re-
 ceived from the parties themselves, in the early
 part of his life. Amongst the rest he related a
 little story which he had heard from an ancient
 friend at whose house he had lodged, of the name
 of Rebecca Wood. When a little girl she used
 sometimes walk from Derby, where she resided,
 to Haverford meeting, the distance of a few miles.
 One day she was walking along she was over-
 taken by a friend on horseback, who proved to be
 William Penn . On coming up with her he in-
 quired where she was going; and on her inform-
 ing him, he, with his usual good nature, desired
 her to get up behind him; and, bringing his horse
 to a convenient place, she mounted, and so rode
 away upon the bare back. Being without shoes
 or stockings, her bare legs and feet hung dangling
 by the side of the governor's horse. Although
 William Penn was at this time both governor
 and proprietor, he did not think it beneath him
 thus to help along a poor bare footed girl on her
 way to meeting, and notwithstanding the maxims
 and customs of the world, these little kind offices
 to those in low stations in life, were so far from
 lowering him in the estimation of those he was
 appointed to govern, that there perhaps never was
 a governor, who stood higher in the opinion of
 those governed by him, than William Penn did. In repeating this anecdote, the old friend ge-
 nerally concluded her story with the observation,
 that, there were no such governors now-a-days. 3d Month, 5th. I had the company of O. and
 J. J. the latter of whom related to me a tran-
 saction of his, when but about 14 years of age,
 which manifested a considerable degree of firm-
 ness in one so young. At the time of the revolu-
 tion, a neighbour was condemned to death tor his
 attachment to the English government. Under
 these melancholy circumstances, the near connex-
 ions of the sufferer, were anxious that the body of
 their unhappy relative, should be decently interred
 in the family burying ground at Merion; but con-
 sidering to what pitch of indignation the minds
 of the people were raised against him, it appeared
 to be a very hazardous task to take the body from the
 place of execution, surrounded by the great crowd
 of spectators who were there assembled, to be
 witnesses of the last struggles of their devoted
 countryman. However, J. J. although but a boy,
 undertook the task, and proceeding through the
 multitude, without any attendant, went up to the
 executioner, and demanding the body, brought it
 off in a hearse, himself being the driver; and con-
 ducted it safely to the relatives of the deceased.
 His youth and the singularity of the circumstance,
 seemed to command the respect of the multitude. 3d Month, 8th. I came from Philadelphia to
 Merion. The sun now having considerable power,
 I was struck with the loud chirping noise, that
 issued from every little pond or pool of water, as
 I passed along, which, I was informed, proceeded
 from a species of lizard that inhabits those places,
 and is commonly the first of the animal creation
 to usher in the spring. The chirping of these
 lizards in the spring, and of the tree-frog in sum-
 mer, form no inconsiderable part of the rural
 sounds we are accustomed to hear in America;
 to which might be added the notes of various other
 kinds of frogs; particularly of the deep toned bull
 frog, which in a still summer's evening, when the
 wind has been favourable, I have sometimes heard
 at the distance of more than a mile. Although
 these sounds are strange to an English ear, yet
 there is something in them which is far from be-
 ing unpleasant. 3d Month, 16th. In the forenoon I attended
 Merion meeting, and spent the afternoon at R. J.'s,
 who entertained me with an account of the man-
 ner in which Phineas Pemberton and his wife,
 first became acquainted with each other; and they
 being the first of that family who came to America,
 the story was interesting:--Phineas , when a boy,
 was an apprentice to a grocer in Manchester, and
 I believe the house in which he lived is still stand-
 ing, as J. P. one of his descendants, on his late visit
 to England, had the curiosity to take a look at it,
 when in that neighbourhood. It happened, on a
 market-day, that whilst Phineas was serving the
 customers, there came in a country friend and his
 daughter, of the name of Harrison, to purchase
 groceries for the family; and as they waited to be
 served, the daughter, who was but a little girl,
 employed herself in eating cherries out of a small
 basket she had brought with her. As soon as
 Phineas was at liberty, he furnished the friend and
 his daughter with the groceries they wanted; and
 the little girl having some of her cherries to
 spare, gave them to Phineas. Pleased with her
 generosity, he insisted upon her taking a paper of
 raisins in return. From this trifling circumstance,
 an attachment originated which ended but with
 their lives. They were united in marriage when
 of a suitable age; soon after which they emigrated
 to America, and afterwards became the heads of
 one of the most respectable families in Philadel-
 phia. The young woman's father also went over
 to America with them. In recurring to the little story of Phineas Pem-
 berton, we have an example of the instability of
 things in this changing scene. It is but a very
 few years past that several branches of this family,
 seemed to stand foremost in rank both in the so-
 ciety, and in the American world in general; and
 there was every probability that the name and
 family might continue numerous and respectable
 for many generations. But, if I recollect right, at
 the time I am writing, James Pemberton , who is
 now about 84 years of age, is the only remaining
 branch of the family who bears the name; and if
 he should be the last, it may be truly said, that the
 sun of the family has gone down in brightness.See Note, page 46. 3d Month, 25th. I came to Philadelphia, where
 I supped and spent the evening at John Elliott 's,
 an ancient valuable friend, a native of Leicester.
 He left England in early life, along with his pa-
 rents, who, having imbibed favourable sentiments
 of America, had bidden a final farewell to their
 native land. In the recollection of this friend, I
 have often thought that the general tenor of his
 life and conversation, possessed as much of what
 I should call sterling Christianity, as I have ever
 observed in any other man. In him were seen the
 innocence and simplicity of a child, although he
 was a man of considerable literary attainments and
 reputation in the world. Through life he had
 been an active and able advocate of the enslaved
 Africans; and, though not backward in giving a
 sentiment on the passing public transactions of the
 day, he was far from being a busy-body in matters
 of this kind; and such was the religious subjection
 into which his mind was brought, that, in lamenting
 or approving the measures of those in authority,
 it was done with a meekness and calmness, which
 evinced that he was biassed by no narrow, party
 spirit in the observations he made; but that they
 were the effusions of a heart which felt and
 cared for all. Being an industrious man, and suc-
cessful in business, he had the means, as well as
 the inclination, of serving his friends and strangers.
 Frequent opportunities of the latter offered in this
 city, where emigrants from almost every nation
 in Europe, are often arriving. 3d Month, 26th, I was accompanied by John
 Parish to A W.'s, at whose house we supped and
 spent the evening. A. W. some years since, ac-
 companied J. P. on a religious visit to friends at
 Pyrmont, and was with him in that place when he
 departed this life, in the assurance of a happy
 eternity. On A. W.'s return, he had to pass
 through a part of the country occupied by the
 allied army, then engaged in its operations against
 France. He was seized and taken before the
 commanding officer, who took great offence at his
 plain language, and not taking off his hat; and,
 after a good deal of abusive language, struck him
 to the ground. Afterwards, when A. W. had time
 given him to explain who and what he was, the
 General appeared extremely ashamed of his con-
duct, and extorted a promise from him, that he
 would not expose him on account of this cruel
 and unworthy behaviour towards a peaceable
 stranger. For this reason, in repeating the story,
 he always avoided giving the name of the General. After passing the limits of the German lines,
 he soon came within those of the French army,
 commanded by General Moreau , and was taken
 before him by some of the soldiers on the out-
posts; but here he was treated with great kind-
 ness, and a passport was given him, which enabled
 him to pursue his journey without further molesta-
tion. About the time that I am writing, General
 Moreau being exiled to America by the French
 Emperor, A. W. has had an opportunity of ac-
knowledging, and of returning his kindness. The
 General has taken up his residence about 20 miles
 from Philadelphia, having his wife and family
 with him. Several friends paid a good deal of
 attention to them, on a count of his humane and
 generous conduct. Thus this little act of genero-
sity to an unprotected stranger, proved the cause of
 many kind attentions to himself and family, when
 the scene was changed, and when he, from being a
 victorious General, commanding a powerful army,
 was become an exile in a foreign land. This little
 history affords a useful lesson to men in power. 3d Month, 27th, was employed in writing to my
 family and friends in England; and, with my let-
ters I forwarded a number of John Parish 's
 pamphlets on the Slave Trade, at the author's
 request. 3d Month, 29th. I supped and spent the even-
 ing at R. B.'s, at Merion, and observed in his
 yard a Negro of an interesting countenance. On
 inquiring who he was, H. B. informed me, that a
 few days ago the poor man came up from Dela-
 ware State, and, at the recommendation of his
 brother, H. B. had taken him into his family for
 protection. At the same time he related to me
 the following narrative:--Some time since the
 master of this black slave died, leaving behind him
 a widow, and one son, a profligate young man.
 As the master lay on his death-bed, he called
 this faithful slave to him, and taking him by the
 hand, told him that he felt his end was fast ap-
proaching, and that his mistress would have little
 to depend upon for her support, except what she
 might be able to make of his labour; and there-
fore he begged that he would continue to be faith-
 ful to her, after the master should be laid in the
 silent grave. In a very short time the master
 died, and the slave continued his services to his
 mistress, and much to her satisfaction; enabling
 her, for several years, to live comfortably, and also
 to administer to the wants of her profligate sun;
 so that, under a grateful sense of his worth, she
 determined to make this black man free, and also
 his family, consisting of a wife and three children.
 A writing was accordingly drawn up, and duly
 executed, whereby they were all liberated; and the
 happiness of this family, under these circumstances,
 may be more easily conceived than described. Their industry and sobriety, manifested whilst
 in bondage, now had its full effect; and all went
 on happily and comfortably, until the profli-
 gate son, before mentioned, who had by idleness
 and drunkenness reduced himself to extreme ne-
cessity, conceived the cruel plan of invalidating
 the indenture with his another had executed, to
 give this worthy Negro family their liberty; and
 actually sold the father, mother, and the three
 children, to a company of Georgia slave dealers,
 who were then in the neighbourhood. They being
 conscious that the young man had no right thus
 to sell the family, had determined to take them
 away in the dead of the night, to preclude the pos-
 sibility of applying to any magistrate for pro-
 tection. However, the Negro had got some
 intimation of what was going forward, and, in
 consequence, kept loaded fire arms in his house,
 being determined to shoot any person who should
 attempt to break into his habitation. These pre-
 cautions being known to the slave dealers, they,
 for some time, did not venture to molest him;
 but he and his wife being soon wearied with liv-
ing in this state of anxious suspense, consulted a
 fellow Negro, in whom they placed confidence, as
 to their best method of proceeding; and it was
 concluded that the whole family should leave that
 part of the country, and settle in Pennsylvania, as
 soon as possible; where they would be out of the
 reach of the slave dealers. No sooner was this determination come to, than
 their perfidious friend, for the sake of a trifling
 reward, went to the Georgia slave traders, to betray
 the whole family into their hands; and, in the mid-
 dle of the night, they were seized, bound, and forci-
bly taken from their comfortable habitation, in order
 to be put on board a small sloop which lay in the
 river, near at hand. On coming near the river, the
 poor black man, who had been placed on horse-
back, behind one of these Georgia men, suddenly
 broke loose, and leaping from the horse, plunged
 headlong into the river, which he quickly swam
 across, and, getting into the woods, escaped from
 his inhuman pursuers. On this occasion, the agi-
 tation of the poor wife and children was beyond
 expression; and to silence the shrieks and cries of
 this miserable family, these unprincipled men beat
 them unmercifully; and the last with the poor
 Negro man saw of this scene, as he fled into the
 woods, was their beating his wife upon the head,
 in the most brutal manner. To a person who has
 not been an eye-witness to such scenes, it may ap-
pear incredible that transactions of so attrocious
 nature, could occur under a form of government
 like that of the United States; but the slavery of
 the Negroes having long since been introduced,
 the evil consequences resulting from it have not
 yet been rooted out of the Southern States; where
 a warm climate seems to have enervated both the
 bodies and the mind of the white inhabitants. It
 is, however, to the credit of the people of Pennsyl-
vania, and the States to the eastward and north-
ward of them, that almost every thing in their
 power has been done, to induce their southern
 neighbours to relinquish the infamous, and de-
basing system of personal slavery; and there can
 be scarcely a doubt, if they persevere in their
 honourable endeavours, that they will, in the end,
 be crowned with success. In conversation this evening with Samuel Bryant ,
 a son of the Judge of that name, he mentioned
 that Doctor Franklin was an intimate friend of his
 father and that in consequence there was a fre-
quent intercourse between the two families.
 Amongst a number of anecdotes relating to the
 Doctor, he recited one, respecting his religious
 opinions, which appeared to me worth preserving:
 It is as follows:--At the time the Doctor lay
 near on his death-bed, he was visited by a young man
 who had a great respect for his judgment in all
 things; and having entertained doubts in his own
 mind, as to the truth or the scriptures, he thought
 that this awful period, afforded a suitable oppor-
tunity of consulting the Doctor on this important
 subject. Accordingly he introduced it in a solemn
 weighty manner, inquiring of the Doctor what
 were his sentiments as to the truth of the scrip-
tures. On the question being put, although he was
 in a very weak state and near his close, he replied,
 Young man! my advice to you is, that you culti-
 vate an acquaintance with, and a firm belief in the
 Holy Scriptures; this is your certain interest. Chapter XIII.
 Woodside.--Account of Captain H.--A Substitute for
 Soap.--Yearly Meeting at Philadelphia.--Merion
 Meeting-House.--Violent Tempest.--Dreadful Mas-
sacre of the Conestoga Indians. 2d of 4th Month, 1806. I spent this evening at
 O. J. 's country house, in the vicinity of Merion.
 It is a large handsome building, beautifully situ-
 ated, and commanding a fine prospect of the
 Delaware for many miles below Philadelphia.
 The farm is under the direction of a free Negro,
 and appears to be well managed. 6th of 4th Month. I attended Merion meeting,
 and spent the afternoon at Woodside. This is a
 beautiful spot, commanding a fine view of Phila-
 delphia and of the country round it, although
 abroad 5 or 6 miles distant from that city. This
 was formerly the residence of Governor Mifflin .
 It has since been much improved and beautified,
 at considerable expense by the present proprietor
 G. A. Yet one of the greatest ornaments about
 the house, is his worthy father-in-law, John Parish .
 Though far advanced in life, and grown old in his
 services to the Negroes and Indians, whose steady
 advocate he has been, a long series of years, yet his
 conversation is still as lively and interesting as that
 of any young person. In the course of the after-
 noon he read over several communications he had
 received from both Blacks and Indians; some of
 which were highly interesting. 10th of 4th Month. Amongst those of my ac-
 quaintance in Philadelphia, at whose houses I
 have been generously entertained, was Captain H.
 whom I had seen at Liverpool. I mention his
 name in this place, to introduce an account of a
 remarkable preservation which he experienced not
 long ago, attended with some circumstances ge-
 nerally known in Philadelphia:--He had been for
 some time commander of a ship in the East India
 trade, and had acquitted himself so much to the
 satisfaction of his employers, that he was engaged
 to go out again in that trade, as commander of the
 Hindostan, in which very large property was em-
 barked. The whole management of the outfit
 had been committed to his care, and every thing
 being made ready for the voyage, the vessel was
 on the point of sailing. At this period he found
 his mind so oppressed at the prospect of the
 voyage, that he felt himself under the necessity of
 requesting the owners of the ship, to liberate him
 from his engagement of taking the command; but
 could assign no other reason than the oppression
 on his mind at the prospect of the voyage before
 him; observing, that he had no apprehension the
 ship would not prosecute her voyage in safety.
 He further stated, that as far as concerned himself,
 he could not feel satisfied to take the command of
 her; but considering his engagements, he was de-
 termined to fulfil them as far as lay in his power,
 if it was insisted upon. The owners, at first, seemed disposed to enforce
 his compliance; yet, after a little time of reflection,
 they gave up the point, there being several well-
 qualified Captains ready to supply his place. The
 command of an Indiaman is a situation eagerly
 sought after, being considered the most profitable
 of any in the commercial line, as it affords many
 opportunities of making larger profits than any
 other trade. Another Captain was accordingly
 appointed in the place of Captain H. and the Hin-
 dostan left Philadelphia, in appearance as fine a
 ship as had of late sailed from that port; but she
 was never heard of after she left the Delaware. Thus was Captain H. preserved to his family
 and friends, by duly attending to those urgent,
 though incomprehensible impressions upon his
 mind. Some years afterwards he brought over
 M. R. to England, on her return from her last
 visit to America. 4th Month, 14th, I went to Philadelphia, whence
 I transmitted some letters to my friends in Eng-
 land by way of New-York; and, in the afternoon,
 in company with R. E. we rode over to J. H.'s, and
 supped and spent the evening at his house on the
 banks of the Schuylkil; where he has a productive
 farm, which appears to be well managed. The
 road up to the house was planted on each side
 with English quicksets, which appeared to thrive
 better than any I had seen in this country, I un-
derstand that the winters here are generally too
 sharp for thorn, so that they rarely answer as a fence.
 However the native American thorn makes a good
 hedge; and, in some parts of the Delaware State,
 I have seen it used to considerable advantage. It
 is a much greater ornament to a plantation, than
 either the common worm fence, or that of the posts
 and rails which generally prevails throughout the
 United States. The farmers object to hedges in
 general, alleging that they harbour birds and ver-
 min of different kinds, which injure the crops. 4th Month 15th, 16th, and 17th, were spent at
 Merion and in its neighbourhood. In the economy
 of a family in this country, I frequently observed
 a practice well worthy of imitation, where soap is
 an expensive article. In many families it is the
 custom to preserve the bones that are collected in
 the kitchen after a meal. When a sufficient quan-
 tity is obtained, they are put into a pan provided
 for the purpose, and some lie, made from wood
 ashes, is poured upon them. The pan being placed
 near the fire, if the lie is of sufficient strength to
 float an egg, it soon extracts all the fat; and dis-
 solves the gristly parts in the course of a day or two.
 The bones are then taken out, and the liquor is
 left near the fire, and kept to a gentle boiling heat,
 or near it, another day or two; or until the liquor
 has attained a ropy consistency. It will then
 answer all the purposes of soap; and, if a proper
 quantity of common salt be added, it hardens and
 becomes real soap. Many families in America
 never use any other kind. 4th Month, 21st. I came to Philadelphia, and
 attended the first sitting of the yearly meeting,
 which began at ten o'clock this morning. The
 number of friends attending was great; but it
 would be difficult to form a correct estimate of the
 whole; yet I suppose there were not less than two
 thousand men friends present. One of the door-
 keepers at Arch-street meeting-house, where the
 women friends assembled to transact their busi-
ness, had the curiosity to count them as they came
 out; and found that upwards of nineteen hundred
 females had been assembled there. After open-
ing the meeting, friends proceeded to answer the
 queries, and went through seven of them. It
 was pleasant to observe that a large proportion of
 those who attended were young persons; to whom
 many instructive observations were made. After
 an agreeable sitting of about two hours, the meet-
 ing adjourned until the afternoon. Between meet-
 ings I dined and spent on hour two very plea-
 santly at John Elliot 's, where I had the company
 of many friends from different parts of the Con-
 tinent of America. In the afternoon I attended the second sitting
 of the yearly meeting; when the answers to the
 remaining queries were read; and several reports
 respecting the establishment of schools, and the
 instruction of the native Indians, where brought in
 and taken into consideration. 4th Month, 22th. At nine o'clock I attended
 the third sitting of the yearly meeting. After ap-
pointing a committee to hear and judge of an
 appeal, the general epistle from the yearly meeting
 in London was read; and six thousand copies of
 it were ordered to be printed and distributed
 through the inferior meetings. Epistles from the
 different yearly meetings on this continent were
 also read. After meeting I dined at David Bacon 's, in
 company with H. J. a friend who had devoted
 some years to the instruction of the Indians, in the
 useful arts of civilized life, during which time he
 dwelt amongst them on the banks of the Allegany
 River. From the conversation I had with this
 friend, as well as with others who had given up
 much of their time to the same purpose, it will
 probably be a work of time, requiring a long
 exercise of patience and perseverance, before the
 Indians can be brought into a state of complete
 civilization. It has often appeared to me that
 there is a natural wildness and quickness in them,
 which all the pains or labour of the well-disposed
 white inhabitants, will find it difficult to subdue.
 However, there are different degrees of stability
 and prudential care amongst these people, in their
 natural state; many amongst them paying some
 attention to agricultural pursuits, and, in summer,
 providing for the wants of winter; whilst others
 disclaim all thought or care for the future; and
 hold in contempt all their neighbours, who depend
 on any other means for support than hunting.
 Although friends reside amongst them, they are
 still, at certain times, in the practice of sacrificing
 to idols of their own carving, some of which were
 in the form of an Indian warrior of a gigantic
 stature; to whom they sacrificed dogs, &c.
 Notwithstanding this, they hold a tradition that
 the universe was created, and is supported, by an
 all-powerful being, whom they call the Great
 Spirit; whose influence is felt in every human
 breast, approving for good, and reproving for evil. 22d of 4th Month. At three o'clock in the after-
 noon of this may we met again, when the minutes
 of the meeting for sufferings were read, the consi-
 deration of which occupied the remaining part of
 this fourth sitting. 4th Month, 23d. We met again this morning
 at nine o'clock, it being the fifth sitting; when
 the state of the society, as set forth in the
 answers to the queries, was taken into considera-
 tion, and much advice was given on the subject of
 the deficiencies that appeared. We met again at three o'clock, it being the
 sixth sitting; when the report of the state of
 West-Town school was read, and several subjects
 relating to that institution were considered. 4th Month, 24th. This forenoon, meetings for
 worship were held at the three different meeting-
 houses in the city. In the afternoon, at three
 o'clock, the yearly meeting resumed its business,
 this being the seventh sitting. The Committee of
 Appeals brought in their report in the case of
 H. J. who had appealed to the yearly meeting
 against the decision of her monthly and quarterly
 meetings. In the opening of business, when
 the appellant was introduced by the men's
 yearly meeting, and inquired of by the clerk, if
 she continued in the mind to prosecute her ap-
 peal, she, in a becoming manner, replied that she
 came there for that purpose. After a fair and
 candid hearing by the committee of the yearly
 meeting, appointed from the most impartial part
 of it, this poor woman, who had stood as it were
 single and alone, was restored to her right of
 membership in the society. I believe that meetings for discipline sometimes
 lose their proper weight and authority, by active
 members getting into a cold, unfeeling manner of
 treating those who may have been brought under
 dealing. The habit of constantly speaking to
 cases which occur, endangers our getting into a
 customary form; and the mind, by this means,
 runs considerable risk of becoming less sensible
 of the tendering impressions of divine influ-
 ence. It is well frequently to remember this great
 truth, that the more closely we attend to this sea-
 soning virtue, the more will our minds be clothed
 with meekness and charity, and we shall thereby
 be preserved from doing or saying any thing that
 may have a tendency to irritate or wound, even
 by the smallest delinquent. The business of the appeal being disposed of,
 the propriety of continuing the second day morn-
 ing meeting was entered into; on which it was
 agreed, that the meeting should be discontinued,
 and a minute to that purpose was accordingly made.
 A report from the Committee on Indian Affairs was
 brought in and read, with a statement of the re-
 ceipts and expenditure of the committee, by which
 it appeared that there remained a balance in the
 hands of the treasurer, of about 2000l. currency; a
 part of which sum was ordered to be handed to the
 Delaware tribe of Indians, whose forefathers had
 shown great kindness to Friends, on their first
 landing in this country; the recollection of which
 had great weight on Friends' minds at this time, in
 the distribution of this money. Thus the good
 deeds of the forefathers of this tribe of Indians,
 were visited upon their children's children, some
 of whom stood in great need of the assistance now
 afforded, and to whom it would be very useful in
 providing husbandry utensils, &c. &c.; I observed
 that friends were generally careful not to hand
 their presents in money; but preferred sending
 them various kinds of tools both for husbandry
 and carpenters' work; and they would also, on
 some occasions, hire a workman to put them in a
 way of using their tools. After the close of this sitting, a friend informed
 me that he had a prospect of removing to the
 Ohio, and shewed me two certificates of lands he
 had purchased in that State, said to be of excel-
 lent quality, for which he engaged to give 11s. 3d.
 per acre, to be paid by instalments; at two, three,
 and four years. The number of friends who have
 emigrated into that State, in the course of the last
 few years, is said to exceed 800 families; and their
 increase still continued to be so great, that the
 establishment of a new yearly meeting in those
 parts, began to be seriously thought of. 4th Month, 25th. I attended the eighth sitting
 of the yearly meeting, which began at ten o'clock
 this morning, and the whole of it was employed
 the consideration of the report brought in by
 the committee appointed to revise the discipline. In the afternoon we met again, at three o'clock,
 being the ninth sitting, and proceeded in the con-
 sideration of the report of the committee on the
 revision of the discipline. 4th Month, 26th. We met again at nine o'clock,
 being the tenth sitting. Friends were occupied
 during the whole time on the revision of the dis-
 cipline, but chiefly on the subject of using and
 dealing in spiritous liquors, and of friends keeping
 inns. Much was said to discourage the practice,
 on account of the exposed situation of the families
 of those engaged in this line of business. On the
 other hand, it appeared to some, that were all
 inns in the hands of steady, consistent friends, it
 would be a great blessing to any country, and
 would have a tendency considerably to check that
 torrent of profligacy and dissipation, which too
 generally prevails in inns and taverns. We met again at three o'clock in the afternoon,
 it being the eleventh sitting; when the meeting
 proceeded in its deliberations on the revision of
 the discipline. 4th Month, 27th. The first day of the week I
 attended the North Meeting in the forenoon; and
 in the afternoon, that held in Market-street. At
 the latter, R. M. a friend from the neighbour-
 hood of New-York, in the course of his testimony,
 explained the difference between the terms wis-
 dom and knowledge; the former embracing not
 only the knowledge of what is right, but also the
 practice of it; for this only, he said, was true
 wisdom. On the other hand, how many, alas!
 are possessed of the knowledge of what is right
 and good, but fall short in firmness and integrity
 to uphold and practice it. This, he said, was
 knowledge, but not wisdom. 4th Month, 28th. This morning, at nine o'clock,
 I attended the twelfth sitting of the yearly meet-
 ing; the fore part of which was occupied in the
 further discussion of the report of the committee
 on the revision of the discipline; and some altera-
 tions were finally agreed upon, and others were
 left for further consideration next year. The meeting then proceeded to the reading
 and consideration of several epistles addressed to
 different yearly meetings on this continent; and also
 of one to the yearly meeting in London; which, with
 some small alterations, were approved and adopted.
 After a solemn pause, and a prayer to the Divine
 Being, the meeting concluded its twelfth sitting,
 and the last for this year. 5th Month, 2d. I attended Merion week-day
 meeting, and spent the afternoon pleasantly in
 company with R. J. and H. B. whom I assisted
 in planting several paper-mulberry trees, on the
 vacant ground near the meeting-house, which were
 intended to be a shade for friends' horses in
 the summer season. There is generally a plot of
 ground round the country meeting-houses in
 America, sometimes of several acres, planted with
 shady trees, under which the horses and carriages
 of friends stand, during meeting time, and which
 forms a most interesting piece of scenery. 5th Month, 3d. At Merion I this day received
 letters from my wife and children dated the 14th
 of 2d Month, giving accounts of their welfare.
 Persons who have never removed from their
 native country, can hardly conceive the pleasure
 that is derived from the correspondence of near
 connexions when separated from them in a distant
 land. 5th Month, 4th. I attended Merion meeting it
 being 1st day, and afterwards had the company of
 R. S. and A. K. of Philadelphia to dinner. These
 two young men were both of them descendants of
 German parents who had left their native country,
 in order to enjoy the blessings of religious liberty
 in this land; a privilege which neither the Em-
 peror, nor the petty Princes of Germany, had
 the good sense or the policy to allow. 5th Month, 9th. This day was remarkably
 tempestuous; and in the evening there was so
 great a light over the cities of Philadelphia and
 West Chester, that they appeared to be on fire;
 and next morning we received accounts, that in
 Philadelphia 30 houses had been burnt down
 in a central part of the city, and that in West
 Chester two large ships were burnt. Within about
 two miles of my lodgings the same evening, a
 powder mill was blown up, and one person who
 had the management of it, lost his life by the ex-
 plosion. Not many days before the accident,
 being well acquainted with the man, I had some
 conversation with him on the danger of his oc-
 cupation; but the great wages he received out-
 weighed all apprehensions of his danger, and he
 seemed to have made up his mind to continue the
 employment, notwithstanding he had before been
 blown up, and narrowly escaped destruction, with
 the loss of one eye, and the use of several of his
 fingers. So many dreadful accidents happening
 around us at the time called forth serious
 and awful reflections. 5th Month, 10th. Being invited by one of the
 proprietors, I accompanied him to the ruins of the
 powder mill which was yesterday destroyed; when
 I saw the remains of the poor man, who had lost
 his life by the explosion. His whole appearance
 was too shocking to be described. The afflicted
 widow, who was a young woman, and several
 small children, stood weeping round him. 5th Month, 17th. This afternoon I spent at
 R. J.'s. Whilst here, a drove of cows passed by on
 their way to Philadelphia market; one of them a
 handsome looking heifer, with a fine calf by her
 side, attracting R. J.'s attention, he bought them
 both for 3l. 12s. 5th Month, 27th. I had the company of R. J.
 to tea this afternoon, who presented me with an
 account of a most extraordinary persecution that
 was carried on in the year 1763, against the last re-
 maining part of a particular tribe of Inndians.
 This tribe, from their residing at Conestoga, were
 called the Conestoga Indians. On the first arrival
 of the English in Pennsylvania, they sent messengers
 to welcome them, with presents of venison, corn,
 and skins; and entered into a treaty of friendship
 with William Penn. This treaty had been since
 frequently confirmed, and had never been violated,
 either on the part of the Indians or the English,
 until the time that these cruel transactions took
 place. It has always been observed that Indians,
 settled in the neighborhood of white people, con-
 tinually diminish; and this tribe had dwindled
 away till there remained in the village no more
 than seven men, five women, and eight children.
 Of these, Shebeas, who was a very old man, had
 assisted at the treaty with William Penn in the
 year 1701, had ever since continued a faithful
 friend of the English, and bore the character of
 an exceedingly good man; for, considering his
 extraction, he was naturally of a most kind and
 benevolent temper. This little remnant of Indians
 were in the constant practice of addressing every
 new Governor of the Province, and they ac-
 cordingly presented an address to John Penn , a
 new Governor, on his arrival; assuring him of their
 fidelity, and praying for a continuance of that
 favour and protection they had hitherto experienced. This address was scarcely presented, when the
 horrible catastrophe occurred, which I am about to
 relate. In the townships of Paxton and Done-
 gal, in the county of Lancaster, a number of peo-
 ple, actuated by the wildest religious enthusiasm,
 in which they were encouraged by some furious
 zealots amongst their preachers, conceived the
 notion that they ought to extirpate the heathen
 from the earth, as Joshua did some nations of old;
 that they themselves, as Saints, might possess the
 land. Fired with this dreadful kind of zeal, on
 the 14th of the 12th Month, 1763, 57 men well
 mounted, and armed with firelocks, hatchets, and
 hangers, came down from the two before-mentioned
 townships, and, surrounding the little Indian vil-
 lage at dawn of day, broke in upon the inhabitants
 all at once, and fired upon, stabbed, and hewed in
 pieces the poor defenceless creatures who hap-
 pened to be in their huts; among them the good
 old Shebeas was hewed in pieces in his bed. The
 daughter of the venerable Shebeas, who for several
 years past had devoted her time to waiting upon
 her beloved father, was also slain. After taking
 off the scalps of those who were thus murdered, and
 setting fire to the village, the murderers mounted
 their horses and rode away; disappointed in not
 having found all the Indians at home, 14 out of the
 20 being absent. It is not, perhaps, in the power of
 language to express the feelings of the remaining
 14 Indians, some of whom were little children, on
 their return to the village, when they beheld the
 mangled remains of their near and dear connexions,
 and saw their habitations a heap of smoking ruins. The Magistrates of Lancaster, hearing of what
 had past, came over and took the survivors under
 their protection, doing all in their power to con-
 sole them; and, taking them by the hand, led them
 to Lancaster; where, for their greater security,
 they lodged them in a strong stone building in the
 town, in which they were supposed to be in per-
 fect safety. The Governor, John Penn , imme-
diately issued a proclamation, enjoining all officers
 both civil and Military, to assist in bringing to
 justice the perpetrators of this horrid outrage. The remaining 14 Indians continued in the house
 provided for them in Lancaster, in the centre of
 the town, unconscious of danger, till the 27th of
 the 12th Month, being 13 days from the time their
 village had been destroyed. On that day a com-
 pany of men, 50 in number, well mounted and
 armed, rode hastily into Lancaster, made the best
 of their way to the house where the poor Indians
 were lodged; with violence broke open the door;
 and with fury in their countenances rushed in upon
 these unarmed and defenceless creatures. The In-
dians seeing no protection nigh, nor and possibility
 of escape, immediately divided into their little
 families; the affrighted children clinging to their
 distressed parents. In unutterable anguish they
 fell upon their knees, protesting their love to the
 English people, and that in their whole lives, they
 had never done them any injury. While thus im-
 ploring mercy of these hard-hearted men, they
 were without distinction, hewn down with hatchets,
 and, in a few moments, were laid lifeless on the
 floor; a deplorable instance amongst many others,
 of what a pitch of wickedness the mind of man
 may be brought to, where acting under wrong im-
pressions of imagined religious zeal. This cruel
 massacre was completed in one of the largest in-
 lands towns in America, in the broad face of day,
 and in so public a manner, that after the commission
 of this atrocious murder, the miscreants all came
 out and stood at the door of the house, besmeared
 with blood, gave three loud huzzas, mounted their
 horses, and rode away. Notwithstanding this pub-
licity, and a proclamation by John Penn , the Go-
 vernor, offering a reward of 200l. for the discovery
 of any of them, yet such was the dread in which
 they were held, that none of them were brought
 to justice. Chapter XIV.
 Dunkers--A Barn--Piazzas--Management of Sheep--
 Merion--Eclipse of the Sun--Summer Dress--James
 Simpson--Shad Fishery--Bee-eater--Wild Grapes--
Crab Cyder--Hogs--Fire Flies.--Paper Mills--
Chesnut Trees--Harvest--Ancient Deed--J. Rowland.
 Wood Felling.--Indian Corn. 6th Month, 8th, 1806. I attended the Valley
 meeting at which I noticed some of the Dunkers.
 They are a religious society who make a point of
 never taking off the beard. I observed a comely
 looking young man, whose beard had so luxuriant
 a growth, that it spread a considerable way over
 his breast, and gave him a very patriarchal ap-
 pearance. At the close of the meeting several
 friends invited me to their houses, but being pre-
viously engaged, I accompanied M. R. and dined
 with him. After dinner he shewed me his barn,
 stables, &c. which are the most complete I have
 seen either in England or America. The barn is
 of stone and stands on descending ground, having
 a south aspect. It is about 40 yards in length by
 10 in breadth, and 9 yards high in front. Along
 the north side of the barn is a range of vaults
 which communicate with it, and are on the same
 level with the barn. The centre vault, which com-
municates with the cow-house, is fitted up as a
 dairy; and the other vaults are made use of to
 preserve roots, &c. for the cattle, such as beets,
 carrots, turnips, potatoes, pumpkins, &c. As the
 carriage-road into the barn runs over the vaults,
 as high as the topmost floor of the barn, the vaults
 are preserved cool in the summer, and free from
 the frost in winter. The whole of the ground
 floor of the barn being set apart for stables and
 cow-houses as is commonly the case with barns
 in Pennsylvania, there is accommodation for a
 great number of horses and cows. Along the
 front of the barn, about 8 feet from the ground, a
 wooden stage projects about six feet from the
 wall, inclosed overhead six or seven feet high, and
 also at the ends and side, forming a gallery the
 length of the building; having several communi-
cations or doorways out of the barn into it. In
 the floor of this gallery are several trap doors,
 through which they throw fodder for the cattle into
 the yard during the winter months. It is obvious
 that an appendage of this sort must be very useful
 in a farm-yard, as it also affords a comfortable
 shelter to the cattle from rain and snow. In the afternoon M. R. accompanied me to my
 cousin W. B.'s, and, in our way, we passed over
 the ground occupied by the American Army under
 General Washington , as an entrenched camp,
 during the war. The remains of the entrench-
ments are still visible, although the scite is again
 become a thick wood; so rapid is vegetation in
 this part of the world. After fording the Schuylkill, which is here broad
 and shallow, having several islands in it covered
 with lofty trees, we came upon W. B.'s plantation,
 and soon afterwards reached his habitation. We
 found the family sitting in the shade of the piazza,
 in the front of the house, where we joined them
 in taking tea, and enjoyed the freshness of the
 breeze, and a beautiful prospect of a great part
 of the country between his house and Philadelphia,
 a distance of about 20 miles; and in the plea-
santest part of Pennsylvania. The privilege of
 sitting under the shade of these piazzas, enjoying
 the fresh air in the afternoons and evenings, fully
 compensates for any inconvenience that is suffered
 from the heat, in the warmest part of the day.
 These piazzas are commonly six feet wide with
 boarded floors. On seeing families seated in them
 in their tranquil summer evenings, it constantly
 reminded me of the patriarchs of old, sitting at the
 doors of their tents in the cool of the day. 6th Month, 11th, was pleasantly spent at the house
 of a relation; and it was gratifying to find that he
 was paying considerable attention to his flock of
 sheep, also that his labours were in a fair way of be-
 ing crowned with success. Hitherto the farmers in
 this part of the world, have paid but little attention
 to their sheep, suffering the butchers to select
 the best formed for the market, leaving the most
 ordinary for stock. The natural consequence of
 such a plan was that the breed continually dege-
 nerated. Against this mode of proceeding my
 relation had the good sense to remonstrate, and to
 reserve for stock the best part of his flock. The
 beneficial effects of this plan are so manifest, that
 I have no doubt the neighbouring farmers will be
 induced to follow his example. I think I have
 before noticed how fond the cattle are of salt in
 these parts. At the front of the house is a beau-
 tiful lawn of many acres, gently descending to-
 wards the Schuylkill, in which nearly 100 sheep
 were feeding; and so partial were they to salt,
 that I have seen the girls go amongst them with a
 handful of it, and by scattering a little amongst
 them, entice the whole flock up to the house. 6th Month, 12th. In coming down to Phila-
 delphia, I noticed that the turnpike-road crosses
 a fine vein of marble, which, at a little distance, is
 worked to a great advantage. 6th Month, 14th. I attended a meeting at
 Merion, of which public notice had been given,
 on account of James Simpson , a Minister, who
 intended being there. In consequence the house
 was well filled, chiefly by persons of other persua-
 sions; amongst them, were one Senator, four
 Judges, and four Magistrates, who all behaved in
 a becoming manner. This friend is far advanced
 in years, and much esteemed by friends in Phila-
delphia and the neighbourhood; yet he follows
 the occupation of a broom-maker, and frequently
 comes down to that city in a handsome little car-
riage, loaded with his manufactory. Although
 a broom-maker may be accounted a mean occu-
 pation with some men, yet few pastors stand higher
 in the estimation of their flock than he does. 6th Month, 16th. This day was remarkable for
 an almost total eclipse of the sun. About eleven
 o'clock in the forenoon, I passed along the road
 from my lodgings to H. B.'s, when all seemed as
 quiet as at midnight; some stars appearing, and
 the birds being gone to roost. Although not so
 dark as it commonly is in the night, yet there was
 something awful in the stillness and appearance of
 the scene, there being scarcely a breath of air
 stirring. The portion of the sun that was visible,
 was only about a 24th part, and it cast a faint
 glimmering light through the leaves of the trees,
 the shadows of which appeared like shell-work
 upon the ground. 6th Month, 26th. The weather now becoming
 warm, I had noticed several little boys and girls
 come to the meeting at Merion, without shoes and
 stockings, though in other respects well dressed;
 a number of men friends also, in the upper seats,
 sat without coats and stockings, having long cot-
ton trowsers which came down to their shoe tops.
 One young man who sometimes appears in the
 ministry acceptably, had on a striped, cotton jacket
 and trowsers, and a drab hat. Although these
 appearances in dress are not familiar to an English-
man, yet habit soon reconciles us to them. And a
 person who has not experienced it, can hardly con-
 ceive how pleasant a light dress is in these warm
 climates, as, at every motion, the limbs are so free
 from obstructions. After a long warm summer,
 when the cold weather first comes on, the incum-
brance of heavy clothing is much greater than
 might be expected. 6th Month, 28th. This evening I was in com-
 pany with James Simpson , he still continuing his
 religious visits in this neighbourhood. I have al-
 ready mentioned this friend with respect, but to
 describe him completely would be a difficult task;
 as it may be truly said that in person and dress, as
 well as in the manner and subject of his ministry,
 he is truly an originalHe is since deceased.. In his external appear-
 ance, he is thin and upwards of six feet high, his
 visage is very long, and his face of an Indian com-
plexion, with small, quick eyes corresponding,
 and, to appearance, he may be about 80 years
 of age. In the gallery he commonly wears a dark
 coloured cotton cap, fitting closely to his head,
 and over his shoulders a long dark coloured cloak.
 Notwithstanding his singular appearance, he is not
 less remarkable in his manner when exercised in
 the gallery. He uses considerable action and
 gesticulation, and his sentiments, in general, are
 almost a continual exposition of the Mosaic
 Law, with references to the counterpart in the
 Gospel dispensation, which he explains in a way
 that I never heard equalled; and with a volubility
 of expression, and quickness of recollection, that
 are astonishing to a stranger. 6th Month, 29th. I this morning paid a visit
 to J. J. and his wife, at their habitation. This
 family, with many others I have met with, contra-
 dict a notion which prevails in England, That
 the Americans are generally short lived. The
 husband is in his 95th year, and his wife in her
 89th year. One of his sisters is of the same age,
 and another sister is in her 85th year; and all of
 them may, from every appearance, live some years
 longer. J. J. told me, that he had often heard his
 father speak of his having seen the foundation laid
 of the first house that was built in Philadelphia;
 and I understood that he was one of William
 Penn's most intimate friends. I spent this evening at B. J.'s country residence.
 This house, which is substantial and well built,
 and finished in an expensive manner, stands on
 a rising ground just above the Falls of the Schuyl-
 kill, commanding a fine prospect of Philadelphia
 and the river Delaware, both above and below
 that city, being only about four miles distant.
 The prospect embraces many beautiful country
 residences on every hand. B. J. had lately made
 a purchase of the house and 35 acres of land
 adjoining. In this purchase was also included a
 good farm-house, with an orchard, garden, out-
 houses, and a cottage or two. In one of these
 cottages, close by the Falls, a family resides, who
 are employed by B. J. in the book-binding busi-
 ness. The situation is as pleasant as can well be
 conceived. At this part of the river, the Shad Fishery
 is prosecuted with great spirit in the early
 part of summer. Almost every farmer who hap-
 pens to have a field on the banks of the river,
 keeps a net for this purpose; and, with a little
 industry, may, in the course of two or three weeks,
 lay up a supply for the whole year. The fish are
 salted, and are brought out, through the winter, as
 a relish at breakfast and supper. I have some times stood by in the evening watch-
 ing the people taking these fish. The nets used are
 about 50 or 60 yards in length, and about 6 feet in
 width; the lower side being weighted with lead, and
 upper side supported with pieces of cork. One
 end of the net is fixed firm to a stake on edge
 of the river, whilst the other end is taken out in
 a small boat towards the other side. After getting
 to the extent of it, the boat is rowed down the
 river, bringing the end of the net with it, and
 at length it comes to land, a little below the stake
 to which the other end of the net is fastened,
 forming a circular inclosure, within which the fish
 are secured. As the net approaches the bank of
 the river, the fishes are seen struggling in all di-
 rections; till at last they are brought close to the
 above, when they are quickly gathered up, and
 thrown into the boat. Several hundreds are, at
 times, taken at one draught; but as the fishing is
 continued through the night, during the season, the
 farmers often think themselves well paid with 20
 or 30, as they weigh about 5 pounds each. In the early part of the season, I think the shad
 is nearly equal to trout. Although the practice
 of eating it at breakfast and supper, is not com-
 mon in England, I soon found myself very par-
 tial to the shad at breakfast, with coffee and toast,
 it being first nicely broiled over the hot embers of
 a wood fire. 7th Month, 1st. In walking this day, I ob-
 served the people to be generally engaged in reap-
 ing barley, wheat, and rye. The farmers here
 get in their harvest with little difficulty, in conse-
 quence of the clear settled weather which generally
 prevails during their long summers. Unsound
 grain is a thing scarcely ever heard of. 7th Month, 2d. I spent the afternoon and
 drank tea at H. B's. His bee-hives having been
 considerably annoyed by bird, called the Bee-
 eater, he took out his fowling-piece, and shot one
 of them; and on opening the craw, we found
 many bees which it had devoured. So destructive
 are these birds, that a nest of them would destroy
 several hives in the course of a summer, if left
 undisturbed. 7th, Month, 3d. I attended the Preparative
 Meeting at Merion, and in the evening had a
 pleasant walk to Dr. H's. A considerable part
 of the road leading to his house, is lined with
 cedar, sassafras, shumack, sweet chesnut, &c. &c.
 but what has a most singular and pleasing effect
 is, that most of the higher trees are entirely over-
 grown with vines, which spread over them with
 great luxuriance; and, when the grapes are ripe,
 present a very inviting appearance. They are of a
 small black kind, and very pleasant to the palate,
 particularly in pies and tarts; in which, according
 to the taste, they exceed almost every other kind
 of fruit. They are often preserved in jars, for
 this purpose to be used in winter. Some of the
 best wine I ever tasted, was made from this kind
 of grape. 7th Month, 5th, was employed in business at
 Philadelphia, where I dined with my hospitable
 friends J. and A. W. In the evening I paid the
 bride's visit to S. N. She was the relict of the
 late W. S. and is a worthy friend. T. N. her
 husband, having been a kind and intimate friend of
 W. S 's, had been appointed by him as his exe-
 cutor. Being of open generous disposition,
 and possessing amply the means to indulge such
 an inclination, after waiting a suitable time, he
 made the widow an offer of marriage; which was
 in due season accepted. Thus he may at once,
 fill the character of husband, and fulfil the trust re-
 posed in him by his deceased friend. I have heard
 T. N. mention, that he left England with his parents,
 when about four years old, and that he had no
 recollection of any thing in that country, except
 the skylark, which he well remembered to have
 heard singing in the air. This friend is one amongst
 many I have known in this country who have
 emigrated from England, and have been success-
 ful in business; but who are seldom heard of in
 their native land. 7th Month, 6th. After attending meeting, I
 accompanied R. J. to his brother J. J's where
 we drank tea. Before we left his house, he gave
 us a taste of his cyder, made from a species of
 apple, called the Virginia crab, the produce of his
 own orchard. It was superior to any liquor I have
 ever tasted of the kind; indeed I have seldom drank
 a glass of wine equal to it, either as to body or
 flavour. Afterwards we called upon D. J. an ancient
 friend, whose parents were amongst the first set-
 tlers of this province. In the evening we called
 upon J. Z. a friend whose progenitors came from
 Germany. On my noticing a number of fine hogs
 in his orchard, which appeared very attentive to
 the fall of the fruit, he told me that he annually
 brought up about twenty of them, which derived a
 great part of their support from peaches, apples,
 &c. during the day; and, in the evenings and
 mornings, they were supplied with milk from his
 dairy. As he made a considerable quantity of
 butter for the Philadelphia market, the old milk
 and butter milk went in aid of the fruit in the
 orchard, to bring forward the hogs, which are
 fatted with Indian corn, at the close of the year,
 to a large size. 7th Month, 7th. In the evening we called upon
 H. B. who was engaged amongst his reapers in
 the wheat field. He calculated that his produce
 this year would be 30 bushels of wheat per acre;
 an increase which must pay the farmer well,
 where the land, generally speaking, is rented at
 10s. an acre per annum; there being no tithes,
 and the taxes amounting to scarcely 1s. per acre. 7th Month, 9th. The evening being serene and
 pleasant, I took a walk in company with our
 neighbour R. B. and visited some of the neigh-
 bouring families. Although this may be deemed
 the hottest season of the year, I found no incon-
 venience from the exercise of walking, but it
 must be remembered that our clothing was very
 light. In passing along we were entertained with
 the appearance of immense quantities of fire flies, in
 the fields and woods around us. They had the
 appearance of immense quantities of bright sparks
 of fire, flying in all directions amongst the grass
 and corn, as well as the leaves and boughs of the
 loftiest trees. 7th Month, 15th. Having been several times
 kindly invited, I dined with P. W. a respectable
 paper-maker in the neighbourhood of Merion,
 where I spent the afternoon pleasantly. The
 situation is beautifully romantic, being in a deep
 narrow valley, the steep hills on each side of which
 are covered with wood. The mill which would
 be considered as an extensive one even in England,
 almost wholly employed in making writing and
 printing paper, with large quantities of which he
 supplies the printers and stationers in Philadelphia.
 During the visit he gave me a little history of his
 life. About 20 years ago, being then 12 years of
 age, he left Mentz, his native place in Germany,
 accompanied by his father, who died on the pas-
 sage to this country. Being of that class of emi-
 grants called redemptioners already mentioned,
 P. W. on the arrival of the ship in the Delaware,
 was hired by Henry Drinker , and was employed
 about the house as a waiting boy, and assistant to
 the girls in the kitchen. After spending nearly
 four months in this family, and having acquired the
 English language, he had the good sense to dis-
 cern, that it would be more to his interest to be
 taught some manufacture; and requested liberty
 of his master to be put apprentice to a paper-
 maker, which was readily granted, although his
 first indenture was not yet expired. After having
 obtained a knowledge of the manufacture of paper,
 he, by industry and care, acquired sufficient pro-
 perty and credit to enable him to begin business;
 which he has now, for several years, carried on to
 advantage. I never was in a paper-mill where
 the business was managed with more neatness and
 order. As I sat in the house it was pleasant to
 reflect on such an instance of successful industry.
 He has a rising family of healthy looking children
 about him, with an amiable wife and several
 sisters. In returning to my lodgings, I had the curiosity
 to take the dimensions of a chesnut tree, of the
 sweet kind, which stood by the way side; and
 round it more than 27 feet in circumference, and
 its thickness continued in regular proportion to
 the height of about seven yards, which was the
 length of the bole, clear of branches. 7th Month, 16th. I have noticed for a day or
 two past, that the harvest for wheat, rye, and
 barley, is entirely over, not having continued more
 than two weeks. The serene and settled weather
 generally prevalent here, with the practice of work
 people of all descriptions turning into the harvest
 field, makes short work of it. It is not customary
 here, as in England, for the women to work
 in the harvest field at all. In this neighbourhood
 the blacksmiths, wheelwrights, weavers, taylors,
 &c. &c. all shut up their shops to assist the far-
 mers. 7th Month, 20th. I attended Merion meeting,
 and in the afternoon visited an ancient friend of
 the name of Mary Price , who, although upwards
 of 80 years of age, generally walks about a mile to
 meeting; and, considering her years, continues to
 be an active, lively woman. At her house I was
 shewn a deed of conveyance, of five thousand acres
 of land, the purchase-money for which was one
 hundred pounds, reserving a quit-rent to William
 Penn and his heirs, of 1s. per acre. The same
 land, where inclosed, now sells for 12l. per acre,
 being a six hundred fold advance in the course of
 120 years, on the intrinsic value of the land. The
 above-mentioned deed was a conveyance from
 Charles Lloyd, and a female of the name of
 Davies, to a person of the name of Humphreys.
 This deed is in the hands of M. P's daughter-
 in-law, who is a descendant of the Lloyds of
 Dollebran. 7th Month, 21st, was employed in writing to
 my wife and family, when I informed them of my
 intention of sailing for England, in the John
 Morgan, Captain Bunker , with whom I was well
 acquainted, and whom I knew to be a skilful,
 careful seamen; but notwithstanding my intentions,
 I was prevented, by unforeseen circumstances,
 from sailing in this ship; for which I have reason
 to be thankful, as in her voyage to England she
 struck upon a rock in the night, on the coast of
 the Isle of Man, and was lost. 7th Month, 22d. I had a pleasant walk to the
 Falls of the Schuylkill, having business to transact
 with a person there. On my way thither, I was
 informed of the decease of Joshua Rowland , an
 amiable young man, of Lewis-Town, near the
 mouth of the Delaware. Although not more
 than 25 years old, his loss will be severely felt by
 the black people in that neighbourhood. He had
 been an ardent and steady friend to that oppressed
 race, and the means of rescuing many of them
 from a state of slavery, who had been cruelly
 forced into bondage, by a set of unprincipled
 men, from Georgia, who sometimes hover
 about this part of the Delaware State and Mary-
 land, and carry off whole families of free Negroes
 in the night. They take them on board small
 vessels, in the neighbouring creeks, and so ship
 them off to Georgia and the Carolinas, where
 they are sold to the planters. I have seen several of the black people whom
 he had rescued and sent up to his brother-in-law,
 Henry Bowman . The latter had procured them
 situations in the interior of Pennsylvania, out of
 the reach of these barbarous men. Not long ago,
 a mother, with seven children, was thus carried
 off, in the dead of the night, from this neighbour-
 hood. This flagrant act deeply excited J. Row-
 land's attention; and, after riding nearly one thou-
 sand miles, he was enabled to rescue the whole
 family, and bring them safe home to their native
 place, although they had been dispersed and sold
 into various hands, by the kidnappers, in different
 parts of Georgia. A very short time back, this excellent young
 man was taken ill of a fever, which, notwith-
 standing every help was afforded him, made so
 regular yet rapid a progress, that in a few days
 all hopes of his recovery were at an end. Through
 the whole, his mind was preserved calm and se-
 rene, and, when sensible that the closing period
 of time was at band, he requested that his
 domestics might be called into the room. These
 consisted of two white servants, two Negro
 boys, and a little orphan girl, whose mother had
 been many years a nurse in the family, out of
 respect to whom, he supported and educated the
 child. The mind may conceive the situation
 and feelings of this little group, yet I am ready to
 believe it is impossible for the pen to describe it.
 After a short but awful pause, he addressed each
 of them in the language and accents of a father;
 for indeed as a parent he had always conducted
 himself towards them. Having communicated to
 them counsel and advice suited to their several
 sizes and condition, he gently turned his face
 from them, and quietly resigned himself, and left the
 world without a sigh or struggle; a bright example
 of faithfulness to his Divine Master, and a more
 intelligible exposition of the Gospel of Jesus
 Christ, than whole volumes of controversy. 7th Month, 23d and 24th. I continued at my
 lodgings at Merion , making some arrangements
 for my return to England. I have sometimes noticed how expert the people
 of America are with the saw and the axe, and as
 an instance of their dexterity, I may mention what
 a very respectable millwright, whose veracity may
 be relied on, this day told me. He said that him-
 self and one assistant had cut down, in one day,
 35 forest trees, of which a considerable part were
 oak, and which averaged 6 feet in circumference.
 He added, that on using extraordinary exertion,
 they cut down one tree of this bulk in 7 1/2 minutes. 7th Month, 27th, 28th, and 29th. I was em-
 ployed in preparations for my return home, the
 prospect of which was more pleasing to me than
 I can express. In walking out into the fields
 about this time, I noticed the crops of Indian corn
 in the neighbourhood, which, in the line of hus-
 bandry, are truly grand and beautiful at this season
 of the year, far exceeding any thing of the kind
 to be met with in England. Many of the plants
 rise to the height of 10 or 12 feet, terminating at
 the top with an elegant kind of flower somewhat
 resembling a tuft of feathers. The leaves or blades
 which shoot from the stalk, and branch from it
 all the way up, are about the breadth of four
 inches, and from two to three feet in length. The
 whole gives a field of Indian corn a most luxuri-
 ant appearance. Chapter XV.
 Several brief Narrations--Occurrence relative to the
 author's Voyage home, &c.--Iron Works--Two Ger-
man Families--Marble Quarry--A Farm--Emigrants
--Taking leave of his Friends about Merion, intending
 for New-York--Occurrences on the Journey--Embarks
 for England--Cabin Company--Occurrences on the
 Voyage. 8th Month, 1st and 2d, 1806, were mostly spent
 at B. J.'s pleasant residence at the Schuylkill Falls.
 Whilst here we visited the works of a calico prin-
 ter, who resides and carries on his business in the
 neighbourhood. We were informed that his prin-
 cipal business was printing India calicoes, which
 are brought in great quantities to Philadelphia, in
 American ships trading to the West Indies. 8th Month, 4th. In the course of this day,
 0. J. and his mother-in-law called upon us. This
 venerable female, who is now far advanced in
 years, has survived a numerous flock of lovely
 daughters, I think 10 in number, who have, in
 succession, been taken away from the troubles of
 time, just as the affections of a mother would be
 likely to feel most keenly the privation. I had often remarked a settled grief upon her
 countenance, notwithstanding the affluence that
 was manifest in every thing around her; but had
 not heard the mournful story till I had it from her
 own mouth. 8th Month, 6th. I had received several kind
 invitations from both J. and C. S. to pay them a
 visit at their habitations, at Shoemakers Town,
 before I left this country. They are a family
 for whom I have entertained a great esteem, ever
 since I have known them; and the quarterly
 meeting at Abington falling at this time, I proposed
 embracing both objects; and, setting out after
 dinner, came to C. S.'s this evening. Here I was
 hospitably entertained, and had the agreeable com-
 pany of several friends from Philadelphia and the
 neighbourhood. 8th Month, 7th. I accompanied this party of
 friends to Abington quarterly meeting, which was
 very large. The meeting-house is a regular, well-
 built, stone-building, and capable of holding a great
 number of people. It is situated on a piece of
 ground containing several acres, and which is co-
 vered with a great number of large forest trees. 8th Month, 8th. After breakfast we returned
 to J. S.'s, where we spent an hour or two plea-
 santly, with a number of valuable friends resident
 in this quarter. The weather was very warm,
 but the house was spacious, with wide passages
 through it, and no want of windows; and they with
 the doors being thrown open, it gave a free and
 lively circulation to the air, which is very reviving
 in this climate. After sitting a little time in the parlour, a cir-
 cumstance occurred which I think I shall not soon
 forget. We entered into general conversation,
 after which a silent pause ensued; and as I sat
 musing on the prospect of my voyage home, with
 some little anxiety respecting the perils of it, a
 friend of Philadelphia, who sometimes appears in
 the ministry, broke the silence that prevailed, by
 remarking that his mind had been occupied in
 the consideration of my voyage, and that for my
 encouragement he might say, he had a belief that
 I should be favoured to arrive safe in my native
 land, in two months from that time. No observa-
 tion was now made on this intimation, but, on
 reaching my lodgings, I wrote to my wife inform-
 ing her of the circumstance, and that I trusted the
 friend would prove a true prophet. My letter
 reached her hands two or three weeks previously
 to my landing. After spending the morning as above related,
 most of us attended a public meeting at German-
 town, about six or seven miles distant, and being
 requested by T. F. I accompanied him with seve-
 ral other friends to his country house, which he
 calls Wakefield. There we dined in a room on a
 level with the cellar, which I found very pleasant,
 the weather being very warm, and the situation
 admitting plenty of light. A dining-room so situ-
 ated, is a great privilege at this season of the year,
 in a climate like this. After spending a pleasant hour or two here I
 came to Philadelphia, where I found letters from
 my wife of as late a date as towards the end of the
 5th month. In riding along the street, I passed
 by J. G's house, and his wife, a native of Lan-
 caster, kindly inviting me to take tea, I spent a
 little time with them, and in the evening returned
 to my lodgings at Merion. In recurring to the intimation respecting the
 time of my return to England, there are several
 circumstances attending it, which I think are
 worthy of remembrance, though they are a little
 out of the regular course of my narrative. It has
 been already mentioned, that it was my inten-
 tion to sail in the John Morgan, but that I was
 disappointed by the owners making an alteration in
 the time for her departure. After this T. W. and
 I had concluded to sail for Greenock, in the
 Frances, she being a fine, new vessel with good
 accommodation; but in this design I was again dis-
 appointed, the ship sailing before I could be quite
 ready. In her passage she encountered a violent
 storm, which nearly reduced her to a wreck; and
 such were the difficulties the ship's company had
 to encounter, that several of the passengers and
 seamen lost their lives. Notwithstanding I was fa-
 voured to escape these imminent perils, there was
 considerable probability of my not reaching Eng-
 land by the time mentioned; as I still remained at
 New-York, when it wanted only about four weeks
 to the completion of that period; and after we got
 on board, we were detained on the American coast
 nearly two weeks, by calms and light winds. Yet
 we crossed the Atlantic ocean from thence in the
 short period of 9 days. On the 10th day, and
 23d of our voyage, we made soundings off Cape
 Clear, and on the 26th day landed safely at Liver-
 pool, where I was affectionately received by my
 near relations in that town, within the time which
 the friend had predicted I should return. I for-
 bear making any farther comments on these cir-
 cumstances. But in the course of events I felt
 in my heart the sentiments of humble thankfulness
 to the great Preserver of Men. 8th Month, 11th. I spent this day at J. H's
 in company with M. E. from Elklands. She was
 then on a visit to her father, who had been seized
 with a paralytic affection, which had entirely de-
 prived him of the use of speech; yet I have seldom
 seen a man preserved in such innocent cheerful-
 ness as he was. It is wonderful to observe what
 a degree of happiness the mind is capable of en-
 joying, under privations like these, when it has
 been preserved in a good degree of innocency. 8th Month, 13th. A friend in the neighbour-
 hood gave me an account of an acquaintance of
 his, a native of Ireland, but who now resides
 near Lancaster, in the State of Pennsylvania,
 which I think worth preserving. This person
 left Ireland when he was nearly 16 years old, and
 his whole property when he landed amounted only
 to about 12 guineas. He has now established
 extensive iron works where he resides, in which
 he employs towards of 50 waggon teams; and the
 profits of which, last year, amounted to twenty-five
 thousand pounds. What makes it the more re-
 markable is, that two persons possessing a large
 capital had been ruined some time before, in an
 attempt to establish the same concern. 8th Month, 14th. In walking out this evening,
 I met with two German families on their way to
 he Ohio. On entering into conversation with
 them, they informed me, that they were yet 500
 miles distant from the place of their destination.
 The were a company of fine, healthy looking
 people, and travelled along with apparent chear-
 fulness. The older females and the little ones were
 upon beds in their covered waggons, whilst the
 young women, with their husbands, fathers, and
 brothers went on foot. Parties of this sort I have
 often seen travelling along, in the old Patriar-
 chal style, seeking a country where they hoped to
 meet with more tranquillity and repose, than they
 had witnessed in the old principalities of Germany. Considering the stability and industry, which so
 eminently characterize most of the German emi-
 grants, I am inclined to believe that things must be
 very much out of order, in their native land, before
 men like them, would come to the resolution of
 taking a final farewell of their near connexions
 and friends; with the perils and inconveniences of
 so long a voyage before them. 8th Month, 17th. I paid a visit to our neigh-
 bour Doctor H. After tea we called upon a family
 of the name of Crow, where I saw a little esta-
blishment just as it stood in the first settlement of
 the country. It consisted of a small workshop,
 containing a set of tools proper for blacksmiths
 and carpenters, which at that period, must have
 been an almost invaluable appendage to a farm-
house. The Doctor complained to us that he had
 lately lost nearly the whole of his ducks and geese;
 which had been devoured by a large species of
 tortoise. This animal creeping on the bottom of
 the pond, seizes the unsuspecting fowls by the
 feet, and dragging them under water, eats them
 at his leisure. The Doctor had a respectable esta-
blishment for the education of his children; having
 an exclusive library, with a pair of large globes,
 and an amiable young woman from England as
 tutors, who was well qualified for her office, his
 children being mostly girls. 8th Month, 18th. I went over to Philadelphia;
 and having had several pressing invitations from
 Doctor G. who had been a fellow-student with
 my brother William at Edinburgh, I dined with
 him. The Doctor is one amongst the few of that
 profession, who retain their integrity, by continu-
 ing to be consistent members of our society; and
 he is a very useful member of the monthly meeting
 to which he belongs. In the afternoon I spent a
 little time at John Elliott 's and Samuel Fisher 's;
 and took my farewell of them all, with sentiments
 of esteem, and of gratitude for the many instances
 of their kind attentions to me. While in this city, I
 received letters from my wife and family down to
 the 6th Month 16th, with satisfactory accounts of
 their welfare. 8th Month, 20th. O. J. having kindly offered
 me a seat in his carriage, I accompanied him to
 the annual general meeting in the Valley; at which
 a great number of friends and others attended;
 indeed, a great many more than the house, though
 large, was able to contain. After meeting, we accepted an invitation from
 J. C. and dined at his house, where we sat down
 to table with him and his wife, their aged father
 and mother, ten daughters and one son; being a
 fair sample of an American farmer's family. I
 was informed that his neighbour D. G. a respec-
 table farmer, with whom I have often been in
 company, has ten sons and one daughter. Considering the accounts I had read, of the
 homely fare and accommodations of the planters
 in America, I was struck with the number and
 elegance of the carriages we saw on the road, in
 going from meeting to the house where we dined;
 part of the way lying through the forest, and some
 part through a country in a high state of cultiva-
 tion, the prospects were beautifully diversified. In our way home, we took tea at the pro-
prietor's of an extensive marble quarry, who
 kindly conducted us into it; where we had an op-
 portunity of seeing the people at work, in sepa-
rating large blocks from the solid rock. This
 vein of marble, which appeared to be from 15 to
 20 yards in width, runs in the direction of south-
east, and north-west, through a stratum of lime-
stone, a few feet below the surface of the ground;
 and it has the appearance of there having been
 cleft in the limestone rock, into which the mar-
ble had been poured in a liquid state. Col. H. at
 whose house we were generously entertained, and
 who is owner of the quarry, informed us that he
 had sold thirteen thousand cubic feet from it in
 one year, at 4s. 6d. per foot. The weather being
 fine, and our little party consisting of several
 agreeable men and women friends, the day was
 spent very pleasantly. 8th Month, 22d. A. B. a friend from England,
 paid me a visit, having some prospect of taking a
 farm in this neighbourhood. His predecessors
 for several generations, had lived upon a farm on
 Delamere Forest in Cheshire; but the steward to
 the present proprietor, having turned him off the
 farm, he, with his widowed mother, and several
 sisters and a brother, had lately come over to
 America, with the view of taking and managing a
 cheese farm, upon the Cheshire plan. 8th Month, 23d. I accompanied A. B. to
 G. A.'s in order to have some conversation with
 him respecting a farm he had to let, and to view it.
 This farm was in a good state of cultivation, with
 an excellent house, a very large barn, and stabling
 for many horses, with other conveniences on an
 extensive scale. The spring house, or dairy, in
 particular struck my attention, having a trench of
 spring water, about 2 feet wide and 4 or 5 inches
 deep, running all round the room, paved at the
 bottom, and inclosed at the sides with slabs of
 white marble. I have before observed, that in the spring wa-
 ter which surrounds the floor of the dairies in this
 country, are placed the vessels which contain the
 milk, &c. and all is thus preserved sweet and cool,
 in the hottest part of the summer. Another
 conveniency I noticed in this farm-yard, was an
 appendage to the hog-sty being a vault, near
 which was a stream of water, all within the inclo-
 sure wherein the hogs were confined. The advan-
 tages and comfort thus resulting to these animals, in
 hot weather must be obvious. On this farm, was
 also an excellent orchard of several acres, the trees
 of which were at this time in their prime, and
 now in full bearing, and having been planted by
 the late Governor Mifflin , whose residence was
 here, they were well selected. Such abundance
 of fine fruit I never before beheld, in the same
 compass of ground; two or three of the best trees
 were literally broken down with the weight of the
 fruit. The rent G. A. proposed for his farm,
 with all these appendages, was about 20s. per
 acre; and, the quantity being short of 100 acres,
 the rent would amount to little more than legal
 interest for the money which had been expanded
 in buildings. As it was not more than an hour's
 ride from Philadelphia, and the land of good qua-
 lity, I thought the price very reasonable. 8th Month, 24th. I attended Merion meeting
 in the forenoon; and in the afternoon visited and
 drank tea with John Parish , in company with
 B. J. Most of the afternoon we sat in the piazza
 in front of the house, at Woodside, where we had
 a fine view of Philadelphia, the Jerseys, and the
 intervening country. We were much entertained
 with the little Humming Birds, flying about the
 flowers near our seats. 8th Month, 27th. My business requiring that
 I should see a person who was at the Yellow
 Springs, I this day took a ride thither. At the
 inn where I breakfasted, which was the General
 Paoli Tavern, I met with a family who had landed
 a few days before in Philadelphia, and were now
 on their way to the Ohio. As they spoke neither
 English no French, I was unable to make out
 from what part of the continent of Europe they
 came; but, from their dress, I supposed from
 Switzerland. The men wore a plain jacket and
 trowsers, with very large shallow crowned hats;
 and the women had their hair plaited in long braids,
 which hung down their backs, with jackets and
 petticoats just the reverse of the fashions of the pre-
 sent day. Altogether they had the appearance of a
 stout, hardy race, and, in this company, I understand
 there were four generations. The master of the
 inn informed me that he had reason to believe they
 had a very large property with them, in the wag-
 gons in which they travelled. On my arrival at
 the Yellow Springs, I bathed and drank the waters,
 which are I believe, a chalybeate. In the evening
 I returned to Merion, where I lodged, but was
 kept awake for a while in reflecting on the wide
 wasting effects of war, probably in consequence of
 meeting with the family of strangers at the Paoli
 Tavern. That spot was rendered famous by the de-
 struction, as is said, of some hundred Americans,
 who lay encamped there, and were surprized in the
 dead of the night by a detachment of the English
 army, and put to the sword. The consequence of
 which was, I have been informed, that a party of
 English met with the same fate in a similar way, from
 the swords of the Americans, on the Banks of Hud-
 son River. In addition to that event, I understood,
 from the master of the inn, that the family of
 strangers I had mentioned, all of whom appeared
 to be persons of respectability, had been compelled
 to seek shelter in a foreign land, to avoid the
 scourge of the sword, which had recently over-
 whelmed their country. How little do the potentates of the world and
 their ministers, calculate on the miseries they pro-
 duce. And ah! how little do they consider what
 responsibility, in the nature of things, they must
 inevitably entail upon themselves in a future state
 of being. 8th Month, 28th, was spent in Philadelphia,
 where I dined with T. S. and paid a farewell visit
 to his family, whose kindness and hospitality I
 have frequently experienced. 8th Month, 29th. The afternoon of this day
 was agreeably spent in the company of O. J. his
 mother, and sisters, at their country residence;
 and, after passing a pleasant evening in their so-
 ciety, I took my final farewell of them, with
 sentiments of gratitude for their attention and hos-
 pitality to me, who was a stranger amongst them. 8th Month, 30th and 31st, were employed in
 taking leave of a number of friends in the neigh-
 bourhood of Merion, to whom I feel under great
 obligation, for their kindness and attention to me,
 during my residence in this quarter. The after-
 noon of the latter day I drank tea at R. J.'s, in
 company with him and several other friends. In
 the evening we took, in all probability, a final fare-
 well of each other, with many expressions of af-
 fection on their part, which were equally felt on
 my own; having contracted a sincere regard for
 the little company of friends resident at Merion. 9th Month, 1st. This morning I left Merion
 on my way to New-York, in order to take my
 passage for England, being accompanied by A. B.
 In my way I passed through Philadelphia, but
 being limited for time, I had opportunity of calling
 upon only a few friends; some of whom kindly
 attended me to the Burlington packet, which lay
 at Arch-street wharf. I. and J. P. two generous
 hearted young men, remained with me until we
 put off into the Delaware, and spread our sails to
 the wind, which in about one hour and a half
 wafted us safe to Burlington; a distance of near
 20 miles. Here I called upon G. and S. D. J.
 H. and several other friends, who felt dear to
 me in the prospect of parting with them, perhaps
 never to see them more in this state of being.
 After taking an affectionate farewell of them, A. B.
 and myself set out in the stage for Amboy, and
 passed through Croswicks. Here friends have a
 large well-built meeting-house, with a school and
 other conveniences on a large scale. We lodged
 that night at Cranbury. One of our companions
 in the stage, was a person of the name of Reckless,
 who informed me that he was a descendant of the
 Sheriff of that name, formerly of Nottingham, and
 mentioned by George Fox in his Journal. This
 family have increased in number and consequence
 since coming into America, and have founded a
 town which bears their name. 9th Month, 2d. We came safe to Amboy, and,
 about two o'clock in the afternoon, set sail for
 New-York; yet, having but little wind, we did
 not reach the Narrows till after dark. The wind
 beginning to blow very strong, the Captain of the
 Packet thought it unsafe to attempt passing them;
 he therefore put the ship about, with an intention
 to run into Princes Bay, and there lie at anchor
 till next morning, being a distance of near 20
 miles. As we were running before the wind, at
 the rate of 6 miles an hour, in the dead of the
 night, with a very rough sea, the vessel sud-
 denly struck against something which immediately
 stopped her progress; and she swung round with
 great violence and noise. At the first alarm I ran
 upon deck, when I found that our vessel had run
 foul of another, which was lying at anchor; and
 our bowsprit was entangled in the rigging of the
 other ship. This so broke the force of the shock,
 that we sustained but little damage, and in a short
 time got clear of each other. We had great cause
 to be thankful for so signal a preservation, many
 vessels having been lost, with the people in them,
 when in much less apparent danger than we were
 on this occasion. 9th Month, 3d. After lying at anchor several
 hours, at day-light we again made sail for New-
 York, where we were met by some of our friends
 at the wharf, and I again took up my quarters at
 my kind friend S. P.'s. 9th Month, 5th. Yesterday I called upon se-
 veral of my friends to take leave of them, and this
 day, accompanied by J. W. and T. W. I went on
 board the Oliver Elsworth, with a view of taking
 my passage for Liverpool; and being satisfied,
 both with the Captain and the ship, I concluded
 to go in her, and paid my passage accordingly.
 In the afternoon, J. M. having kindly offered me
 a seat in his carriage: I rode with him to his
 country house, and was generously entertained
 under his hospitable roof. 9th Month, 6th. This morning I went out with
 J. M. to attend upon a black man, who had come
 from New-York, to treat for the purchase of a
 chaise which J. M. wished to sell, having lately
 purchased a new one upon a different construction.
 In conversation I gathered a little of the history
 of this black man, who by his industry and ma-
 nagement, had acquired a considerable freehold
 property in houses in the city and could now,
 with propriety, indulge his family with the conve-
 niency of a chaise. A few years past he was in very low circum-
 stances, but coming under the notice of J. M. 
 who has been, I believe, amongst the foremost in
 befriending the poor blacks, he was put for-
 ward and assisted in business, and with so much
 success, that he is now become a very respectable
 tradesman. Indeed he ranks much higher than many
 of those, who have so strenuously contended that
 the poor blacks are little or nothing removed from
 the brute creation; and that they may be bought,
 sold, and degraded, as having neither the feelings
 nor faculties of men. So erroneous is this idea,
 that I have met with slave merchants, who were
 far inferior to this black person, in the faculties
 of the mind. After a pleasant morning thus spent at J. M.'s,
 he brought me to New-York, and shewed me
 through the cellars of his extensive brewery in
 that city. The remaining part of the day, was
 spent in preparations for my voyage to England. 9th Month, 6th. This morning I attended New-
 York meeting, and afterwards dined at my cousin
 B. B.'s; and drank tea and spent the evening with
 some other of my friends. The afternoon meeting was disturbed this day,
 by a singular character, who, I understand, was
 often very troublesome. After the meeting had
 sat some time in silence, he got up, and, with a
 loud violent gesticulation, declared that
 he came there that day, in order to bear his solemn
 testimony against silent meetings. 9th, Month, 8th. This day was mostly employed
 in packing up my luggage, and putting it on board
 the ship. 9th Month, 9th. This morning, between six
 and seven o'clock, I went on board the Oliver
 Elsworth, attended by several friends of New-York,
 who kindly accompanied us, and remained until
 the ship weighed and or about eight o'clock. I
 then took a final farewell of this delightful
 land, in which, although I have met with many
 things to try my faith and patience, I have
 nevertheless met with kind-hearted, affectionate
 friends; many of whom feel nearer and dearer to
 me than I have language to express; and whose
 kindness and hospitality, I trust, will never be
 effaced from my memory. Although a voyage to America may be consi-
 dered as a laborious and perilous undertaking, yet
 have thought myself well repaid, in the pleasing
 event of many amiable and worthy friends having
 thereby been added to the list of my acquaintance;
 whom, in all probability, I should otherwise never
 have known; and who, as to myself, would have
 been as though they had never been. As the loss of friends by death or otherwise,
 may be considered as one of the severest of priva-
 tions to a sensible mind; so, on the other hand,
 any addition to the number may be truly consi-
 dered as one of the most valuable acquisitions.
 Yet such are our various propensities, that many,
 no doubt, look upon the satisfaction arising from
 sources of this kind, as little better than the phan-
 toms of the imagination: and not to be compared
 with the pleasures arriving from wealth or worldly
 honours. Having weighed anchor, and got all sails
 spread, we glided gently along, having but little
 wind. The weather being fine and clear, we had
 a beautiful autumnal prospect of the country
 around us, all the way down to Sandyhook; and
 there being no sickness among the passengers, we
 enjoyed the scene. Our company consisted of a
 remarkable diversity as to the countries whence
 they came. One came from Delhi in Persia;
 two were Hindoos, a man and woman; one came
 from Berbice in South America; one from Jamaica;
 one from Ireland; one from Scotland; four from
 England; and one was a military officer from
 Bengal. Besides these, the Captain and Mate
 of the ship were North Americans, and the ship's
 Steward was a native of Germany. Notwithstanding this great national variety, in
 our cabin's company, and a great diversity in reli-
 gious profession, yet considerable harmony pre-
 vailed; which in a great measure arose from the
 constitution of our little republic, the government
 of which was formed, at the request of the Cap-
 tain, in the outset of the voyage. The plan
 adopted was to divide the company in the cabin,
 into three committees, who took the government
 into their hands by turns; each having the direction
 of affairs for a certain number of days in rotation;
 during which the Steward and Cook applied to the
 acting committee for instructions, in all affairs
 relative to eating and drinking; these being mat-
 ters in which the judgment of passengers is very
 likely to differ; especially when consisting of na-
 tives of so many different parts of the world. The
 Captain foreseeing this, had wisely proposed to us
 this mode of arrangement, and thus removed all
 responsibility from himself, whilst it left him more
 fully at liberty to manage the ship. A little before we left New-York, there had
 been some very boisterous weather, the effects
 of which we had an opportunity of noticing, as
 we passed by Sandyhook; where we saw several
 vessels which had suffered severely. One in par-
 ticular had lost all her masts, and was endeavour-
 ing to make her way to New-York, by means of a
 little canvas spread upon some temporary poles,
 which they had set up. Another had her top-mast
 broken off, and still hanging by the rigging; how-
 ever the weather was then clear and calm, and for
 several days no sickness appeared amongst us.
 For twelve days we made but very slow progress;
 but on the thirteenth day we got upon the Banks
 of Newfoundland, where the vessel was stopped
 a few hours, during which we took some fish;
 after which we hoisted our sails and cleared the
 Banks early the next day. A little before we reached the Banks, the wea-
 ther being very fine and calm, we discovered a sail
 to the eastward, which like ourselves, made but
 very little progress; yet, in the course of the fore-
 noon, we came within five or six miles of each
 other, when the wind nearly died away, and the
 sea became as smooth as a fish-pond. As the ship
 in sight was deemed likely to be coming from
 England, some of our people had a great desire to
 get along-side of her, in order to inquire what news
 she brought. The boat was in consequence let
 down into the sea, and the mate and several pas-
 sengers got in and rowed away, until they had an
 opportunity of getting on board; when they found
 that she was a ship bound to Philadelphia from
 Rotterdam. After leaving this vessel, a young man from
 Manchester having a desire to bathe in the sea,
 all being smooth and calm, stripped himself for
 that purpose. The Captain of the Philadelphia
 ship observing this, took his speaking trumpet,
 and warned him against going into the sea; as they
 had observed a large shark hovering about them
 all the morning; but the young man supposing he
 was only in jest, paid no regard to him, and leaped
 into the sea, where he swam about a little time,
 and then got safely into the boat again. How-
 ever, on the boat's approaching our vessel, the
 shark was discovered in company with her, watch-
 ing for his prey, and continued hovering round
 our ship for some time. Looking at all the cir-
 cumstances of the case, it may be considered a
 singular and wonderful preservation, that this
 young man was not devoured; for had he con-
 tinued one minute longer in the water, in all pro-
 bability he would have been destroyed. By this
 little excursion of the boat I saw the extreme
 folly and danger of leaving a ship at sea, even in
 the finest weather; except in cases of absolute
 necessity; for this boat had not got above half
 way to the other ship, when a squall came on with
 a thick haze, by which we lost sight of them, and
 they of us. Had this state of the weather con-
 tinued but for a few hours, they, in all likelihood,
 would have been lost. When this alteration in the
 weather took place, and the boat disappeared, I
 confess I was extremely alarmed; although, on the
 company's leaving the ship, I gave one of them a
 small pocket compass, fearing that by some acci
 -dent, they might be separated from us. On my
 expressing my fears to the Captain, he said that
 he scarcely knew a boat leave the ship in a calm
 like this, but a squall of wind came on. On the 14th day of our voyage, being the 23d of
 the 9th month, after taking soundings on the Banks,
 the wind freshened, and being in our favour, we
 sailed about 220 miles, and on the 15th day, the
 wind still increasing, we sailed about 230 miles in
 our direct course. On the evening, between seven
 and eight o'clock, we descried a ship going right
 before the wind, like ourselves, with all sails set;
 and by ten o'clock, being about two hours and a
 half, we came up with her, and passing close by,
 we found her to be the British Packet from
 Halifax. In passing, we observed the men were
 all at their guns, with lighted matches, supposing
 our ship was an enemy in pursuit of them. We
 soon lot sight of them, our vessel being much
 the better sailor. On the 16th day we sailed near 220 miles, and
 on the 17th day about 140 miles; on the 18th
 about 220 miles; on the 19th about 120 miles;
 and on the 20th day about 240 miles. Sailing in
 this rapid manner, the motion of the ship through
 the waves caused a foam as white as milk; a long
 train of which might be seen to a great distance
 behind the vessel; and the hissing noise the ship
 produced, excited the idea of a huge mass of red
 hot iron, passing through the water. On the 21st
 day of our voyage, we sailed about 120 miles; on
 the 22d day about 120, and on the 23d about 250;
 and this day we made soundings off Cape Clear.
 Thus, from the 14th to the 23d, being the space
 of 9 days, we sailed from soundings to soundings
 on the two sides of the Atlantic Ocean; a very
 short space of time, to traverse so vast a sea.
 On the 24th day we entered the Channel, and
 early in the morning passed in sight of Waterford
 Light-house. In the course of the day we also
 passed the Tusco Rocks, having sailed nearly 120
 miles. On the 25th day, about midnight, we came
 close in with the point of Holyhead; and, about
 one in the morning, came in sight of the Skerries
 Light-house. This was the last night we were out
 at sea, and to me it appeared by far the most
 dangerous; for the wind being very high, and the
 tide running very strong along this rocky coast,
 made so much noise, that the seamen were unable
 to hear the captain give his commands; and being
 close in with the Isle of Anglesea, we appeared to
 be completely land-locked. I stood by the captain, he requested me to
 reach the speaking trumpet, which was the only
 time he had occasion to make use of it for this
 purpose during the voyage. All was agitation
 and bustle for a time; the loud roaring of the
 winds and waves was such, that, even aided by
 the speaking trumpet, it was with difficulty the
 Captain could make himself heard by the poor
 seamen, who were aloft in the rigging, using every
 exertion to keep the ship from driving upon the
 rocks; with the wind blowing right upon them. I had now crossed the Atlantic four times, but
 had not before heard so loud an uproar of winds
 and waves as at this period; which, I suppose, was
 in part owing to the tide at this time running out
 with violence round the point of Holyhead, and
 adding to the loud howling of the winds in the
 neighboring mountains, which then appeared
 nearly to surround us. These were to me the
 most awful moments I had experienced, in all my
 travels, and, by those who know any thing of the
 coast, our situation may be more easily conceived
 than I can describe it. As the ship was thus with
 difficulty working her way through the discordant
 elements, every moment in danger of striking upon
 the rocks, we happily came in sight of the Skerries
 Lights, which removed all our fears. To be re-
 lieved from a situation of such great anxiety and
 danger, was indeed cause of thankfulness, and I
 trust will not soon be forgotten. Although there were neither moon nor stars
 visible, yet the bleak mountains around us were
 distinctly seen, and at times did not appear to be
 more than a stone's cast from the ship; but this
 appearance was in all probability deceptive, as it
 was scarcely possible we could have escaped ship-
 wreck, had we really been so near the rocks. Immediately after coming in sight of the Lights,
 a signal gun was fired from our ship; and in a few
 minutes a pilot-boat came alongside us, and we
 took a Pilot on board. The wind about this time
 subsiding we gently made our way up the Channel;
 and early in the morning, cast anchor off the
 Cheshire coast, where we remained till day-light
 of the 26th day of our voyage, being the 5th of the
 10th Month . On arising and going upon deck,
 I found we were surrounded by a fleet of near 20
 sail of ships, several of them, like ourselves, being
 from America, and all waiting the return of the
 tide. The morning being warm and fine, after so
 tempestuous a night, we enjoyed the prospect
 around us; and, about eleven o'clock, we and the
 rest of the vessels in company, weighed anchor.
 Having but little wind, most of our sails were
 spread to it, and we gently made our way to the
 Mersey. In this interval, our cabin company all
 sat down to dinner together. Notwithstanding
 we were so diversified, both with respect to
 country and to habits, and manners; yet, having
 been so closely confined within the narrow limits
 of the ship; daily eating and drinking together,
 and being sharers in every danger, an attachment
 was produced, so that I could not avoid feeling a
 sensation of seriousness in the reflection, that this
 was, in all likelihood, the last time we should meet
 together again in this world. I have sometimes thought it a little remarkable,
 that of all the variety of the people we had on board,
 if I except a near relation, I received more kind-
ness and attention from the poor Hindoo man,
 though he was in the station of a servant, than
 from any other person. Although he did not
 bear the name of a Christian, yet in Christian
 virtues he far excelled many who bear the
 name; and I sometimes was ready to wish I
 could have entered into his thoughts when he
 heard, as was sometimes the case, some of our
 Christian passengers, advocating the justice and
 propriety of Negro slavery. He himself was of a
 darker hue than than many slaves. On my leaving the ship, there were divers
 articles which it was not necessary should pass the
 Custom-house; and which I wished to take with
 me to my relation's in Liverpool. On getting
 these matters together, and being about to have
 them taken away, with the permission of the officer
 on board, I was surprised at this kind Hindoo
 stepping forward, and insisting upon taking them
 to my quarters in the town, where he delivered
 them safely at the house of my relation, a distance
 of more than a mile from the ship, without accept-
 ing any other reward, than the satisfaction of
 doing a kind office to one he believed to be his
 friend. The articles he took, were mostly natural
 curiosities, with some specimens of Indian inge-
 nuity; and I was entertained, with the interest which
 seemed to be excited in the people who stood
 gazing at this friendly Indian, as he traversed the
 streets with his burden; both himself and his load
 being equally objects of attention to the curious. It is ever a matter of deep regret to see men,
 who profess to be believers in the Gospel of
 Christ; and who have had the privilege of read-
 ing it, and judging of its excellence, debasing
 themselves by the practice of every mean and
 sordid vice, allowed by the selfish policy of the
 world: on the other hand, it is exceedingly pleas-
 ing to behold those, whom, because they have not
 had the same privileges, we are ready to designate
 by the names of Heathens and Infidels; but who,
 by regarding the law in themselves, become exam-
ples of many excellent Christian virtues: Thus
 manifesting that God is no respecter of persons. Being favoured once more to set foot on my
 native land, for which I have great cause to be
 thankful, J. W. and myself walked up to my
 relation's at Mile-end, where we met with a
 hospitable and affectionate reception. After spending this night and the fore part of
 the following day with them, we set out in the
 long coach for Manchester. In observing the
 extreme oppression exercised upon the poor horses,
 in these heavy carriages, I found a great draw-
 back from the pleasure which otherwise would
 have been derived from travelling by land. We got safe to Manchester the same evening,
 where we lodged; and early the next morning, we
 again took coach, and set off for Sheffield, where
 we were favoured to arrive safe and well in the
 evening; and I had the heartfelt satisfaction of
 once more joining my family and friends, after an
 absence of more than two years. In this period I had travelled upwards of ten
 thousand miles, without meeting with any unplea-
 sant accident. When I consider that in this
 space I twice crossed the Atlantic Ocean, and
 that sometimes my way lay through the uncleared
 forests of America, where I often met with va-
 rious tribes of what are called Savage Indians, I
 want language to express the feelings of gratitude
 which often arise in my breast, for my numerous
 preservations and unmerited favours. Finis. 